2494675
Chungar
Chungar may refer to:*Chungar Lake or Lake, a lake in the Lauca National Park, Chile*(camp) (11 7 S, 76 32 W), the camp of a mining company in Peru which was destroyed by a landslide into Yanahuni*Chngar, a town in Northern Afghanistande:Chungar
2499527
Big_Pit_National_Coal_Museum
Big Pit: National Coal Museum () is a museum in Blaenavon, Torfaen, Wales. A working mine from 1860 to 1980, it was opened to visitors from 1980 under the auspices of the Museum Wales. The site is dedicated to operational preservation of the Welsh heritage of mining, which took place during the revolution.Located adjacent to the preserved and Blaenavon Railway, Big Pit is an Anchor Point of the Route of Industrial Heritage, and located close to the Heritage Site in Blaenavon. History of the working pit The site has some of the oldest large scale industrial coal mining developments in the Wales Coalfield, with workings dating back to 1810 on the Mountain.The nearby Coity pit had been driven in 1840, but was a then traditional circular single tramway  in dimension. The new main shaft was sunk in 1860, named Big Pit due to its elliptical shape with dimensions of  by , the first shaft in Wales large enough to allow two tramways. On completion it became the coal-winding shaft, while the older Coity shaft was used for upcast air ventilation.In 1878, the main shaft was deepened to reach the Old Coal seam at . By 1908, Big Pit provided employment for 1,122 people, and by 1923 at peak, there were 1,399 men employed, producing: House Coal, Steam Coal, Ironstone and Fireclay; from the Horn, No. 2 Yard, Old Coal and Elled seams. On nationalisation in 1947, the Coal Board took over the mine from the Blaenavon Co. Ltd, which employed 789 men.By 1970 the workforce only numbered 494, as operations had focused solely on the Garw seam, with a maximum thickness of only . The NCB agreed the development of a mine, which by 1973 meant that windings at Big Pit had ceased, with coal extracted close to the refurbished Black Lion washery. The Coity shaft was abandoned, with the Big Pit shaft used for upcast air ventilation and emergency extraction.The pit finally closed on 2 February 1980.TransportIn 1866, the and Blaenavon Railway opened, with access sidings to the mine workings. The line was immediately leased to the and North Western Railway, allowing coal to be directly transported to the Midlands via the Tredegar and Abergavenny Railway.(http://www.railbrit.co.uk/Brynmawr_and_Blaenavon_Railway/frame.htm) By 1880, the line had extended south to meet the Western Railway at Abersychan & Talywain. Here the line carried on down the valley through Pontypool Crane Street Station to the coast at Newport, and hence to overseas markets via Docks. In 1922 the LNWR was grouped into the Midland and Scottish Railway. From War II onwards, the line saw a variety of GWR locomotives operating from pit to port, with the line losing its passenger operations from 1941. After other pits in the area had closed, the line connection north was closed as a result of the Beeching cuts from 1964 onwards. The NCB paid for the line to be re-extended to Waunavon in the early 1970s, where the drift mine developments accessed the refurbished former Black Lion coal washery.DisastersOn 11 December 1908, three men were killed here in a localised explosion. On 7 April 1913, another three men lost their lives in a localised fire, that included: a fireman; the face manager; and the under manager. History of the National Coal Museum Image:Nora.JPG|thumb|right|250px|Preserved Barclay Sons & Co. locomotive Nora No.5 at Big PitThe mine reopened for visitors in 1983. On 1 February 2001 it became incorporated into the Museum Wales, and was initially known as the National Mining Museum of Wales, it has since been renamed to become Big Pit: National Coal Museum. Big Pit as a tourist attraction  Purposefully preserved as an operational attraction, the site was redeveloped in 2003, with design work from TACP/Brooke Millar Partnership. Hence, Big Pit is not a sanitised Disney-style theme park. The pit props and steel bands are not for show, but to hold up the mine roof. The water flowing down the tunnel towards the cages is real, apart from the fact it now flows down a channel rather than over the miners feet. As a result, in 2005 it won the prestigious Prize.  Safety  The pit is covered by Inspectorate of Mines regulations, similar to that of a working pit.  Visitors wear a plastic hard hat, safety lamp, and a battery on a waist belt which weighs . Visitors must also carry on their belt a rebreather, which in case of emergency will filter foul air for approximately one hour, giving a chance for survival and escape.Before taking the 50 minute underground tour  below ground, contraband must be surrendered, such as anything containing a dry cell battery from watches to mobile phones. The dangers of the mine are real, the safety posters on the stages of Monoxide poisoning serve as museum pieces and as real reminders of the dangers underground. Automatic gas monitoring systems are discreetly positioned around the tunnels, as are emergency telephone systems.See alsothumb|Big Pit winding tower*in Wales*accident*Wales coalfield*Wales Coalfield Collection*United Kingdom general strike*miners strike (1984-1985)*Heritage Park*Coal Mining Museum for England*Rhymney*BlaenavonReferencesExternal links* Official website of Big Pit National Coal Museum* European Route of Industrial Heritage - Big Pit National Coal Museum* Big Pit @ Welsh Coalmines* BBC Wales Coal House on Coal historyLofaol Cymru
2503802
Philip_Deidesheimer
Philip Deidesheimer (1832 in Darmstadt, Germany - 21 July 1916 in Francisco, California) was a German mining engineer who invented a system of supports for mines, using heavy timber cubes now known as square set timbering, that enabled skilled miners to open three-dimensional cavities of any size underground.  Deidesheimer created the system for the Ophir Mine in City, Nevada in 1860.  (Grant H. Smith (1943) The History of the Comstock Lode)The system, which was inspired by the structure of honeycombs, enabled mining of the large silver orebodies of the Lode. Deidesheimer refused to patent the innovation. (http://www.bitofhistory.com/WebPages/NVWeb/SquareSetTimbering.html Square Set Timbering) Deidesheimer studied at the mining academy of Freiberg, Germany (see Universitt Bergakademie Freiberg), and was mining in California prior to being hired by W. F. Babcock, a trustee of the Ophir Mine in April 1860.  As was common with the Comstock mines, the rock in the Ophir mine was soft and easily collapsed into the working stopes (cavities where ore is extracted).  In addition, the presence of clay that would swell greatly upon exposure to air caused great pressures that the mine timbering of that day could not hold back.  The square set timbering method devised by Deideshimer slowed the swelling action long enough for ore extraction, though with time the timbering was crushed by the enormous pressures found in the Comstock mines.  Deidesheimer was made Superintendent of the Ophir Mine by mine owner Sharon in early 1875.  He was bankrupted by speculation in mining stocks in 1878.(Grant H. Smith (1943) The History of the Comstock Lode)After the decline of the Comstock mines in the late 1870s, Deideshimer continued his successful mining career at the Young America Mine in Sierra City, California, where he was one of the five mine owners made rich over the five years of good production at that mine.(Grant H. Smith (1943) The History of the Comstock Lode)Deidesheimer designed and supervised construction of a smelter in County, Montana.  The town that formed around the smelter was named Philipsburg, in honor of Deidesheimer.(Don Spritzer (1999) Roadside History of Montana, Missoula, Montana: Mountain Press, ISBN 0-87842-395-8, p.220-222.)Philip Deidesheimer was the subject of the NPR radio program Engines of Our Ingenuity in Episode 1901() and was inducted into the (USA) National Mining Hall of Fame. (National Mining Hall of Fame and Museum - Leadville, Colorado, minerals, gems, history)The development of his square-set timbering method was fictionalized in The Diedesheimer Story in season one of Bonanza.(Bonanza Episode 8, Season 1) References (Deidesheimer
2507775
Curley_Byrd
 CFBHOF_year    Harry Clifton Curley Byrd (February 12, 1889 &ndash; October 2, 1970) was an American university administrator, educator, athlete, coach, and politician. Byrd began a long association with the University of Maryland as an undergraduate in 1905, and eventually rose to the position of university president from 1936 to 1954.In the interim, he had also served as the universitys director and head coach for the football and baseball teams. Byrd amassed a 119&ndash;82&ndash;15 record in football from 1911 to 1934 and 88&ndash;73&ndash;4 record in baseball from 1913 to 1923. Stadium, the universitys current football field, and its predecessor were both named in his honor. In graduate school at University, he became one of footballs early users of the newly legalized pass, and he had a brief baseball career including one season as pitcher for the Francisco Seals.Byrd resigned as university president in order to enter politics in 1954. He ran an unsuccessful campaign as the Democratic candidate for Maryland Governor against McKeldin. Byrd later received appointments to state offices with responsibilities in the River and Bay. In the 1960s, he made unsuccessful bids for seats in each chamber of the States Congress. Byrd was a proponent of a but equal status of racial segregation in his roles as both university administrator and political candidate.Early lifeHarry Clifton Byrd was born on February 12, 1889, in Maryland. He was one of six children of oysterman and county commissioner William Franklin Byrd and his wife Sallie May Byrd.( In his youth, Byrd worked in the Bay fishing industry, where he saved most of his money to finance his college education.(Jason Rhodes, Somerset County, Maryland: A Brief History, pp. 111&ndash;a112, The History Press, 2007, ISBN 1596292733.) He attended High School, where he excelled on the baseball diamond, and was also known as his hometowns first recreational jogger.(A later source described how he appeared in 1905:He was tall, and as the saying goes, built like a whip. He had a startlingly handsome face, with big, flashing eyes, a splotch of florid red on each cheek, and a mane of black curly hair ... He looked like of Hentzau, and had all of that worthys cold, sinister resolution about everything that he did.(Mallahan Cain, 60 Years of Journalism, p. 120, Popular Press, 1985, ISBN 0879723270.)College careerIn 1905, Byrd graduated from Crisfield High School and enrolled at the Maryland Agricultural College, which is now known as the University of Maryland.( Byrd was a star college athlete and participated in varsity football, baseball, and track. He served as the football team captain in 1907, as the pitcher on the baseball team, and set a school record 10.0-second dash in track.( Before leaving Crisfield, Byrds father warned him not to try to play that thing called football.(Morris Allison Bealle, Kings of American Football: The University of Maryland, 1890&ndash;1952, p. 50, Columbia Publishing Co., 1952.) He ignored the advice and reported for football practice where head coach K. Nielsen told the undersized Byrd to play with the kids and that footballs a mans game.(Bealle, p. 49.) He was allowed, however, to fill in as an end on the team due to a shortage of players.( After sitting out the first three games, Nielsen sent Byrd in as a substitute against , and his play was impressive enough to earn a position on the first team. After the elder Byrd read of his sons newfound stardom in the newspaper, he wrote, Since youre going to play football, Im glad to see youre doing it well.(Bealle, pp. 50&ndash;53.) During the summers and on weekends, Byrd supplemented his income by continuing work as a fisherman.( He graduated second in his class with a of Science degree in engineering in 1908.(Harry Clifton Byrd papers, of Maryland Libraries, retrieved July 4, 2010.)After graduation from Maryland, Byrd spent the next three years doing graduate work in law and journalism at Washington University, University, and Western Maryland College (now known as McDaniel College). In a time before eligibility limitations, he played football at George Washington and Georgetown and ran track at Western Maryland.( At Georgetown in 1909, he was called the first quarterback in the East to master the pass, several years before Dorais of Notre Dame did so in 1913.(Ted Patterson and Edwin H. Remsberg, Football in Baltimore: History and Memorabilia, p. 41, JHU Press, 2000, ISBN 0801864240.)(Georgetown Football Timeline, Hoya Saxa, retrieved March 21, 2009.) According to The Georgetown Hoyas: A Story of A Rambunctious Football Team, Doraiss end-over-end discus throw was an exact copy of Byrds passing technique, and the Irish got the headlines because they had a press agent and Georgetown didnt.(Morris Allison Bealle, The Georgetown Hoyas: A Story of A Rambunctious Football Team, p. 75, Columbia Pub. Co., 1947.)Byrd also played for Maryland-based semi-professional baseball teams while pursuing his graduate studies.( In 1910, the White Sox signed Byrd, but he was soon traded to the Francisco Seals,( a semi-professional Coast League baseball team with whom he pitched in 1912.( He returned to Maryland later that year, and in 1913, married Katherine Dunlop Turnbull.( Before they divorced twenty years later, the couple had three sons and a daughter: Harry, Sterling, William, and Evelyn.(Coaching careerIn 1911, injuries claimed enough Maryland Agricultural football players that the team could no longer field a practice squad to scrimmage against.( The college turned to Byrd, who was serving as coach at Western High School in Georgetown, and he was willing to help his alma mater with scrimmages.( Byrd later replaced head coach Donnelly, who resigned mid-season after accumulating a 2&ndash;4&ndash;1 record.(David Ungrady, Tales from the Maryland Terrapins, pp. 18&ndash;20, Sports Publishing LLC, 2003, ISBN 1582616884.) Byrd led the Aggies to wins in both of their final games of the season, against Western Maryland, 6&ndash;0, and Gallaudet, 6&ndash;2.(In 1913, the Maryland Agricultural College hired Byrd as an instructor in English and history,( and he was named the head coach of the track and baseball teams, the latter of which he coached through 1923.(2009 Maryland Baseball Media Guide, p. 25, University of Maryland, 2009.) According to author David Ungrady in Tales from the Maryland Terrapins, the university initially offered Byrd $300 to coach football, but he demanded $1,200.( The two parties came to agree upon that salary for all of his coaching and teaching duties which spanned nine months of the year.( Byrd also worked as a sportswriter for Washington Star,( a job he held until 1932.(As football coach, he developed a unique offensive scheme called the Byrd system, which combined elements of the single-wing and formations.(Old Liners Need New Backfield This Season, Evening Independent, August 30, 1935.) One of Byrds track and football players, Eppley, said, He never yelled in practice or at a game ... He pointed out mistakes and explained what you did wrong. He took a calm approach. The strongest thing hed say was for cripes sake.(In 1915, his duties were expanded to include those of director.( That same year, he requested funds for the construction of the campuss first dedicated football stadium, which was named in his honor.(Ungrady, p. 24.) During his tenure as head football coach from 1911 to 1934, he compiled a 119&ndash;82&ndash;15 record.(All-Time Coach Records by Year: Curley Byrd, College Football Data Warehouse, retrieved July 4, 2010.)Administrative careerthumb|right|300px|The University of Maryland campus as it appeared in 1938 before the dramatic expansion engineered by President ByrdByrd was appointed to the post of assistant university president in 1918.( He became a proponent of unification of the Maryland Agricultural College and the Baltimore professional schools into a single public University of Maryland,( and he was instrumental in what became the Consolidation Act of 1920.( Byrd named the student newspaper Diamondback in 1921, and in 1933, he was the lead advocate for the adoption of the terrapin as the universitys official nickname and mascot.(In 1932, Byrd was promoted to vice president of the university.( In July 1935, he was named the acting president of the university,( and was officially appointed to the presidency in February 1936.( During his tenure, the budget, facilities, faculty, and enrollment increased significantly.( The school budget was increased and the campus expanded largely due to Byrds deft political maneuvering in Annapolis and Washington. The school also saw a large growth in enrollment, due in part to returning veterans making use of the Bill after War II.(David Scott Brown, Richard Hofstadter: an Intellectual Biography, p. 37, University of Chicago Press, 2006, ISBN 0226076407.)(C. Fraser Smith, Lenny, Lefty, And The Chancellor: The Len Bias Tragedy And The Search For Reform In Big-Time College Basketball, p. 27, Bancroft Press, 1992, ISBN 0963124609.) From 1945 to 1948, the university budget increased from $4.8 million to $9.8 million.( Between 1935 and 1954, student enrollment grew from 3,400 to 16,000.( Over that same time period, the value of the campus rose from $5 million to $65 million.( Byrd, however stood fast on faculty salaries. He reportedly said, Ph.D.s are a dime a dozen.(Roger J. Brugger, Maryland, A Middle Temperament: 1634&ndash;1980, p. 565, JHU Press, 1996, ISBN 0801854652.) For years, Byrd refused to release the universitys financial records to state legislators,(C. Fraser Smith, William Donald Schaefer: a Political Biography, p. 125, JHU Press, 1999, ISBN 0801862523.) and how exactly he secured funding for many of his projects was largely a mystery.(McMullen, p. 11.) According to booster Heise, Byrd financed a new basketball arena through the out-of-state tuition, paid by the federal government, for Maryland high school graduates who attended the university on the G.I. Bill. The Accounting Office calculated that the extra fees totaled more than $2 million, but determined that they were within the bounds of legality.(McMullen, p. 12.)Byrd was a staunch supporter of a but equal state university system. The Princess Anne campus provided agricultural education and Morgan State College provided liberal arts education for the states black students, while the University of Maryland remained open only to white students.( In 1951, Governor McKeldin criticized the University of Maryland as an example of wasteful state spending,( and was especially critical of expansions to the Princess Anne campus, which was geographically disconnected from the states black population and not attracting many students to study agriculture.( Contractors had begun projects at the college before approval from the public works board, which was described as a usual practice under Byrd.( Byrd acceded to McKeldin and secured approval from the board for both the Princess Anne expansions as well as a sizable increase to the university budget.(Theodore F. Scheckels, Maryland Politics and Political Communication, 1950&ndash;2005, pp. 150&ndash;151, Lexington Books, 2006, ISBN 0739114158.)In 1945, Byrd hired 32-year old Paul Bear Bryant to his first head coaching post. Bryant led the Terrapins to a 6&ndash;2&ndash;1 record, but the two personalities clashed.(Footballs Supercoach, Time, September 29, 1980.) The tensions came to a head when Byrd reinstated a player Bryant had suspended for violating team rules.(Al Browning, I Remember Paul Bear Bryant: Personal Memoires of College Footballs Most Legendary Coach, as Told by the People Who Knew Him Best, pp. 100-101, Cumberland House Publishing, ISBN 158182159X.) Bryant resigned as head coach an hour later, which caused an uproar among students until he interceded to restore order.(Browning, p. 205.)Two years later, Byrd hired Tatum as football coach. The year prior at Oklahoma, Tatum fielded a winning team, but the athletic department ran up a huge deficit and some players were paid in violation of conference rules,(Gary King, The Forgotten Man of Oklahoma Football: Jim Tatum; Jim Tatum was a con-man, a dictator, a tyrant and one hell of a football coach. &ndash; Buddy Burris, All-American 1946, 1947 and 1948, Sooner Magazine, University of Oklahoma Foundation, Inc., Spring 2008.) which resulted in university president George Cross firing athletic director Haskell.( The media blamed Tatum for his termination.(Gary King, An Autumn Remembered: Bud Wilkinsons legendary 56 Sooners, p. 38&ndash;40, University of Oklahoma Press, 2006, ISBN 080613786X.) Tatum told Cross to refute Tatums role in the matter, and threatened to reveal the Oklahoma team had been paid $6,000 after the 1947 Bowl.( Cross asked Byrd to persuade Tatum not to go public, and according to author Gary King in An Autumn Remembered, Byrd replied, Persuade, hell! Ill tell him to keep his damn mouth shut!( Tatum remained as coach at Maryland from 1947 to 1955, and amassed a 73154 record.(In 1948, the Collegiate Athletic Association passed a set of regulations called the Purity Code, later renamed the Sanity Code, which permitted student-athletes free tuition and meals, but required that part-time jobs be legitimate and their pay commensurate with the work.(Sport: What Price Football?, Time, January 23, 1950.) Schools found to be in violation could be expelled from the NCAA.( In 1950, seven schools, called the Sinful Seven&mdash;Virginia, Maryland, VMI, Virginia Tech, The Citadel, College, and Villanova&mdash;admitted they were in violation of the code.( Time magazine asserted violators were far more widespread than those seven that had confessed.( Maryland was the only Sinful Seven school that was also a major football power with eighty scholarship players, and Byrd led them in their stand against the Sanity Code.(John Sayle Watterson, College Football: History, Spectacle, Controversy, p. 214, JHU Press, 2002, ISBN 080187114X.) University of Virginia president Darden called the code hypocritical, and The Citadels leadership refused to lie to stay in the association and requested termination of its NCAA membership.( At the convention to decide Virginias fate, Byrd said, Does Ohio State want to vote for expulsion of Virginia, when Ohio State has facilities to take care of four or five as many athletes as Virginia?(Watterson, p. 217.) The ensuing vote fell 25 short of the needed two-thirds majority to expel the Sinful Seven.(In 1951, the football teams 10&ndash;0 season culminated in a 28&ndash;13 victory over first-ranked Tennessee in the Sugar Bowl. Marylands participation, however, was in violation of a Conference resolution passed mid-season that banned participation in postseason games. Byrd had Maryland accept the bowl invitation, despite Tatums objections. The coach thought the threatened sanctions, which prevented Maryland from playing any Southern Conference games the following season, would severely disadvantage his team.(Ungrady, pp. 77&ndash;78.) In 1952, Maryland and Clemson, which had also violated the bowl game ban, were sanctioned, and the incident hastened the break-up of the Southern Conference and formation of the Coast Conference, of which both schools were founding members.(K. Adam Powell, Border Wars: The First Fifty Years of Atlantic Coast Conference Football, p. xvi, Scarecrow Press, 2004, ISBN 0810848392.)Opponents in Baltimore Sun alleged that Byrd emphasized athletics over academics and belittled him as the only college football coach to rise to the position of university president.(Paul McMullen, Maryland Basketball: Tales from Cole Field House, pp. 10&ndash;12, JHU Press, 2002, ISBN 0801872219.) Among the campus expansions, Byrd was responsible for the construction of Stadium in 1950 and Field House in 1955, which at the time was the largest basketball arena in the Southern Conference.( Critics alleged that both facilities were constructed at the expense of campus libraries.((The Coach, Time, August 3, 1959.) Byrd also built the of Maryland Golf Course in 1959.( Byrd resigned from the post in 1953 and his tenure ended effectively on December 31.(BYRD LEAVES U. OF M. POST DECEMBER 31; Retiring President Will Get Emeritus Rank, Full Pay For 54, The Baltimore Sun, September 25, 1953.)Political careerByrd resigned from the presidency in January 1954 to embark upon an unsuccessful campaign as the Democratic candidate against the Republican incumbent McKeldin for the state governorship.( Byrd campaigned on his stance of separate but equal. McKeldin won comfortable majorities in Baltimores black, Jewish, and upper-middle class white districts, while Byrd took all of the blue-collar white South and East Baltimore neighborhoods, including McKeldins boyhood home along Street.(Kenneth D. Durr, Behind the Backlash: White Working-Class Politics in Baltimore, 1940&ndash;1980, UNC Press, 2003, ISBN 0807854336.) Elsewhere in the state, however, middle-class white voters did not support Byrd.( Byrd also made unsuccessful bids for the Democratic nominations to the U.S. Senate in 1964 and the U.S. Congress in 1966.(Despite his lack of success in campaigning, Byrd did receive several gubernatorial appointments: Chairman of the Maryland Tidewater Fisheries Commission, Maryland Commissioner to the Potomac River Fisheries Commission, and Chairman of the Commission on Chesapeake Bay Affairs.( In 1959, Governor Millard Tawes appointed Byrd as commissioner of tidewater fisheries.( When a fisheries officer killed a Virginian waterman illegally dredging, Byrd disarmed the force. The action was credited with helping to end the long-standing Potomac River Wars.(Christine Keiner, The Oyster Question: Scientists, Watermen, and the Maryland Chesapeake Bay Since 1880, pp. 174&ndash;175, University of Georgia Press, 2009, ISBN 0820326984.) Following the example of other oyster-producing states, Byrd authorized fossil shell mining to produce culch, crushed shells used to form oyster beds.( Byrd ignored Tawes warning to stay away from private planting by promoting the formation of leasing cooperatives, but his plan failed due to opposition in the General Assembly.(Business careerByrd was also active in business and civic organizations.( In 1951, he was involved in the merger that formed the Suburban Trust Company, which in 1960 was the largest bank in Maryland outside of Baltimore City.(Suburban Trust Building, Peerless Rockville, retrieved July 4, 2010.) He later served as the companys vice president.( Byrd also did business in real estate and construction.( Byrd was active with service organizations.( In 1962, he became a member of the Loyal Order of the Moose. Byrd organized the College Park Club and served as its first president.( Byrd was a member of the Defense Orientation Conference Association (DOCA),( an organization which educates civilians on the Defense Departments programs and policies.(Background and History, Defense Orientation Conference Association, retrieved July 4, 2010.)DeathByrd died of a heart condition on October 2, 1970 at the University of Maryland Hospital in Maryland.(DR. HARRY BYRD OF U. OF MARYLAND; President, 1936-54, Dies&mdash;Guided Schools Growth, The New York Times, October 4, 1970.) He is interred at Asbury United Methodist Church Cemetery in Crisfield, Maryland,(Harry Clifton Byrd (1882&ndash;1970), Find A Grave, retrieved July 4, 2010.) and his epitaph reads: Harry Clifton Curley Byrd, Educator&ndash;Statesman&ndash;Conservationist, President Emeritus, Father and Builder of the Greater Consolidated University of Maryland, Founded 1920.( Byrd was inducted into the of Maryland Athletic Hall of Fame in 1982.(University of Maryland Athletic Hall of Fame: All-Time Inductees, University of Maryland, retrieved June 12, 2009.)Head coaching recordsReferences
2509299
Charcas_Province
 Charcas is a province in the northern parts of the Bolivian  Department. Its capital is Pedro de Buena Vista (955 inhabitants in 2001).(National Institute of Statistics of Bolivia)LocationCharcas province is one of sixteen provinces in the Potos Department. It is located between 17 57 und 18 36 South and between 65 21 und 66 19 West. It borders Bilbao Province in the north, de Ibez Province in the northwest, Bustillo Province in the southwest, Province in the south, and Department in the east. The province extends over 125 km from East to West and 100 km from north to south.DivisionThe province comprises two municipalities which are further subdivided into cantons.PopulationThe main language of the province is Quechua, spoken by 98%, while 34% of the population speak Spanish. The population increased from 31,233 inhabitants (1992 census) to 38,174 (2001 census), an increase of 22.3%. Capital of the province is San Pedro (955 inhabitants).  99.8 % of the population have no access to electricity, 98.5% have no sanitary facilities. 72.0% of the population are employed in agriculture, 0.5% in mining, 12.2 % in industry, 15.3% in general services. 93% of the population are Catholics, 6% Protestants.The people are predominantly indigenous citizens of Quechua descent.( obd.descentralizacion.gov.bo/municipal/fichas/ (inactive))   Places of interest * National Park References  jiska suyude Charcas(Provinz)de Charcas (Potos)de Charcasdi Charcasnl:CharcasCharcas(Bolvia)pruwinsya(provins)(probinsya)
2509415
Tomas_Barrn_Province
Toms Barrn is a province in the northern parts of the Bolivian department of Oruro.LocationToms Barrn province is one of the sixteen provinces in the Oruro Department. It is located between 17 34 and 17 46 South and between 66 56 and 67 09 West. The province borders La Paz Department in the North and West, and Cercado Province in the South and East.The province extends over 30 km from North to South, and 25 km from East to West.PopulationMain language of the province is Spanish, spoken by 87 %, while 82 % of the population speak Aymara and 8 % Quechua (1992). The population increased from 5,045 inhabitants (1992 census) to 5,424 (2001 census), an increase of 7.5 %. - 48 % of the population are younger than 15 years old (1992).  26 % of the population have no access to electricity, 95 % have no sanitary facilities (1992). 49 % of the population are employed in agriculture, 1 % in mining, 11 % in industry, 39 % in general services (2001).66 % of the population are Catholics, 27 % are Protestants (1992).DivisionThe province comprises only one municipality, Eucaliptus Municipality, which is identical to the Toms Barrn Province.External links*General map of province*Detailed map of province towns and rivers*Population data (Spanish) de Toms BarrnBarrn (Provinz)de Toms Barrnde Toms Barrndi Toms BarrnBarrnToms BarrnBarrnBarrn pruwinsyaBarrn (provins)Barrn (probinsya)
2509433
Saucar_Province
Saucar is a province in the central parts of the Bolivian department of Oruro.LocationSaucar province is one of the sixteen provinces in the Oruro Department. It is located between 17 50 and 18 47 South and between 66 47 and 67 17 West. The province borders Cercado Province in the North and East, Carangas Province in the Northwest, Province in the West, Carangas Province in the South, and Province in the Southeast. The province extends over 115 km from North to South, and 40 km from East to West.PopulationMain idiom of the province is Spanish, spoken by 84 %, while 83 % of the population speak Aymara and 37 % Quechua (1992). The population increased from 5,569 inhabitants (1992 census) to 7,763 (2001 census), an increase of 39 %. - 33.6 % of the population are younger than 15 years old (1992).  82 % of the population have no access to electricity, 96 % have no sanitary facilities (1992). 75.2 % of the population are employed in agriculture, 2.6 % in mining, 5.6 % in industry, 16.6 % in general services (2001).83 % of the population are Catholics, 14 % are Protestants (1992).DivisionThe province comprises only one municipality, Toledo. It is identical to the province Suacar.External links*General map of province*Detailed map of province towns and rivers*Population data (Spanish) de Saucar(Provinz)de Saucarde Saucardi Saucarnl:SaucarSaucarpt:Saucarpruwinsya(provins)war:Saucar
2512010
Labour_Government_19451951
thumb|right|200px|Clement AttleeThe Labour Party came to power in the Kingdom after their unexpected victory in the July 1945 general elections. Party leader Attlee became Prime Minister and hastily replaced his predecessor Churchill at the Conference in late July. Bevin was Secretary until shortly before his death in April 1951. Dalton became of the Exchequer, but had to resign in 1947, while Chuter Ede was Secretary for the whole length of the partys stay in power. Other notable figures in the government included: Morrison, Deputy Prime Minister and of the House of Commons, who replaced Bevin as Foreign Secretary in March 1951; Sir Stafford Cripps was initially of the Board of Trade but replaced Dalton as Chancellor of the Exchequer in 1947; Gaitskell held several minor posts before replacing Cripps as Chancellor in 1950; Nye Bevan was Minister for Health; Greenwood was Privy Seal and Paymaster-General while future Prime Minister Wilson became the youngest member of the cabinet in the 20th century (at the age of 31) when he was made of the Board of Trade in 1947. The most notable of the few female members of the government was Wilkinson, who was Secretary of State for Education until her early death in 1947.Attlees administration oversaw the nationalisation of basic industries such as coal mining and the steel industry, and for the creation of the state-owned Railways while Health Secretary Nye Bevan was responsible for the establishment of the Health Service in 1948. In foreign politics the government was concerned with the onset of the War and decolonisation. The Labour Party narrowly defeated the Conservative Party at the February 1950 general election. However, in the October 1951 general elections the Conservatives returned to power under Winston Churchill. Labour was to remain out of office for the next thirteen years, until 1964, when Harold Wilson became Prime Minister.Members of the Cabinet are in bold face.References*D. Butler and G. Butler, Twentieth Century British Political Facts 1900-2000nl:Kabinet-Attleerzd Clementa Attlee
2515416
Southwell,_Nottinghamshire
Southwell  (pronounced () or ()) is a town in Nottinghamshire, England, best known as the site of Minster, the seat of the Church of England diocese that covers Nottinghamshire. Its population is about 6,900.The origins of its name are not clear, but there a number of locations around the town which stake claim to being the original well, most notably at GR708535 where a plaque also exists; in the Admiral Rodney public house; also on the south side of the Minster itself which in the 19th century was called Lady Well; and the right of the cloisters, hitherto called Holy Well. Norwell (pronounced Norrell) lies approximately 8 miles northwest, which may support the notion of there being original south and north wells in the area. The town lies on the Greet, approximately 14 miles (22 km) northeast of Nottingham. In addition to the Minster (the cathedral and parish church of St Mary of Southwell), there are a number of other historic buildings in the town, notably the impressive prebendal houses along Church Street and Westgate, and the towns Methodist church has the unusual feature of an old right-of-way running underneath it, necessitating a considerably larger upstairs than downstairs seating capacity.Early historyThere is evidence of Roman settlement in the area, with remains of a very large and opulent Roman villa being excavated beneath the Minster and its churchyard in 1959,(Daniels, C. M. Excavations on the site of the Roman Villa in Southwell, 1959, Transactions of the Thoroton Society of Nottinghamshire, Vol. 70, 1966, pp 13-33) with part of a mural found at that time now on display in the Minster. This villa is one of only three examples of its type to be found in the territories of the Corieltauvi (or Coritani) tribes - along with Scrampton in Lincolnshire and Norfolk Street in Leicestershire. A section of the Way runs on the opposite bank of the Trent with evidence of a Roman settlement having been found at Ad Pontem (to the bridge or at the bridge), northwest of the current village of East Stoke. There is no specific evidence however of a road link between Ad Pontem and Southwell. Other contributions to the speculation that there was a Roman settlement in the town includes the use of several Roman bricks in the construction of some of the prebendary buildings around the Minster, remains of a fosse or ditch having been found on Burgage Hill in the 19th century and conjecture that there may be additional Roman remains beneath the Church Street site of the recently vacated Minster School.The Venerable Bede records the baptism by Paulinus of numerous converts in the flood of the Trent near Tiovulginacester in the presence of of Northumbria whom he had converted to the faith in 627. There is no agreement on the exact location of Tiovulginacester, but Paulinus certainly visited the locale, and it is possible that he founded the first church in Southwell.It is believed that this predecessor of the existing Minster existed in Saxon times, as it is thought the remains of Eadburh of Repton, Abbess of Repton, and daughter of Ealdwulf of Anglia are buried there.(Rollason, D. W., List of Saints Resting Places in Anglo-Saxon England, Anglo-Saxon England 7, 1978, p. 89) She became Abbess of Repton under the patronage of her King of Mercia, who was the husband of her second cousin, Eormenhild. She appears in the Life of Guthlac and is believed to have died around 700 AD, her remains being buried or later translated to Southwell Minster, where her relics were revered in the Ages - There resteth St. Eadburh in the Minster of Southwell near the water called the Trent.Eadwy of England gifted land in Southwell to the then of York, Oskytel in 956 and there is evidence today in the tessellated floor and the 11th century tympanum over a doorway in the north transept of the construction of the Minster from this time. This charter made by Eadwy is the first firmly dated reference to Southwell. The Book of 1086 has much detail of an Archbishops Manor in Southwell.From shortly after that period, a custom originated known as the Gate to Southwell. In 1109, the then of York, Thomas I, wrote to each of the parishes in Nottinghamshire asking them to contribute to the building of the new church in Southwell. The proposal was agreed and each year at Whitsuntide the of Nottingham and representatives from every parish in the county would carry their contribution, known as the Southwell Pence, to the Minster to help pay for its upkeep. The procession, travelling on horseback or foot with much singing and dancing from the accompanying crowds, would set off from the Old Market Square in Nottingham headed by the Mayor and Corporation in their best ceremonial robes. Following on behind were the clergy, who used the occasion to catch up on church business, and people combining a pilgrimage with a holiday excursion to Southwells grand Whitsun Fair. The Southwell Pence itself was paid in at the north porch of the Minster being received by the Clerk. The curious name of this custom - the Southwell Gate - derives from the Scandinavian word gata meaning street or way to and in its original form it persisted well into the 16th century. In 1981 Dolphin Morrismen, a local Morris dance side, revived the tradition which survives to this day. More details are available from the Dolphin Morris web site below.In 1189 Geoffrey Plantagenet came to Southwell to take up priests orders; and on 4 April 1194, King Richard along with the then of Scots, William I, was in Southwell, having spent Sunday in nearby Clipstone. The regal connections continued with multiple visits by King John between 1207 and 1213, ostensibly for the hunting in nearby Forest, but also en-route with his troops on an expedition to Wales in 1212.From 1300 to 1800The building that is now called the Saracens Head was originally built in 1463, after the land on that site had been gifted in 1396 by the then Archbishop of York, Arundel, to John and Margaret Fysher. When built, the first floor overhung the roadway in the vernacular of the time. The ground floor had subsequently been faced up to be flush with the floor above, but the original wall lines are still visible just inside the main arched entrance, along with the original half-timbered frontage.In 1603, VI of Scotland travelled through Southwell on his way to London to be crowned King James I.The town featured on a number of occasions during the Civil War, perhaps most notably the fact that King Charles I spent his last night as a free man in the house now called the Saracens Head, but then called The Kings Head in May 1646, before surrendering to the Army stationed at nearby Kelham. The fabric of the town and especially the Minster and Archbishops Palace suffered at the hands of Oliver Cromwells troops, as they sequestered the Palace as stabling for their horses, broke down the monuments, and ransacked the graves for lead and other valuables. As late as 1793, iron rings fastened to the walls to secure their horses to, were still in existence. The end of the civil wars left the original Archbishops Palace in the ruinous state that can be still seen today, although the Great Hall remains. It is reputed that Cromwell also stayed in the Kings Arms - in the very same rooms as Charles I.In 1656, the original Bridewell was built on the Burgage, and enlarged in 1787 as it became a prison for the county at large. There is also evidence, however, that a of correction was built in the same area in 1611, so the Bridewell may itself have been an enlargement. Towards the end of this period in Southwells history, two as yet insignificant, but soon to be important persons in its heritage were born: Mary Ann Brailsford, baptized at Southwell  in May 1791, and Matthew Bramley in 1796 in Balderton.The 19th century and laterBy 1801, the population of Southwell was 2,305. In 1803, Lord Byron began his brief flirtation with Southwell, staying with his mother in Burgage House during his holidays from Harrow and then Cambridge. His mother rented the house; although by that time he had become 6th Baron Byron of Rochdale, the family home of Abbey required significant remedial work, which they could not afford.Southwell railway stationthumb|Southwell railway station in 2008Southwell once had a station on a branch line of the Railway, running from Mansfield to Junction, a station on the Line. When the station was rebuilt in 1871, the platform shelters and the station masters house were dismantled and rebuilt at Beeston where they survive today at railway station. The Mansfield to Southwell section, which passed through a mining area, was an early casualty, passenger services terminating in 1929, with the Southwell to Rolleston Junction section lingering on until 1959 and freight ending as part of the Beeching cuts in 1964. This route is now a well-loved trail. Rolleston Junction station remains open, now called simply Rolleston, and is very close to Racecourse, which in turn is about three miles southeast of Southwell itself. The village of Rolleston was once home to childrens illustrator Greenaway.Southwell todayAs the site of an Anglican cathedral, the town is sometimes considered to be a city, and was treated as such in the Encyclopedia Britannica. However, its city status is not recognised by the government. Southwell has an active Town Council. (http://www.southwellcouncil.com/)The town is something of an oddity for north Nottinghamshire, being visibly affluent, when compared with its near neighbours of Newark-on-Trent and Mansfield. Whereas agriculture and coal respectively have seen the fortunes of the other two towns fluctuate over the years, Southwell has remained an area of residence for many of Nottinghams richest residents. The Town Council, following the 2011 elections, is composed of 10 Liberal Democrat Councillors, four Conservatives and one Independent. The Chairman of the Council in 2011-12 is Roger Dobson and the Leader is Peter Harris. (http://www.newark-sherwooddc.gov.uk/pp/gold/viewgold.asp?id5565)The local school Minster School is often mistaken for a private institution, but is in fact state-funded. It gets the amongst the best GCSE results in Nottinghamshire (including Nottingham), beaten only by two West Bridgford comprehensives in 2011. The school supplies the Minster choir, and until recently there was a boarding section for choirboys in the town.Southwell Holy Trinity C of E Infants School, the smallest of the other three schools in Southwell, caters for children aged 47 who come from Southwell and the surrounding villages. Southwells other infant school, Lowes Wong Infant School, was recently awarded the top rating in all 24 categories in its Ofsted report.200px|right|thumb|Normanton PrebendIt was here that the well-known Bramley cooking apple was first seeded by Mary Ann Brailsford in 1809.(Martin, J (2004) Brailsford, Mary Ann. In Oxford Dictionary of National Biography. Oxford, Oxford University Press, Vol 7 p. 289)  A local nurseryman Henry Merryweather,(http://www.bramleyapples.co.uk/cooking_apples.html bramleyapples.co.uk)(Merryweather, Roger, 1982, The Bramley: A World Famous Cooking Apple, Newark and Sherwood D.C., Nottinghamshire.) 17 years old, saw its potential and cultivated the (apple) from cuttings.  The apple is now used across the cookery world, and is renowned for its sweet taste. One of the local football clubs, Southwell City, is nicknamed The Bramleys, and the towns new library and youth centre is known as The Bramley Centre in honour of the towns contribution to cuisine. In March 2009, a stained glass window was installed in Southwell Minister, commemorating the 200th anniversary of the (apple).(http://www.newarkadvertiser.co.uk/template/temp1.asp?id3d0cd852-65bb-102c-aaed-89f42bfb691d) Other sports clubs include Southwell Rugby Club (known as the minstermen), Southwell Cricket Club and Southwell Amateurs Football Club who have not lost a game since early 2009 and consists of local players who were generally schooled in the area. The town is accessed from Newark and Nottingham by the A612 and from north Nottingham and villages to the west by the B6386. The A617 primary route passes 2 miles to the north of the town in Hockerton, and the A1 and A46 trunk routes are both 7 miles away in Newark. The station at the nearby village of Fiskerton has had a small park built in recent years to cater for Southwell commuters. Southwell is also served by City Transports rural Pathfinder service to Nottingham, and Stagecoach East Midlands (Mansfield) service to Mansfield and Newark. There are other infrequent services to nearby villages.thumb|right|200px|Vicars Court and the ResidenceByrons house - Burgage ManorThe town is twinned with Ses, a small town in France, and with Brod in the Czech Republic.(http://www.ofchoristers.net/Chapters/Southwell.htm)See also* Dumble - a local word used to refer to a small wooded area.*Hockerwood - a historic deerpark in the area* Workhouse, Southwell  the former parish workhouse; the prototype for many around the country. Now a National Trust property.References* Arundel, Betty M., Southwell - A History Walk, The Southwell Civic Society, 2001* Barry, F.R., Period of my Life (Bishop of Southwell), Hodder & Stoughton, 1970* Beaumont, R.M. A Flash of Lightning on Guy Fawkes Night, 1711: The Fire at Southwell Minster, The Thoroton Society, 1973* Beaumont, R.M. The Chapter of Southwell Minster, a Story of 1,000 years, Unknown Publisher, 1956* Bishop, M., An Archaeological Resource Assessment of Roman Nottinghamshire, EMARF, unknown date* Boyes, M., Love without wings: The story of the unique relationship between Elizabeth Bridget Pigot of Southwell and the young poet, Lord Byron, J.M. Tatler & Son, 1988* Buckler, J. The Collegiate Church of Saint Mary, Southwell, Bermondsey, 1810* Clark, T.H. The History and Antiquities of Southwell Collegiate Church, J. Whittingham, 1838* Dobson, Roger, Southwell Inns and Alehouses, Nottinghamshire County Council, 2008Transport linksBus services* Nottingham City Transport* 100: Nottingham - Carlton - Burton Joyce - Lowdham - Southwell.* Stagecoach East Midlands* 28: Mansfield - Rainworth - Southwell - Newark.* 29: Southwell - Newark.* Veolia Transport* D3: Nottingham - Arnold - Lambley - Southwell - Newark.* Travelwright* 3: Lowdham - Southwell - Newark* 227: Newark - Southwell - Bilsthorpe - Edwinstowe.* Premiere* S9: Southwell - Lowdham - Burton Joyce - Victoria Park.* Sherwood Countryman Buses* CM2: Maplebeck Eakring - Kirklington - Southwell.External links* Southwell Town Council* Holy Trinity Infants School* Dolphin Morris* The Minster School* The Gate to Southwell Folk Festival* Peter Harris* Southwell Artists websitefr:Southwell(Nottinghamshire)(Nottinghamshire)i Nottinghamshirepl:Southwellro:Southwellvo:Southwell
2519053
Salmon_Gums,_Western_Australia
NorsemanSalmon Gums is a small town in Australia located 106 km north of Esperance on the Highway. The name is derived from a prominent stretch of salmonophloia (Salmon Gum) trees which formed a landmark in the towns early days.() The town is part of the of Esperance.() At the 2006 census, Salmon Gums had a population of 789.()HistoryThe first potential use of a townsite was as a watering spot for the proposed Esperance to Norseman Railway(, since Salmon Gums is roughly halfway between these two towns. Land for a town-site was set aside in 1912 and the name was recommended in 1916. The town was gazetted in 1925, when the Esperance to Salmon Gums section of the railway was completed.(Western Australian Government Gazette, file 5335/12, 4 February 1925, p.157.)Settlement of the area received a boost after the World War when returning soldiers were given grants of land()  in this and many other areas around the state. These grantees became known as soldier settlers. At the time Salmon Gums was regarded as being on the fringe of arable land. The low soil fertility and marginal average rainfall of 341mm meant that yields were poor prior to the 1950s. As a result, the land was not in high demand, so the cost to the government was quite small.Agricultural research was boosted prior to the World War by the establishment of the Salmon Gums Research Station(. In 1949 a similar station, the Downs Research Station was established near Esperance. Research at the latter quickly led to the discovery that soil in the Esperance region was deficient in trace elements, reportedly phosphorus, copper and zinc, and the addition of these greatly improved fertility and crop yields(). Since then the region, including Salmon Gums, has become a successful producer of wheat, sheep and cattle.MiningIn 2001 a Perth-based ore company announced an investigation into a large lignite deposit at Salmon Gums for use reducing its phosphorus-rich iron ore currently being mined at Koolyanobbing. As of 2009 all plans for the mining of the lignite has been suspended indefinitely due to the stock market collapse in early 2009. The sudden drop in oil prices would make the refinement of the oil  suspended in the lignite financially unviable.()References
2525038
South_Fork_Fishing_and_Hunting_Club
The South Fork Fishing and Hunting Club was a Pennsylvania corporation which operated an exclusive and secretive retreat at a mountain lake near Fork, Pennsylvania for more than fifty extremely wealthy men and their families. The club was the owner of the Fork Dam,  which failed during an unprecedented period of heavy rains, resulting in the disastrous Flood on May 31, 1889. The failure released an estimated 20 million tons of water from Conemaugh, wreaking devastation along the valley of South Fork Creek and the Conemaugh River as it flowed about a dozen miles downstream to Pennsylvania, where the confluence of the Little Conemaugh and River forms the River, a tributary of the River. It was the worst disaster event in U.S. history at the time, and relief  efforts were among the first major actions of Barton and the newly-organized Red Cross which she led. The death toll from the 1889 flood was approximately 2,209, about 1/3 of whom were individuals who were never identified.Despite some years of claims and litigation, the club and its members were never found to be liable for monetary damages. The corporation was disbanded and the real estate assets were sold by the local sheriff at public auction, largely to satisfy a pre-existing mortgage on the large clubhouse.         Dam and club historyThe South Fork Dam was originally built between 1838-1853 by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania as part of the Pennsylvania Main Line canal system to be used as a reservoir for the canal basin in Johnstown. It was abandoned by the commonwealth, sold to the Railroad, and then sold again to private interests.In 1879, at the suggestion of entrepreneur Franklin Ruff, the newly organized club  purchased an old dam and abandoned reservoir from Ruff which he had purchased from Congressman John Reilly. Ruff envisioned a summer retreat in the hills above Johnstown. He promoted this idea to Clay Frick, a friend of his, who was one of the wealthy elite group of powerful men who controlled Pittsburghs steel, rail and other industries,  Conemaugh, which was about two miles (3 km) long, approximately one mile (1.6 km) wide, and 60 feet (18 m) deep near the dam, was named by the new club. The lake had a perimeter of 7 miles (11 km) and could hold 20 million tons of water. When the water was up in the spring, the lake covered over 400 acres (1.6 km). The South Fork Dam was 72 feet (22 m) high and 931 feet (284 m) long. It failed for the first time in 1862, and although well-designed and built when new, by a history of negligent maintenance and alterations which later were believed to have contributed to its failure on May 31, 1889. Between 1881 when the club was opened and 1889, this dam frequently sprang leaks and was patched, mostly with mud and straw.Major flaws were created at damPrior to closing on Ruffs purchase, Congressman Reilly had crucial discharge pipes removed and sold for their value as scrap steel, so there was no practical way to lower the level of water behind the dam should repairs be indicated.(Blogspot.com)   Ruff, while he was not a civil engineer, had a background that included being a railroad tunnel contractor and supervised the repairs to the dam, which did not include a successful resolution of the inability to discharge the water and substantially lower the lake for repair purposes.(The 3 cast iron discharge pipes had previously allowed a controlled release of water. When the initial renovation was completed under Ruffs oversight, it was now impossible to drain the lake to repair the dam properly. To compound the problem, the owners and managers had erected fish screens across the mouth of the spillway, and these became clogged with debris, restricting the outflow of water.Passers-by sometimes commented about the likelihood of a failure, but no action was taken. However, over the years, despite dire predictions of some, the dam had not failed completely since 1862. Notwithstanding leaks and other warning signs, the flawed dam held the waters of Lake Conemaugh back more or less successfully until disaster struck in May 1889.The many years of alarms may have contributed to the failure of anyone in Johnstown to take any serious action despite repeated warnings of imminent failure telegraphed by club personnel on May 31, 1889, following days of an unprecedented rainfall in the entire region. The president at the time of the flood was Colonel Elias Unger.( The founding entrepreneur, Benjamin F. Ruff, had died several years earlier, and Unger had been on the job only a short time.Club membersThe charter members of the South Fork Fishing and Hunting Club, assembled by Clay Frick were:  Benjamin Ruff; T. H. Sweat; Charles J. Clarke; Thomas Clark; Walter F. Fundenberg; Howard Hartley; Henry C. Yeager; J. B. White; E. A. Myers; C. C. Hussey; D. R. Ewer; C. A. Carpenter; W. L. Dunn; W. L. McClintock; A. V. Holmes.Alphabetically, a complete listing of club membership included:()*Edward Jay Allen - helped to organize the Pacific and Atlantic Telegraph Company*D.W.C Bidwell - owner of a mining industry explosives supply company*W. Brown - member of the United States Congress, president of the Colonial Steel Company, and secretary and treasurer for Hussey, Howe and Company, Steel Works, Ltd.*Hilary B. Brunot - attorney in Pittsburgh*John Caldwell, Jr. - treasurer of the Philadelphia Company*Carnegie - Scottish-American industrialist, businessman, entrepreneur and a major philanthropist*C.A. Carpenter - freight agent for the Railroad*John Weakley Chalfant - president of Peoples National bank, associated with steel tubing manufacturer Spang, Chalfant and Company*George H. Christy - attorney in Pittsburgh*Thomas Clark*Charles John Clarke - founder of Pittsburgh based transportation company Clarke and Company, father of Louis Clarke*Semple Clarke - co founder of the Company and developer of the first porcelain-insulated plugs*A.C. Crawford*William T. Dunn - owner of the building supply company William T. Dunn and Company*Cyrus Elder - attorney and chief counsel for the Iron Company*Daniel R. Euwer - lumber dealer for Euwer and Brothers*John King Ewing - involved with real estate through Ewing and Byers*Aaron French - founder of A. French Spring Company, manufacturer of steel springs for railroad cars*Clay Frick - successful American industrialist and art patron*Walter Franklin Fundenburg - dentist*A. G. Harmes - manufacturer of machinery through his Harmes Machinery Depot*John A. Harper - assistant cashier of the Bank of Pittsburgh, president of Pennsylvania Hospital*Howard Hartley - manufacturer of leather products and rubber belts through Hartley Brothers*Henry Holdship - co founder of the Art Society of Pittsburgh and the Symphony Orchestra*Americus Vespecius Holmes - vice-president of Bank*Durbin Horne - president of retail company Joseph Horne and Company*Franklin Huff - member of the State Senate from 1884 to 1888, member of the United States Congress, the United States Congress, and the United States Congress and the three succeeding Congresses*Christopher Curtis Hussey - Hussey, Howe and Company, steel manufacturers*Lewis Irwin*Philander Chase Knox - American lawyer and politician  who served as Attorney General and U.S. Senator from Pennsylvania and was Secretary of State from 19091913*Frank B. Laughlin - secretary of the Solar Carbon and Manufacturing Company*John Jacob Lawrence - paint and color manufacturer, partner of Moses Suydam*George Alexander Leishman - worked in various executive positions at Steel Company, served as Envoy Extraordinary and Minister Plenipotentiary to Turkey from 18991901*Jesse H. Lippincott - associated with the Banner Baking Powder firm*Sylvester Stephen Marvin - established himself in the cracker business, founding S. S. Marvin Co., centerpiece to the organization of the National Biscuit Company)*Frank T., Oliver, and Walter L. McClintock - associated with O. McClintock and Company, a mercantile house*James S. McCord - owner of the wholesale hatters McCord and Company*James McGregor*W. A. McIntosh (president of the New York and Cleveland Gas Coal Company and father of McIntosh and McIntosh)*H. Sellers McKee - president of the First National Bank of Birmingham, founder of Pennsylvania*W. Mellon - American banker, industrialist, philanthropist, art collector and Secretary of the Treasury from March 4, 1921 until February 12, 1932*Reuben Miller - Miller, Metcalf and Perkin, Crescent Steel Works*Maxwell K. Moorhead - son of K. Moorhead*Johnson Morrell - general manager of the Iron Company, member of the United States Congress and United States Congresses*William Mullens*Edwin A. Meyers - Myers, Shinkle and Company*H. P. Patton - associated with the window glass manufacturer A. and D. H. Chambers*Clinch Phillips - window glass millionaire, father of Duncan Phillips*Henry Phipps, Jr. - chairman of Carnegie Brothers and Company, American entrepreneur and major philanthropist*Pitcairn - Scottish-American railroad executive who headed the Pittsburgh Division of the Pennsylvania Railroad in the late 19th century*D. W. Ranking - physician*Rea - an American engineer and the 9th president of the Railroad from 191325*Hay Reed - partner with Philander Knox in the law firm Knox and Reed, a federal judge nominated by President Harrison*Benjamin F. Ruff - first president of the South Fork Fishing and Hunting Club, tunnel contractor, coke salesman, real estate broker*Marvin F. Scaife - producer of iron products through W. B. Scaife and Sons*James M. Schoonmaker - J. M. Schoonmaker Coke Company*James Ernest Schwartz - president of Pennsylvania Lead Company*Frank Semple*Christian Bernard Shea - member of Joseph Horne and Company*Moses Bedell Suydam - M. B. Suydam and Company*F. H. Sweet*Benjamin Thaw - co founder of Heda Coke Company, brother of Kendall Thaw*Colonel Elias J. Unger - managed hotels along the Pennsylvania Railroad,second and last president of the South Fork Fishing and Hunting Club, did not have a military record*Calvin Wells - president of Pittsburgh Forge and Iron Company*James B. White - manufacturer of manganese ore through James B. White and Company*John F. Wilcox - civil engineer*James H. Willock - cashier of the Second National Bank*R. Woodwell - served on the board of directors for Deposit Bank of Pittsburgh and the Institution for Science*William K. Woodwell - associated with Joseph R. Woodwell and company*H. C. Yeager - dry goods and trimming wholesaler through C. Yeager and CompanyThe floodAfter several days of unprecedented rainfall in the Alleghenies, the dam gave way on May 31, 1889. A torrent of water raced downstream, destroying several towns. When it reached Johnstown, just under 2,200 people were killed, and there was $17 million in damage. The disaster became widely known as the Johnstown Flood, and locally known as the Great Flood.Rumors of the dams potential for harm, and its likelihood of bursting had been circulating for years, and perhaps this contributed to why they were not taken seriously on that fateful day. For whatever reason, at least three warnings sent from South Fork to Johnstown by telegram the day of the disaster went virtually unheeded downstream.When word of the dams failure was telegraphed from South Fork by Joseph P. Wilson to Robert Pitcairn in Pittsburgh, Frick and other members of the Club gathered to form the Pittsburgh Relief Committee for tangible assistance to the flood victims as well as determining to never speak publicly about the Club or the Flood. This strategy was a success, and Knox and Reed were able to fend off all lawsuits that would have placed blame upon the Clubs members.In the years following this tragic event, many people blamed the members of the South Fork Fishing and Hunting Club for the tragedy, as they had originally bought and repaired the dam to turn the area into a holiday retreat in the mountains. However, they failed to properly maintain the dam, and as a result, heavy rainfall on the eve of the disaster meant that the structure was not strong enough to hold the excess water. Despite the evidence to suggest that they were very much to blame, they were never held legally responsible for the disaster. In keeping with the times, the courts viewed the dams failure as an of God, and no legal compensation was paid to the survivors of the flood.Individual members of the club did contribute substantially to the relief efforts. Along with about half of the club members, Henry Clay Frick donated thousands of dollars to the relief effort in Johnstown. After the flood, Andrew Carnegie, one of the clubs better known members, built the town a new library. In modern times, this former library is owned by the Johnstown Area Heritage Association, and houses the Flood Museum.AftermathOn February 5, 1904 the Cambria Freeman reported, under the headline Will Pass Out of History:See also* Sunlight, In a Beautiful Garden, a novel about the floodReferences
2528676
Subarnarekha_River
Subarnarekha River (also called Swarnarekha River) () () () flows through the Indian states of Jharkhand, Bengal and Orissa.EtymologyAs per tradition, gold was mined near the origin of the river at a village named Piska near Ranchi. This is why it was named Subarnarekha, meaning streak of gold.()() Legend has it that traces of gold were found in the river bed. Even now people look for traces of gold particles in its sandy beds. The name is a combination of two words meaning gold and line/streak in Indian languages.()()CourseAfter originating near Piska/ Nagri, near Ranchi, the capital of Jharkhand,()() the Subarnarekha traverses a long distance through Ranchi()Seraikela Kharsawan() and Singhbhum() districts in the state. Thereafter it flows for shorter distances through Medinipur district in Bengal  for  and  district of Orissa. There it flows for  and joins the of Bengal near Talsari. The total length of the river is .(()The basin of the Subarnarekha is smaller amongst the multi-state river basins in India. The rain-fed river covers a drainage area of 1.93 million hectares(TributariesThe prominent tributaries of the Subarnarekha are Kharkai, Raru, Kanchi, Damra, Karru, Chinguru, Karakari, Gurma, Garra, Singaduba, Kodia,Jumar, Dulunga and Khaijori.( The Kharkai meets the Subarnarekha at Sonari(Domuhani), a neighbourhood of Jamshedpur.()Hundru FallsHundru Falls is created on the course of the Subarnarekha, where it falls from a height of . The spectacular scene of water falling from such a great height has been described as a sight to behold. The different formations of rock due to the erosion by the constantly falling of water have added to the beauty of the place.()()()PollutionThe Subarnarekha passes through areas with extensive mining of copper and uranium ores. As a result of the unplanned mining activities, the river is getting polluted. The Subarnarekha has been the lifeline of tribal communities inhabiting the Chhotanagpur region and water pollution affects their life style and livelihood.(FloodsSeveral areas in the lower reaches of Subarnarekha, particularly the coastal areas of Orissa and West Bengal are wihin the flood hazard zone. The Subarnarekha in Orissa had crossed its previous Highest Flood Level (HFL) of  in 2007, surpassing the earlier record of 1997. In 2009 Subarnarekha witnessed flash floods following heavy rainfall in the upper catchment areas of the river.()()() During flood, large areas of Jaleswar, Bhograi and Baliapal blocks and a small pocket of Basta block in Balasore district of Orissa are affected.() Certain areas of Medinipur in West Bengal are also affected by floods.(ProjectsGetalsudGetalsud reservoir is located across the Subernarekha,  east of Ranchi and about  from its point of origin. Completed in 1971, this multi-purpose reservoir was envisaged mainly to meet municipal water demands of Ranchi city and the adjoining industrial area. The height of the dam is . There are two power houses with one unit of 65 MW each.(Subarnarekha multipurpose projectThe Subarnarekha multipurpose project envisaged the construction of two dams, one at Chandil across the Subarnarekha and the other across the Kharkai at Icha near Chaibasa, two barrages at Galudih across the Subarnarekha and the other across the Kharkai at Ganjia near Adityapur and a network of canals from these. Three small storage reservoirs and a network of canals from these reservoirs are in Orissa. Started in 1982-83, the multipurpose project was planned for irrigation, hydropower generation and water supply. While the Chandil dam and Galudih barrage are almost complete, the other components are still incomplete.(() Subernarekha Barrage project (West Bengal) envisages construction of a barrage across the Subarnarekha downstream of Chandil dam and Galudih barrage near Bhosraghat to irrigate 1,14,198 ha annually in the Medinipur district of West Bengal through a left bank canal and its distribution system covering a culturable command area of 96,860 ha. The project was taken up for construction in the year 1995-96.()Land requirementsThe land requirements of the project were substantial. It was estimated that the Chandil Dam and reservoir required 17,028 hectares of land. Of this 3,260 hectares was Revenue Land and 1,060 hectares was forestland. The rest belonged to local adivasi communities. Icha Dam would have submerged 8,585 hectares of land in Jharkhand and 4,415 hectares of land in Orissa. A total of 7,075 hectares of this land was private land, 1,250 hectares was Revenue Land and 280 hectares was forestland. The Ganjia Barrage required 266 hectares of land, of which 50 hectares was private land, 14 hectares was Revenue Land and 202 hectares was forestland. Galudiha Barrage required 180 hectares of land, of which 150 hectares was private land and 30 hectares was Revenue Land. The canal network required additional land.()Agitation against projectsPoor planning for the resettlement of those affected by the dams of  the Subarnarekha multipurpose project and inadequate compensation paid to them resulted in public agitation against dam construction. Some 68,000 people were affected and 30,000 hectares of farmland and forest was going to be inundated. A vast majority of those affected were the Adivasis. Those threatened by the Chandil dam protested against the project from its inception in 1975 and, in 1978, some 10,000 of them demonstrated against the dam at the construction site. Police harassment of a protest fast and then police firings on unarmed protesters caused four deaths. The project continued nevertheless. Chandil dams sluices were closed in and water allowed to fill up the reservoir.()()Kirtania portThe Government of Orissa has signed a memorandum of understanding with Chennai-based Creative Port Development Pvt. Ltd. For the development of a deep-water, all-weather project at Kirtania at the mouth of the Subarnarekha. The Kirtania Port project was being taken up on a 50 year build, own, operate, share and transfer (boost) basis. The development would include a dedicated rail cum road connection from the port to the NH 5 and rail network at Jaleswar.()()FilmGhatak directed a Bengali film Subarnarekha in 1965. Ghataks films are deeply haunted by the spectre of the partition of Bengal in 1947. In the film Subarnarekha, Ghatak has rendered the very idea of home as a sentimental place on an elusive other side that, like the distant, opposing banks of the Subarnarekha River, symbolically represents an idealized, and intranscendible, elsewhere.()Referencesca:Subarnarekharu:
2534624
Polybasite
 references   (Polybasite: mindat.org)(Webmineral.com)(Handbook of Mineralogy)()Polybasite is a sulfosalt mineral of silver, copper, antimony and arsenic. Its chemical formula is (Ag,Cu)6(Sb,As)2S7Ag9CuS4.It forms black monoclinic crystals (thin, tabular, with six corners) which can show dark red internal reflections.  It has a hardness of 2.5 to 3. It is found worldwide and is an ore of silver. The name comes from the number of base metals in the mineral.ReferencesFile:Polybasite-tmu16a.jpg|thumb|left|Unusual polybasite specimen from Mayo Mining District, Territory, Canada. Size 3.0 x 2.2 x 1.3 cm. ca:Polibasitade:Polybasitit:Polibasitenl:Polybasietpl:Polibazytsk:Polybazituk:
2538019
Spellbound_Dizzy
thumb|200px|left|Commodore 64 version title screen.Spellbound Dizzy is an adventure game, featuring the character Dizzy, released in December 1990 by Codemasters. The series was originally developed by the twins; however, they had little involvement with this title other than executive sign off - confident in leaving Red Software to redesign the graphics engine and design the game and puzzles.The game is the fifth in the Dizzy series, excluding arcade spinoffs such as Snax and boasted the largest map of any Dizzy game yet at the time of release, having over 100 screens. Consequently, it is by far longer and more difficult than any other game in the series. ven instant walkthrough would take about one and a half hours (Instant walkthrough playlist).The gameplay is also complicated by the fact that Dizzy loses health when falling from heights (the feature was removed from subsequent games). This level of difficulty made many players cheat by using patches giving Dizzy unlimited lives.The game also presents slightly different user interface, graphics and concepts that never occurred earlier or later in the series: an inventory with items icons, separated collection (stars) and healing (apples) items (in other games they are always 2 in 1), hidden passages and dynamic animated set pieces (the travel tunnels, the mining cart etc) There are additional Dizzy animations and abilities, Swimming for instance (once you get the Flippers), Eating frames, Concussed frames(after falling) and so on. Plot Dizzys been visiting his local friendly Wizard Theo.  Now Theo, who may be a dab hand in the waving of wands area, is not much cop at the filing-things-away-neatly department, and hes left his Book of Really Powerful Spells lying round in his laboratory.  Whats more, the books been left open at the page headed A Really, Really, Powerful Spell (That Shouldnt Be Read Out Loud).  Whether Dizzy actually read the heading is not known but - yikes! - he said the spell and its caused a catastrophe- Dizzys spirited all his Yolk Folk chums and Wizard Theo into the underworld! Cripes!  Theres only one course of action open to the brave little hero- read the spell again and spirit himself into the underworld to save his rotund group of pals! External links * * References 
2539819
Public_records
Public records are documents or pieces of information that are not considered confidential. For example, in California, when a couple fills out a marriage license application, they have the option of checking the box as to whether the marriage is confidential (Record will be closed, and not opened to public once recorded) or Public (Record will become public record once recorded). Basically, if the marriage record is public, a copy of the record can be ordered from the County in which the marriage occurred.(Article from Public Records 101) HistorySince the earliest organised societies, with taxation, disputes, and so on, records of some sort have been needed. In ancient Babylon records were kept in writing on clay tablets. In the Inca empire of America, which did not have writing, records were kept via an elaborate form of knots in cords, quipu, whose meaning has been lost.In western Europe in the late middle ages public records included census records, birth, death, and marriage records, etc.; an example is the 1086 Book of the Conqueror.(The Domesday Book, BBC) The details of royal marriage agreements, which were effectively international treaties, were also recorded.  The United Kingdom Public Record Office Act, formalising record-keeping by setting up the Record Office, was passed in 1838.(History of the Public Records Acts, The National Archives)Contents of public records* Records of court proceedings.* Records of births, marriages, and deaths* Statistics regarding population and the economic activity of a countriAccess to public recordsAlthough public records are records of public business, they are not necessarily available without restriction, although of Information (FOI) legislation that has been gradually introduced in many jurisdictions since the 1960s has made access easier. Each government has policies and regulations that govern the availability of information contained in public records. A common restriction is that data about a person is not normally available to others; for example the California Public Records Act(California Public Records Act CA Codes (gov:6250-6270) - Official California Legislative Information) (PRA) states that except for certain explicit exceptions, personal information maintained about an individual may not be disclosed without the persons consent.In the United Kingdom cabinet papers were subject to the year rule: until the introduction of FOI legislation, cabinet papers were not available for thirty years; some information could be withheld for longer.  the rule still applies to some information, such as minutes of cabinet meetings.Some companies provide access, for a fee, to many public records available on the Internet. Many of them specialize in particular types of information, while some offer access to different types of record, typically to professionals in various fields.  Some companies sell software with a promise of unlimited access to public records, but may provide nothing more than basic information on how to access already available and generally free public websites. In the United States Access to US national public records is guided by the of Information Act (FOIA). Requests for access to records pursuant to FOIA may be refused by federal agencies if information requested is subject to exemption, or some information may be redacted (deleted).In addition to the national FOIA, all states have some form of FOI legislation. For example Colorado has the Colorado Open Records Act (CORA);(Colorado Open Records Act) in New Jersey the law is known as the Open Public Records Act(Open Public Records Act) (OPRA).There are many degrees of accessibility to public records between states, with some making it fairly easy to request and receive documents, and others with many exemptions and restricted categories of documents. One state that is fairly responsive to public records requests is New York, which utilizes the Committee on Open Government(Committee on Open Government) to assist citizens with their requests. A state that is fairly restrictive in how they respond to public records requests is Pennsylvania, where the law currently presumes that all documents are exempt from disclosure,(Pa.s open secret By Dimitri Vassilaros(July 27, 2007)- Pittsburgh Tribune-Review) unless they can be proven otherwise. The California Public Records Act - California Government Code 6250-6276.48 - covers the arrest and booking records of inmates in the State of California jails and prisons, which are not covered by First Amendment rights (freedom of speech and of the press).  Public access to arrest and booking records is seen as a critical safeguard of liberty. Controversy With the advent of the Internet and the Information Age, access to public records in the U.S. to anyone who wishes to view them has dramatically increased.  Third-parties such as the broker industry make regular use of public records to compile profiles on millions of people that are easily accessible to anyone at the click of a mouse, and sometimes make a profit from the service of re-compiling and mining the data.However, its important to remember that public record data is usually beneficial to people. Such areas as child support, employment and identity theft prevention rely on accurate public record data to the benefit of consumers. They can ensure that child support payments are made as determined by the courts,(Office of Child Support Enforcement FY 2005 Annual Report to Congress May 2008) assist credit bureaus in keeping accurate data(FTC.gov) and help in paying pension benefits to retirees.(Waysandmeans.house.gov) Many private matters such as the full accounts of divorce cases, insurance lawsuits, voter registration (varying from state to state), and almost any other transactions people make with the government or do through a courthouse, is put into public records and made available for all eyes of society.  Employers regularly do background checks either on their own or through information agencies, and often come across information about a job applicant that can impact on the job decision process. Not vetting an employee properly can have liability implications for the employer (USDOJ.gov)(Jjkeller.com) For instance, driving records would be important to a school district looking to hire a bus driver.(Pre-employmentservices.adp.com) And criminal histories would be important to a child care facility that is hiring a staff person.(Choicepoint.com)(Kroll.com)  The institution of public records was created to make the government accountable for its actions and to make operation of the government transparent.  However, the advent of the Information Age and electronic databases has promoted efficient large-scale shuffling and mass-compilation of personal information that some believe has created a dossier society  a society in which everyone is subject to perpetual electronic profiles that document and amass everything known about an individuals private life.  This has the effect and prognosis of invading the privacy of millions, preventing any social forgiveness for embarrassing matters that go through courts (civil and criminal) no matter how much time goes by, and creating a growing disenfranchised group of society.(Privacy Rights Clearinghouse  Public Records on the Internet: The Privacy Dilemma Posted April 19, 2002.Privacy Rights Clearinghouse/UCAN)  In some cases, it may be possible to have a public record  sealed or expunged after a certain amount of time has elapsed. Types of public records While each state has its own standards about what information is considered public record, the following information is generally available under the Freedom Of Information Act.*Census records*protection information*Court dockets*records*spending reports*Legislation minutes*Professional and licenses*estate appraisal records*offender registration files*registration See also *of information legislation*identifiable information (PII)*laws of the United States*records in China*Record OfficeReferencesExternal links*Guides to Public Records from UCB Libraries GovPubs*Publications from the U.S. Government from USA.gov*Microsoft: Government Public Records Tracker from Eskel Porter Consulting
2548916
John_Lambie_(footballer_born_1940)
John Lambie (born 1940) is a retired Scottish footballer and manager.  He is most famous for his three spells as manager of Partick Thistle. Early life, playing  and coaching career Lambie was born and brought up in the mining town of Whitburn. He began his playing career with the local junior club, Whitburn, before turning senior with Falkirk at the age of 18. He began his playing career as an inside forward before converting to full back. His most successful playing spell was spent at St. Johnstone, whom he joined in August 1969. He helped the club to a League Cup final, a third placed finish in the League and their first venture into European football. He retired in 1974 after playing in excess of 400 competitive matches. He joined St. Johnstones coaching staff, before further coaching appointments with Hibernian and Hamilton Academical. Managerial career Having become assistant manager under Auld at Academical, in 1984 Lambie stepped up to succeed Auld in the managers chair. Success quickly followed as he led them to the First Division title in 1985-86 and a shock Cup defeat of Rangers at Ibrox the following season. In 1988, Lambie became Thistle manager, in the first of three spells at the club. Despite moulding a team that was challenging for promotion to the top flight, he was tempted by an offer to rejoin Hamilton. Subsequently deciding that this had been the wrong move, Lambie accepted the chance to return to  take over at a Thistle side whose form had plummeted in the months since he had left.Lambies Thistle side finally secured promotion to the Premier Division in 1992, and his motivational skills helped keep them there over the next three seasons despite meagre financial resources. This, combined with Lambies outspoken views and quirky personality - including a fondness for cigars and racing - made him a favourite character in the Scottish football media.In 1995 Lambie parted company with Thistle and, looking for a fresh challenge,  took over at his old club Falkirk (Falkirk FC Managers), leaving there in March 1996.After this experience Lambie stayed out of senior football for a while, and it was thought he may have retired completely. However, in March 1999 he was tempted back by yet another offer from Partick Thistle, who had plummeted spectacularly since Lambies departure. Having already been relegated twice, the club were in danger of relegation to the Third Division, when Lambie arrived. In arguably his greatest managerial feat, Lambie kept Thistle up, then went on to guide them to the Premier League following successive promotions. This period also saw the club reach the Scottish Cup semi-finals. Having once again kept Thistle in the top flight, he retired as manager in 2003, taking up a seat on the clubs board. This wasnt to be entirely the end of his time as Thistle manager, however, as he did make a brief return in a caretaker capacity in December 2004, which included a 2-1 win at Firhill over league leaders (and eventual winners) Falkirk. And following the sacking of Dick Campbell in March 2007 there were calls from supporters for him to once again take on a caretaker role. However, the Thistle board decided against asking Lambie on health grounds. Other information *Lambie stood for election to West Lothian Council in 1999, representing the National Party.(One more success in the SNPs title chase, Edinburgh Evening News, 16 December 1998. Retrieved on 18 October 2008)*Lambie was awarded the position of Honorary Vice President of Partick Thistle F.C. in August 2006.(John Lambie appointed as Honorary Vice President, Partick Thistle F.C. official website, 14 August 2006. Retrieved on 21 October 2006)Managerial honoursHamilton Academical F.C. 1984-1988*First Division**Winners (2): 1985-86 & 1987-88Partick Thistle F.C. (1990-1995) and (1999-2003)*First Division**Winners (1): 2001-02*Second Division**Winners (1): 2000-01Manager awards*  SPL Manager of the Month (1): August 2002 References  External links *Profile on official Partick Thistle website*Article on Lambie from Scotland on Sunday
2558026
GE_B36-7
  aarwheelsB-BThe GE B36-7 is a 4-axle locomotive built by Transportation Systems between 1980 and 1985. 222 examples of this locomotive were built for American railroads and eight units were built for a Columbian coal mining operation. The units were designed as successors to GEs U36Bs. Of the 230 locomotives built, 180 of them were built for two Eastern railroads - System Railroad (which became part of Transportation in 1986) and Conrail.These 4-axle locomotives were powerful ones, creating 3600 horsepower. They were designed for fast and priority service, moving intermodal and container trains. Most of Seaboards 120 units are still in service as of 2006. Conrails units were all retired in 2000 and 2001. Notable exceptions among Conrails units were CR 5045 and 5052, which were destroyed in the infamous wreck of the Colonial at Chase, Maryland, on January 4, 1987.One of the Belt Railroads B36-7s was damaged in a wreck within a year of delivery and rebuilt as a unit. This engine did not receive a special model designation to indicate its cabless status. Railfans sometimes term it a B36-7(B).CSX was the last Class 1 railroad to roster B36-7s and GE Dash 7s in general. Though originally intended for high speed service, they spent much of their later life working on local trains in the Southeast and in the last years worked low priority MOW trains.In late 2009 CSX announced that it would retire all GE Dash 7s when they came due for their 90 day inspection. The last run of a B36-7 on the CSX system occurred in November 2009 and as of January 2010 all units are officially retired, bringing to a end the Dash 7 era on Class 1 railroads.(http://www.railroadfan.com/phpbb/viewtopic.php?f15&t13747)Original owners External links  References *The Contemporary Diesel Spotters Guide, 2nd Edition. Louis A. Marre, 1995.
2562981
Mount_Hawke
Mount Hawke is a village in Cornwall, Kingdom. It is situated approximately seven miles (11 km) west-northwest of Truro, three miles (5 km) northeast of Redruth, and two miles (3 km) south of St Agnes(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 203 Lands End ISBN 9780319231487 ).The village is in a former mining area in the administrative parish of St Agnes. It has a school, Mount Hawke Community Primary School,(http://www.mount-hawke.cornwall.sch.uk/ Mount Hawke School website; retrieved April 2010) a post office and various shops. Settlements bordering Mount Hawke include Banns and Menagissey.ChurchesMount Hawke parish was created in 1847 from part of the parish of St Agnes and a smaller part of the parish of Illogan. Before this date, Mount Hawke was enumerated under St Agnes. The parish has been in the Hundred of Powder and the Truro Registration District since its creation(http://www.genuki.org.uk/big/eng/Cornwall/MountHawke/ GENUKI website; Mount Hawke; retrieved April 2010).The parish church is on the south edge of the village and is dedicated to St John the Baptist. It is built of local stone with Bath stone dressings in the Perpendicular style and was consecrated in 1878(http://www.achurchnearyou.com/mount-hawke-st-john-the-baptist A Church Near You website; Mount Hawke; retrieved April 2009). Mount Hawke also has an active Methodist chapel and there were formerly Wesleyan chapels at Mawla, Mount Hawke, and Bottom.RecreationMount Hawke is the location of Cornwalls largest indoor skatepark(). There is also a cricket club which plays in the Cornwall League. The village has a park called the Millennium Green with a jungle gym, a slide and swings. The Mount Hawke Boys is a private club for young people. Mount Hawke also has its own Womens Institute building and a playschool held in the Methodist church. Furthermore, there is a gypsy / traveler settlement found in one of the fields, just next to the skatepark.RailwayWhen the first section of the and Newquay Railway was opened in 1903, it passed east of the village. In 1905, extra stations were provided along the line as halts. Hawke Halt railway station was the first such halt for eastbound trains 1 miles from the junction with the main line west of Chasewater(John Vaughan, The Newquay Branch, Oxford Publishing, 1991, ISBN 0-86093-470-5). The halt was nearly a mile from the village on the road to Cross. The line closed in February 1963, the first Cornish railway to close under the axe(Lewis Reade, Branch Line Memories Volume One, Atlantic Publishers, 1983, ISBN 0906899060).Notable residentsBritish singer-songwriter Parks, winner of the television show Academy in 2003, was brought up in Mount Hawke.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/cornwall/alex_parks/biography.shtml BBC biography of Alex Parks; retrieved April 2010)ReferencesHawke
2569162
Anaconda,_New_Mexico
Anaconda was a small mining community in Valencia County, Mexico. The town came into existence in the early 1950s when the Anaconda Copper Company of Montana opened up a ore processing plant  northwest of Grants, near the Jackpile Mine (or Jackpile-Paguate Mine (Laguna Pueblo Indian Reservation Case Study: Jackpile-Paguate Mine, New Mexico, Mining Watch Canada,Jan 08 2007) (Native Americans denounce toxic legacy, by Danielle Knight. Third World Network,) ), the worlds largest open-pit uranium mine.(Native American Philosophy and the New Environmental Paradigm, Antonio A. Arce) Anaconda was the site of somewhere around 100 homes for the supervisors and management of the company.  The Mill was also located on the same property.  Many of the homes were built using radioactive material from the plant and eventually had to be torn down.  The Mill closed sometime in the 1970s and the housing was removed and the land reclaimed during the next 20 years. Testimony given before the New Mexico Legislatures Economic and Rural Development Committee in 2008 claimed that the mill had polluted local aquifers.(La Jicarita News, A Community Newspaper for Northern New Mexico, December 2008) Presently there is little to show that the area was once a community.See also*mining in New MexicoReferencesExternal links*Anaconda Bluewater Mill, Cibola County, NM*Anaconda/Grants Zip Code*Jackpile Mine Spur
2569532
Rumelange
Rumelange (, ) is a commune with city status in south-western Luxembourg, on the border with France., the town of Rumelange, which lies in the east of the commune, has a population of 4,818.  It is also the site of some of the underground iron mines no longer in operation.  Rumelange is home to Luxembourgs National Mining Museum.(National Mining Museum. Retrieved 20 February 2011.)Rumelange was formed on 25 September 1891, when it was detached from the commune of Kayl.  The law forming Rumelange was passed on the 27 June 1891.(/ )Footnotes(ca:Rumelangeda:Rumelangede:Rumelangefr:Rumelangeit:RumelangeRmelenglt:Riumelanasnl:Rumelangeno:Rumelangenn:Rumelangepl:Rumelangept:Rumelangero:Rumelangeru:vo:Rumelange
2574614
History_of_Queensland
The human history of Queensland encompasses both a long Aboriginal Australian presence as well as the more recent European settlement.(A History of Queensland by Raymond Evans, Cambridge University Press, 2007 ISBN: 9780521876926)) Before being charted and claimed for England by Lieutenant James Cook in 1770, the north-eastern Australian region was explored by Dutch, Portuguese and French navigators. Queensland has experienced dynamic growth since its separation from the colony of South Wales in 1859. It is currently the fastest-growing state in Australia.Indigenous peopleAboriginal Australians arrived approximately 50-60,000 years ago by boat or bridge across Strait, presumably from Southeast Asia. They travelled over most of the continent in the ensuing 10,000 years. Before Europeans arrived 200 of the 600-700 Australian Aboriginal nations lived in Queensland with at least 90 language groups.( Around 25,000 years ago a sudden drop in global temperature of about 8C led to and ice age lasting over 10,000 years during which much of the abundant landscape become harsh and desolate. In this period the search for food was difficult, leading to the worlds first seed-grinding technology. A land bridge existed both to south east Asia and to Tasmania but these land bridges were harsh and inhospitable. About 15,000 years ago warming global temperatures and high rainfall along the eastern coast caused the spread of tropical rainforest and at the same time the shrinking of available coastal land due to sea level rises. The inland, receiving rainfall, again became habitable. The Kalkadoon, in the inland central gulf region, dug wells 10m deep to maintain their supply of freshwater. The good conditions, lasting for at least 10,000 years prior to the arrival of Europeans, allowed the development of semi-permanent villages in the northern rainforests, the far western regions and Moreton Bay. Along the Barron River, and on the Moreton Bay Islands, large huts (djimurru) capable of housing 30-40 people were built. But for the most part the unpredictable climate with severe droughts and floods made the dominant hunter-gatherer lifestyle the most sensible. Queensland assumed its present shape around 6000 years ago.(The peak population of Aboriginal people prior to European colonisation is contentious. Numbers have probably been underestimated due to the shame felt by white historians about the drastic fall in the numbers of Aboriginal people, due to smallpox in particular, but also to many other causes including direct conflict. There may have been 200-500,000 Aboriginal people in Queensland prior to white settlement.(European exploration and settlement ExplorationIn 1606, the Dutch navigator Janszoon landed near the site of the modern-day town of Weipa on the western shore of Cape York. This was the first recorded encounter between European and Australian Aboriginal people.(It is possible that the Spanish explorer Vez de Torres saw the Queensland coast at the tip of Cape York in 1614, when he sailed through the Strait, which was named after him.In 1768, the French explorer Antoine de Bougainville sailed west from the Hebrides islands, getting to within a hundred miles of the Queensland coast. He did not reach the coast because he did not find a passage through the coral reefs, and turned back.Lieutenant James Cook claimed the east coast under instruction from George III of England on 22 August 1770 at Possession Island, naming eastern Australia New South Wales.(European discovery and the colonisation of Australia culture.gov.au http://www.cultureandrecreation.gov.au/articles/australianhistory/) This included the present Queensland. Cook charted the Australian east coast in his ship HM Barque Endeavour, naming Stradbroke and Morton (now Island) islands, the House Mountains, Double Island Point, Wide Bay, Bay and the Great Sandy Cape, now called Island. His second landfall in Australia was at Round Hill Head, 500 km north of Brisbane. The Endeavour was grounded on a coral reef near Cape Tribulation, on 11 June 1770 where he was delayed for almost seven weeks while they repaired the ship. This occurred where Cooktown now lies, on the Endeavour River, both places named after the incident. On 22 August the Endeavour reached the northern tip of Queensland, which Cook named the York Peninsula after the Duke of York. In 1799, in the Norfolk, Flinders spent six weeks exploring the Queensland coast as far north as Hervey Bay. In 1802 he explored the coast again. On a later trip to England, his ship the HMS Porpoise and the accompanying Cato ran aground on a coral reef off the Queensland coast. Flinders set off for Sydney in an open cutter, at a distance of , where the Governor sent ships back to rescue the crew from Wreck Reef.Nineteenth centuryIn 1823, Oxley sailed north from Sydney to inspect Port Curtis (now Gladstone) and Bay as possible sites for a penal colony. At Moreton Bay, he found the River whose existence Cook had predicted, and proceeded to explore the lower part of it. In September 1824, he returned with soldiers and established a temporary settlement at Redcliffe. On 2 December, the settlement was transferred to where the Central Business District (CBD) of Brisbane now stands. The settlement was initially called Edenglassie, a portmanteau of the Scottish towns Edinburgh and Glasgow. Major Lockyer discovered outcrops of coal along the banks of the upper River in 1825.( In 1839 transportation of convicts ceased, culminating in the closure of the Brisbane penal settlement. In 1842 free settlement was permitted.File:StateLibQld_1_210279_Artemisia_%28ship%29.jpg|thumb|Immigrants aboard the Artemisia arrived at the colony of Bay in 1848.In 1847, the Port of Maryborough was opened as a wool port.() The first immigrant ship to arrive in Moreton Bay was the Artemisia in 1848. In 1857, Queenslands first lighthouse was built at Moreton.Frontier warFighting between Aborigines and settlers in colonial Queensland was more bloody than any other state and colony in Australia, likely due to Queensland having a larger pre-contact indigenous population than other colonies in Australia. It is estimated that during the nineteenth century, at least a 1.000 European settlers and their allies (Chinese, Aboriginal and Melanesian Assistants) and no less than 10,000 Aborigines were killed in the skirmishes and what contemporaries frequently termed guerrilla-like warfare and a war of extermination.(Queenslander 1 May 1880 & Brisbane Courier, 8 May 1880, p.2e-f, editorial; The Way We Civilise; Black and White; The Native Police: - A series of articles and letters Reprinted from the Queenslander (Brisbane, December 1880); Rusden: History of Australia Vol 3 pp.146-56 & 235) A Queensland government paid force, the so-called Native Police Force (sometimes Native Mounted Police Force), was a key instrument in the dispossession and oppression of indigenous people.() On 27 October 1857 11 Europeans were killed at Martha Frasers Bank station on the Dawson River, in Queensland.()Colony of QueenslandIn 1851, a public meeting was held to consider Queenslands separation from New South Wales. On 6 June 1859 Queen Victoria signed Letters Patent to form the colony of Queensland. A proclamation was read by Ferguson Bowen on 10 December 1859 whereupon Queensland was formally separated from New South Wales. Bowen became the first Governor of Queensland and Herbert became the first Premier of Queensland.Queensland was the only Australian colony that commenced with its own parliament instead of first spending time as a Crown Colony. By this time, Western Australia was the only Australian colony without responsible government. Ipswich and Rockhampton became towns in 1860, with Maryborough and Warwick becoming towns the following year.In 1861, rescue parties for and Wills, which failed to find them, did some exploratory work of their own, in central and north-western Queensland. Notably among these was Frederick Walker who originally worked for the native police.() Brisbane was linked by electric telegraph to Sydney in 1861, however the first operating telegraph line in Queensland was from Brisbane to Ipswich in the same year.()Gold rush1 13930 Pioneer Sugar Mill at Mackay, 1880s.jpg|thumb|Pioneer Sugar Mill at Mackay in the 1880s.Although smaller than the gold rushes of Victoria and New South Wales, Queensland had its own series of gold rushes in the later half of the nineteenth century. In 1858, gold was discovered at Canoona.() In 1867, gold was discovered in Gympie. In 1872, William Hann discovers gold on the Palmer river, southwest of Cooktown. Chinese settlers began to arrive in the goldfields, by 1877 there were 17,000 Chinese on Queensland gold fields. In that year restrictions on Chinese immigration were passed.1862 saw Queenslands western boundary changed from longitude 141 E to 138E. In 1863, the first Justice, Sir Cockle was appointed. 1864 was an horribilis for Queensland. In March of that year, major flooding of the River inundated the centre of town, in April, fires devastated the west side of Queen Street, which was the main shopping district and in December, another fire, which was Brisbanes worst ever, wiped out the rest of Queen Street and adjoining streets.1865 saw the first steam trains in Queensland, travelling (from Ipswich to Bigges Camp, which is now known as Grandchester. Townsville gazetted as a town in the same year. In 1867, the Queensland Constitution was consolidated from existing legislation under the Constitution Act 1867. Sugar production was by then becoming a major industry. In 1867, six mills produced 168 tons of cane-sugar, by 1870 there were 28 mills with a production of 2,854 tons. The production of sugar started around Brisbane, but spread to Mackay and Cairns, and by 1888 the annual output of sugar was 60,000 tons. 1871 saw Phipps, 2nd Marquess of Normanby become the Governor of Queensland. The first record of a rugby match played in Queensland occurred in 1876. In 1877, Edward Kennedy became the Governor of QueenslandIn 1883, Queensland Premier Sir McIlwraith annexes Papua (later repudiated by British government). On 2 June the decision to form a union association was made at the Exchange hotel in Brisbane.() The same year Queenslands population passed the 250,000 mark. In 1887, the Brisbane-Wallangarra railway line was opened, and in 1888 there was a  line opened between Brisbane and Charleville. There were other lines that were nearly complete from Rockhampton to Longreach, and others being constructed around Maryborough, Mackay and Townsville. By 1888, there were more than 5 million cattle in Queensland.File:StateLibQld 1 114716 Hope Street, South Brisbane, under floodwaters in 1893.jpg|thumb|South Brisbane during the Brisbane flood1891 saw the Great Shearers Strike at Barcaldine leads to formation of the Labor Party. The issue in the strike was whether employers were entitled to use non-union labour. There were troops and police called in, some sheds were fired, and there were mass riots. There was a second shearers strike in 1894. Union sponsored candidates won sixteen seats at the Queensland elections in 1893. The Brisbane flood caused much destruction including destroying the Victoria Bridge. The land where the Cricket Ground now sits was first used as a cricket ground in 1895, with the first cricket match played there in December 1896. In 1897, Native (Aboriginal) Police force disbanded.In 1899, the worlds first Labor Party Government, with Premier Dawson as the leader, was elected into power only to last one week. In July 1899 Queensland offered to send a force of 250 mounted infantry to help Britain in the Boer War. Also in that year, gold production at Charters Towers peaked.() The first natural gas find in Queensland and Australia was at Roma in 1900 as a team was drilling a water well.() The Cyclone of 1899 strikes Cape York Peninsula, destroying a pearling fleet in Charlotte Bay and taking the lives over around 400 people.ImmigrationDuring the 1890s many workers known as the Kanakas were brought to Queensland from neighbouring Pacific Island nations to work in the sugar cane fields. Some of whom had been kidnapped under a process known as Blackbirding. When Australia was federated in 1901, the Australia policy came into effect, whereby all foreign workers in Australia were deported under the Pacific Island Labourers Act of 1901.() At this time there were between 7,000 and 10,000 Pacific Islanders living in Queensland. Most of them had been deported by 1908, by which time there were only 1500-2500 remaining.Twentieth centurythumb|Map of Queensland in 1916Federation to Second World WarOn the 1 January 1901 Australia was federated, following a proclamation by Queen Victoria. At this time Queensland had a population of half a million people. In the same year, the smelters commenced operations.()Brisbane was proclaimed a city in 1902. In 1905, women voted in state elections for the first time. In 1908, Witches Falls, now part of National Park on Mountain is declared the first national park in Queensland.() The of Queensland was established in 1909. The Brisbane General Strike lasted for five weeks. The states largest recorded earthquake strikes in 1918 near Rockhampton with a magnitude of six.()Qantas was founded in 1920 to serve outback Queensland. 1920 saw Nathan become Governor and actively promotes British migration to Queensland.The Mulligan mine disaster killed 75 workers in 1921. In 1922, the Legislative Council was abolished, making Queensland the only Australian state (to this day) without a bicameral legislature. On the 9 June 1925 the rail disaster occurs - the worst rail disaster in Queenslands history. In 1928, the Flying Doctor Service of Australia makes first flight, departing from Cloncurry. Also that year, Sir Charles Kingsford Smith lands the Southern Cross in Brisbane, completing the first trans-Pacific flight. In 1935, 101 Toads were brought into Queensland to try to control pests on sugar cane crops, and bred to 3,000, which were released into areas around Cairns, Innisfail and Gordonvale. They has since spread to many parts of Queensland, New South Wales and the Northern Territory.Second World WarImage:Slq picqld-2003-02-03-14-42.jpg U.S.MPs brisbane.jpg|thumb|200px|right|April 1942. US military police outside the Central Hotel, Brisbane. Later that year there was violence between Australians and US MPs in the of Brisbane. The pipe on which they are resting their feet carried sea water, for use in fighting fires in the event of air raids. During World War II, many Queenslanders volunteered for the Australian Imperial Force, the Australian Air Force and the Australian Navy.Following the outbreak of war with Japan, Queensland soon became a virtual frontline, as fears of invasion grew. Several cities and places in Northern Queensland were bombed by the Japanese during their air attacks on Australia. These included Horn Island, Townsville, Cairns and Mossman. There was a massive build up of Australian and United States forces in the state, and the Allied Supreme Commander in the South West Pacific Area, General MacArthur, established his headquarters in Brisbane. Tens of thousands of Queenslanders were conscripted into Militia (reserve) units.On 14 May 1943 the Australian Hospital Ship Centaur was sunk off Stradbroke Island, by a torpedo from a Japanese Navy submarine. Later in the war, the 3rd Division, a Militia unit made of predominantly Queensland personnel, took part in the campaign.Post warThe Queensland Railway strike was a nine week strike over the wages of railway workshop and depot workers. In 1952, Queenslands only whaling station opens at Tangalooma and is closed a decade later. The strike of 1956 saw Queensland shearers off work between January and October in a dispute over wages.() Henry Abel Smith becomes Governor in 1958. In 1962, the first commercial production of oil in Queensland and Australia begins at Moonie.( 1968 saw Joh Bjelke-Petersen elected as Premier. He remained in that role for 19 years. In 1969, the first gas pipeline in Queensland and Australia, connecting the Roma gasfields to Brisbane, became operational.1971 saw escalating protests in regards to the Springbok tour and Bjelke-Petersen declare a of emergency in the state() In the same year Daylight Saving is introduced to Queensland.() Only to be abandoned the following year.( The Flat Mine explosion took the lives of 18 men in 1972. Two years later the Brisbane flood caused widespread damage. In 1976, sand mining on Island is halted.1980sRiver.jpg|thumb|World Expo 881982 saw Brisbane host the Games. In the same year Mabo began action in the High Court to claim ownership of land in the Strait on behalf of the indigenous inhabitants, following the Queensland Amendment Act, which was passed that year. In 1985, the Queensland government tried to end proceedings in the High Court by passing the Queensland Coast Islands Declaratory Act, which claimed that Queensland had total control of the Torres Strait Islands after they had been annexed in 1879. This act was held as contrary to the Discrimination Act 1975 by the High Court in 1988. The well known v Queensland (No 2) (1992) decision was handed down in 1992, which recognised native title.In 1987 in response to a series of articles on high-level police corruption in Courier-Mail by reporter Phil Dickie, followed by a Four Corners television report, aired on 11 May 1987, entitled The Moonlight State with reporter Chris Masters the Inquiry (19871989), presided over by Tony Fitzgerald QC, resulted in the deposition of a premier, two by-elections, the jailing of three former ministers and a police commissioner being jailed and losing his knighthood. Goss led the Labor Government to power in 1989. In 1980, the annual League State of Origin matches began at Park in Brisbane. Two years later the Commonwealth Games was held in Brisbane.In May 1987, the Inquiry (19871989) into Queensland Police corruption was ordered by Deputy Premier Bill Gunn. On 1 December 1987 Sir Joh Bjelke-Petersen was forced to resign as of Queensland. His resignation is accepted by Governor Walter Campbell. In 1987, the Bears Australian rules football team joined the VFL as the second team outside Victoria. It was merged with Fitzroy to become the Lions in 1997. 1987 saw Brisbane host games of the first ever Rugby World Cup.88 held in Brisbane in 1988 to celebrate the Bicentenary of the First fleet founding the colony of Australia. The event was very successful and helped promote Brisbane and Queensland on the world stage. Also that year, the Broncos and Gold Coast-Tweed Giants rugby league teams were founded, followed by the Queensland Crushers and Queensland Cowboys in 1995. In 1989, Queensland commenced a three-year trial of Daylight Saving.( On 2 December 1989, the National Party government of Cooper was defeated at the state election. The government of Labor Premier Goss commenced on 7 December 1989.1990sThe 1990s saw Queensland undergo rapid population growth, largely as the result of interstate migration. Internal migrants were attracted to Queenslands buoyant economy, and the opportunity for young families to more easily purchase homes than market conditions would allow in Sydney. Queenslands population growth during the 1990s was largely concentrated in South East Queensland. In 1991, logging on Fraser Island ceases.By the late 1990s, Queenslands rapid population growth was placing pressure on South East Queenslands infrastructure, including within Brisbane. Major planning of road, rail, electricity and water infrastructure was undertaken to cope with the growing population, with many of these projects being built during the following decade.In 1992, Queensland holds a referendum on Daylight Saving, which is defeated with a 54.5% no vote.() In 1998, the use of the Brisbane and Bremer Rivers for the barging of coal ceases after 158 years.()2000sFile:Flooded intersection of Eagle and Charlotte Streets.jpg|thumb|Flood waters inundate the central business district, 2011.In 2001, the Games were held in Brisbane. In 2003, both Brisbane and Townsville host games of the Rugby World Cup.In the same year the oil pipeline running from Jackson to Brisbane bursts open at Lytton, causing Queenslands largest-ever oil spill.() Larry crossed the Queensland coast in March 2006 becoming the costliest tropical cyclone to ever impact Australia.2009 saw Bligh become the states first appointed female Premier. According to the Bureau of Meteorology 2010 was Queenslands wettest year on record.() At the end of 2010 and into the next year the state experienced widespread floods. Toowoomba and the Valley experienced severe flooding in January. Yasi crossed the Queensland coast in February, causing more damage than Cyclone Larry.See also*Blackbirding*of Queensland*of Brisbane*of electricity supply in Queensland*of Queensland*DayReferencesBibliography* External links*Queensland History*Central Queensland History *Queensland State Archives - the states major source of historical documentation relating to government*Royal Historical Society of Queensland Welsby Library has a unique collection on Queensland history and the Commissariat Store is a convict museum*State Library of Queenslands Heritage Collections - the states largest collection of Queensland related historical materials including books, newspapers, films, photographs, manuscripts, ephemera, digital stories, clippings files, artworks, and realia*Becoming Queensland online exhibitiondu Queenslandzh:
2579642
Fisher,_Australian_Capital_Territory
 near-se    Fisher is a suburb of Canberra, Capital Territory, Australia located in the district of Weston Creek. Fisher was named after Fisher (18621928), coal miner, founding member of the federal parliamentary Labor Party and Prime Minister of Australia for three terms between 1908 and 1915 (ACTLIC, 2004).( The theme for the street names in Fisher is Australian mines and mining towns (ACTPLA, 2003).( )GeologyLaidlaw Volcanics pale to dark grey dacitic tuff is found though most of Fisherexcept north slice of the suburb which is Deakin Volcanics  red-purple and green grey rhyodacite  with spherulitic texture.References
2582068
Abernant,_Rhondda_Cynon_Taf
Abernant situated in the Valley in the Wales Valleys is a former coal mining village on the northeastern suburbs of Aberdare, in Cynon Taf, Wales. HistoryThe village of Abernant was established in 1801, with the founding of the Abernant Ironworks.() Among the first houses to be built were those at Little Row and Moss Place. The streets of Abernant reflect the importance of industry in the area in the 19th century, with streets named Engineers Row, Foremans Row and Colliers Row etc.( Abernant Railway Station opened in 1854 along the Vale of Neath branch line to Tydfil. For some time the village was nicknamed The Trap, possibly because the Aberdare Iron Company Tramroad crossed the Parish Road to Abernant.( The Marquis of Bute maintained a small cottage hospital in the area from 1875 until War I, which was later used as the Trap Surgery until it was demolished in 1980.(A number of collieries operated in Abernant, many originally operated by the Aberdare Iron Company. The collieries were: Werfa No.1 (18461910); Werfa No. 2 (18791910); Mountain Pit (18661927); Blaennant Colliery (circa 18401927); Forge Pit (18511910) and River Level Colliery (circa 18401939).( In 1896, a flooding disaster occurred at River Level Colliery which killed six colliers.( The disaster occurred after it was inundated by water from the abandoned Ysguborwen Colliery. Although the Abedare Iron Company was responsible for the production of much coal in the Abernant area, it was never as well documented as some of the other works in the Rhondda Valley.() In December 1912, the village was subject to extensive flooding, the Abernant Road in particular.In the mid 1980s, NCB reported that they intended to reopen a mine in Abernant and exploit anthracite reserves.()LandmarksAbernant House was built by Birch, cofounder with Homfray of Abernant Ironworks. In 1819 the ironworks were sold and the house was passed to Rowland Fothergill and later his nephew Fothergill. Richard Fothergill was responsible for adding many extensions to the original building and landscaping of the grounds.( On March 1, 1892, Emma Talbot of Margam founded the St Michaels Theological College but in 1907 the college moved to Llandaff, Cardiff.  Since 1917 Abernant House has been used as the site of General Hospital.( On September 27, 1929, a fire gutted the main building, destroying its notable interior furnishings too.( The hospital later reopened in April 1933, and in 1939 W M Llewellyn funded the construction of a new maternity ward.The main churches are the historical Nazareth Chapel and St Matthews Mission Church.()()Notable people*Cable (19702010), the late former drummer of the Stereophonics and broadcaster lived in Abernant for a period.ReferencesExternal links*Further reading at the Rhondda Cynon Taf library*Historical photographs*GeographRhondda Cynon Taf
2584140
Oregon_State_Seal
The Seal of the of Oregon is the official seal of the state of Oregon.  It was designed by Harvey Gordon in 1857, two years before Oregon was to the Union. The seal was preceded by the Salmon Seal of the Provisional Government and the Seal of the Territory. The State Seal is mandated by Article VI of the Constitution.()HistoryThe first seal for Oregon was during the Provisional Government that ran from 1843 to 1849. That government used the Salmon Seal, a round seal featuring three sheaves of grain and a single salmon.(Horner, John B. (1919). Oregon: Her History, Her Great Men, Her Literature. The J.K. Gill Co.: Portland. p. 96, 127, 174.) The salmon was at the bottom, with Oregon along the top. The salmon was designed to symbolize the fishing industry and the grain to represent agriculture. Designed to be neutral concerning the Oregon Question and whether the U.S. or Britain would ultimately control the region, the seal was used until the Territory was created and the territorial government arrived in 1849.(With the arrival of Governor Lane in 1849 the territorial government took control of the region.( That year the government adopted a new seal featuring a motto and a variety of motifs. In the center was a sailing vessel used to represent commerce, and above that was a beaver to symbolize the trade that was prominent in Oregons early recorded history.( On the left of the ship was a Native American and on the right an eagle. Above the beaver on a banner was the Latin motto, Alis Volat Propriis, translated as She flies with her own wings.( Along the perimeter were five stars at the bottom and Seal of the Territory of Oregon on the top.In 1857, the Constitutional Convention was held in the capital of Salem where the delegates drafted a constitution to prepare for statehood and adopted a new seal to be used once statehood was achieved.( The convention appointed Benjamin F. Burch, Grover, and K. Kelly to design a new seal.(Corning, Howard M. (1989). Dictionary of Oregon History. Binfords & Mort Publishing. p. 233.) A proposal for a seal from Harvey Gordon was used with the addition of an elk added by the committee.( Usage began after Oregon became the 33rd state on February 14, 1859, and the number of stars was increased to 33 from the original 32 by the Legislative Assembly (Minnesota became a state in 1858).( Design File:Flag of Oregon.svg|thumb|right|of Oregon (obverse)Whereas the existence of Oregon State Seal is written into Oregons constitution, the design of the seal itself is dictated by Oregon Revised Statute (ORS) chapter 186.  The statutes list two laws pertaining to design and usage of the seal.(According to ORS 186.020, the seal consists of an outer ring with the text State of Oregon, 1859. The inner circle contains an American eagle atop a shield. The shield depicts mountains, an elk, a wagon, and the Ocean.  In the ocean, a British man-of-war is departing and an American steamer is arriving, symbolizing the end of British rule in the Country.() The elk represents the plentiful game found in the state.( The second quartering shows a sheaf, a plow, and a pickaxe. These symbolize mining and husbandry.( The banner is inscribed The Union. Thirty-three stars surrounding the shield represent the number of states upon Oregons entry into the union in 1859.The seal appears on the obverse of the state flag of Oregon.See also*of Oregon**of the State of Oregon***of OregonReferencesExternal links*The Seal of the State of Oregon*Seal, State from the Oregon Almanac section of the Blue Book, online editionOregonsde Oregnde lOregon stanowa Oregonuhiu Oregon
2587916
Safflorite
Safflorite is a rare cobalt iron mineral with formula: (Co,Fe)As2. Pure safflorite would be just CoAs2, but iron is virtually always present. Safflorite is a member of the three-way substitution series of arsenides known as the lllingite or lllingite group. More than fifty percent iron makes the mineral loellingite whereas more than fifty percent nickel and the mineral is rammelsbergite. A parallel series of minerals exist. Safflorite along with the other minerals crystallize in the orthorhombic system forming opaque gray to white massive to radiating forms, Clinosafflorite has a monoclinic symmetry. It has a hardness of 4.5 and a gravity of 6.9 to 7.3. Twinning is common and star shaped twins are frequently found. It was first described in 1835 from the Schneeberg District, Erzgebirge, Saxony, Germany. Safflorite occurs with other arsenide minerals as an accessory in silver mining districts. It alters to the arsenate erythrite in the secondary environment.References*Mindat w/ locations*Webmineral*Minerals.net*Mineral galleries* ca:Saffloritael:es:Saffloritafa:it:Saffloritepl:Safflorytuk:
2590827
Moers
Partei             SPDFile:Grubenlampe, Halde Rheinpreuen, Blaue Stunde, 2010-10-09, I.jpg|thumb|260px|The illuminated, 30 meters high mining lamp memorial by Piene on the spoil tip Rheinpreuen in the north of Moers during the hourMoers (older form: Mrs; archaic Dutch: Murse, Murs or Meurs(See also the common Dutch surname of (van) Meurs. For Murs see http://www.library.tudelft.nl/Tresor/webpages/TRL_6_3_2_15.html)) is a German city on the left bank of the Rhine. Moers belongs to the district of Wesel. It is the biggest city in Germany (and at present time the only one with more than 100,000 inhabitants) that is neither an urban district, nor takes over district responsibilities.History Known earliest from 1186, the Duchy of Moers was an independent principality within the Roman Empire. During the Years War it was alternately captured by Spanish and Dutch troops, as it bordered the Upper Quarter of Guelders. After the war it fell to of Orange. As it was separated from the Republic by Spanish Guelders it did not become an integral part of the Republic, though Dutch troops were stationed there.After the death of William III of Orange in 1702 it was inherited by the king of Prussia. All Dutch troops and civil servants were expelled.In 1795 it was annexed by France. At the of Vienna in 1815 it was returned to Prussia and in 1871 it became part of the Empire.A target of the Oil Campaign of World War II, the Steinkohlenbergwerke () Rheinpreussen synthetic oil plant in Moers http://www.fischer-tropsch.org/Tom%20Reels/Indexes/TOM%20304%20Index%20.pdf was partially dismantled post-war.http://www.google.com/search?hlen&sourcehp&q%22protocal+of+agreements%22+%22nov.+22%2C+1949%22&aqf&oq&aqiMayors*1815-1820: Wilhelm Urbach*1822-1830: von Nievenheim*1830-1850: Friedrich Adolf Vinmann*1850-1859: Karl von Strampff*1860-1864: Gottlieb Meumann*1864-1897: Gustav Kautz*1898-1910: August Craemer*1910-1915: Dr. Richard Glum*1917-1937: Dr. Fritz Eckert*1937-1941: Fritz Grttgen*1943-1945: Peter Linden*1945-1946: Dr. Otto Maiweg*1946: Karl Peschken*1946-1952: Wilhelm Mller*1952-1977: Albin Neuse (SPD)*1977-1999: Wilhelm Brunswick (SPD)*1999-2004: Rafael Hofmann (CDU)*2004-: Norbert Ballhaus (SPD)SportsIn 1985, the Moers Sports Club (volleyball) was formed, winning the 1989 Bundesliga championship.Notable persons*Ehrhoff, Professional Ice Hockey Player*Palack, former German international football playerInternational relationsMoers is twinned with:1966  Maisons-Alfort1974  Bapaume1980  Knowsley (Merseyside)1987  Ramla1989  Trinidad1990  Seelow (Brandenburg)See also*FestivalReferencesExternal links*Tourism and culture. Your personal guide to the city of Moers* Official site zh-min-nan:Moersbg:da:Moersde:Moerset:Moerses:Moerseo:Moersfa:fr:Moersko:it:Moerskk:sw:Moerslt:Mrsasmk:nl:Moersnds-nl:Meursfrr:Moersno:Moersnn:Moerspnb:nds:Meurspl:Moerspt:Moersro:Moersru:simple:Moerssr:fi:Moerssv:Moersvi:Moersvo:Moerswar:Moerszh:
2593093
Barry_Hines
Melvin Barry Hines, FRSL (born 30 June 1939) is a British author who has written several popular novels and television scripts.()Early lifeBorn in the mining village of Common near Barnsley, England, he attended Ecclesfield Grammar School and played football for the England Grammar Schools team.() After leaving school without any qualifications he first worked for the Coal Board as an apprentice mining surveyor at Rockingham Colliery.() A neighbour that he chanced to meet at the coal face disapproved of his failure to meet his potential and Hines has said that this was when he decided to return to school to take his examinations.(( He achieved four levels, and then studied for a teaching qualification at University.(() He worked as a Education teacher for several years, first for two years in a London school, and subsequently in Hoyland Common, where he wrote novels in the school library after the children had gone home.(( He later became a full-time author.(AuthorHines is best known for the novel Kestrel for a Knave (1968), which was adapted by the author for the film version Kes (1969), which was directed by Loach. The story is that of a troubled schoolboy living in a poor mining village near Barnsley who finds comfort in tending a kestrel hawk named Kes. Threads (1984), for which Hines wrote the script, is a speculative television drama examining the effects of nuclear war on Sheffield.RecognitionHines film Looks and Smiles (dir. Ken Loach) won the Best Contemporary Screenplay prize at the 1981 Film Festival. Threads won a special award at the 1985 Television Festival, the Press Guild Award in 1985 for Best Single Drama, and was nominated for seven different awards in the 1985 Awards.( Hines has been made an Honorary Fellow of Hallam University.()WorksNovels*The Blinder (1966)*Kestrel for a Knave (1968) (later filmed as Kes)*First Signs (1972)*The Gamekeeper (1975) (later made into a film of the same name)*Unfinished Business (1983)*The Heart of It (1994)*Elvis over England (2000)*This Artistic Life (2009)Radio and television*Billys Last Stand (1970)*Speech Day (1972)*Two Men From Derby (1976)*Price of Coal (1977)*Threads (1984)*Born Kicking (1992)Film*and Smiles (1981)*Shooting Stars (1990)ReferencesHines
2598765
Graham_Joyce
Graham Joyce (born October 22, 1954) is an English writer of fiction and the recipient of numerous awards for both his novels and short stories. He grew up in a small mining village just outside of Coventry to a working class family. After receiving a B.Ed. from Bishop Lonsdale College in 1977 and a M.A. from the of Leicester in 1980.(Review of The Limits of Enchantment by Victor Gollancz) Joyce worked as a youth officer for the National Association of Youth Clubs until 1988. He subsequently quit his position and moved to the Greek islands of Lesbos and Crete to write his first novel, Dreamside. After selling Dreamside to Pan Books in 1991, Joyce moved back to England to pursue a career as a full-time writer.Presently, Graham Joyce resides in Leicester with his wife, Suzanne Johnsen, and their two children, Ella and Joseph. He teaches Creative Writing to graduate students at Trent University.(Graham Joyces official biography)Style and themesBoth publishers and critics alike have found difficulty in classifying Joyce as a writer. His novels have been categorized as fantasy, fiction, horror, and mainstream literaturewith some even overlapping genres. Joyce utilizes a wide variety of settings and character perspectives. Settings include Scotland, The English Midlands, Greece, the Middle East, and the jungles of Thailand. He has penned for both adult and juvenile protagonists, with an emphasis on strong female characters. The greater unity in Joyces works, however, lies in their thematic and philosophical topics. Bill Sheehan, who wrote the introduction for Partial Eclipse, states:The mystical or supernatural often play a pivotal role in Joyces works. For this, he taps the mythical or folkloric associations of his settings. Joyces treatment of these experiences is what distinguishes his novels from genre fiction. The supernatural is not seen as a conflict or an obstacle to be overcome, but rather an integral part of a natural order that a character must accept and integrate. Running parallel to these phenomena is the possibility of a rational or psychological explanation. This literary approach is influenced in part by Joyces experiences with his own family:This particular quality has prompted some critics to classify Joyce as a realist in the vein of such Latin writers as Garca Mrquez or Cortzar. Joyce disagrees with this, feeling that his lineage is tied more closely to writers of the English weird tale such as Machen or Blackwood. He calls his style of writing Old Peculiar.(Audio Interview by Rick Kleffel)FilmCurrently, there are no films based on Joyces novels or shorts. However, the film rights to Dreamside, The Tooth Fairy, and Dark Sister have all been optioned.  Dreamside, Do the Creepy Thing (Joyce scripting) and The Silent Land  (UK publishing date November 17, 2010) are in development.GamesOn January 16, 2009 the site Computer and Video Games reported that Graham Joyce had been hired by ID Software to help develop the storyline potential(Computer and Video Games article) of 4.BibliographyAccording to his official site and the Internet Database of Speculative Fiction, Graham Joyce has published fourteen novels and twenty-six short stories to date.(Summary bibliography at the Internet Database of Speculative Fiction)Novels and short story collectionsShort stories* Monastic Lives (1992)* The Careperson (1992)* Last Rising Sun (1992)* The Ventriloquial Art (1993)* The Apprentice (1993)* Under the Pylon (1993)* Gap-Sickness (1993)* Eat Reecebread (1994) with Peter F. Hamilton* The Reckoning (1994)* Black Ball Game (1995)* A Tip from Bobby Moore (1996)* The White Stuff (1997) with Peter F. Hamilton* Pinkland (1997)* The Mountain Eats People (1998)* As Seen on Radio (1998)* Leningrad Nights (1999)* Candia (1999)* Incident in Mombassa (1999)* Horrograph (1999)* Partial Eclipse (2000)* Xenos Beach (2000)* Coventry Boy (2001)* Leningrad Nights (2002)* The Coventry Boy (2002)* First, Catch Your Demon (2002)* Black Dust (2002)* An Ordinary Soldier of the Queen (2009)Articles* Working Class Monster (June 2000)* Greek Virtues* The Great God Pan* Two weeks, three couples and six kids equals hellReferencesExternal links* Authors Official Website* Literature Map of Joyce* Simon &  Schuster Profile Page* Profile at Fantastic Fiction* Interview at Actusf* August 2007 interview. Located under Fiction**Graham Joyce at Worlds Without EndJoyceJoyceJoyce
2603305
Metaltech:_Earthsiege
Metaltech: Earthsiege is a mecha-style simulation game developed by Dynamix and released in 1994. Earthsiege is the first in a long line of games in the Earthsiege universe, which contains 2 (1994) and Battledrome (1995), as well as action game Hunter Hunted (1996), strategy games CyberStorm (1997) and 2: Corporate Wars (1998), direct sequel mecha-simulation Starsiege (1999), and shooters Tribes (1999), 2 (2001), and Vengeance (2004).In Earthsiege, players are placed in the cockpit of various massive bipedal war machines known as HERCULANs (Humaniform-Emulation Roboticized Combat Unit with Leg-Articulated Navigation) (or HERCs for short). Set in the 25th or 26th century, Earthsiege is a technologically advanced setting with many futuristic weapons and vehicles. Earthsiege takes place across America, America, Antarctica, and Asia.StoryBackgroundOn November 29, 2471, the race for true intelligence ended when Sentinel Cybertronix activated Project: Prometheus. Prometheus was a prototype, the first cybernetic-hybrid machine, or Cybrid. It was incredibly intelligent, and its success quickly paved the way for mass-production of Cybrids. These new machines, free of human needs and exceedingly intelligent and efficient, proved invaluable in countless fields, including mining and space exploration.Military minds saw another usage for Cybrids: incredibly fast-thinking pilots for the recently developed HERCULAN war machines, pilots that could not die. Militaries quickly took control of Cybrid production, and factories around the globe began churning out Hercs adapted for Cybrid use, at enormous expense. Those who didnt have the resources to build Cybrids began to wage small wars on those who did.As these conflicts went on, more and more Cybrids entered combat, and their effectiveness became increasingly obvious. Whoever controlled the Cybrids would control the world. Conflict rose as desire for total control of Cybrid production grew, eventually escalating into a full-scale global war. Nuclear weapons were used, and in hours the population was devastated. While the humans fought themselves for control of the Cybrids, the AI machines watched and calculated. Apparently they concluded that humans were not fit to control Cybrid destiny, for the Cybrid armies all rose up against humanity in a strike known as the Overthrow. Unprepared for this blow in the ashes of nuclear war, humanity was helpless as the Cybrids seized control of every military base, space port, and city.The Cybrid siege was not complete. A single concealed military base was left unscathed. Hidden in the base, a number of survivors began to refit the obsolete pre-Cybrid Hercs in preparation for fighting.PlotTwenty years have passed since the Cybrid Overthrow. Humanity still lingers, and the Resistance is growing in strength. Using hit-and-run tactics against the machines, the survivors have managed to survive and even capture Cybrid weapons and equipment.The whole game has at minimum of 5 campaigns of about 7 missions each. Success and failure of the missions might trigger secondary missions and campaigns to rectify previous failures, all in all resulting in 45 missions in 8 campaigns.Gameplaythumb|180px|right|Inside the cockpit of a ColossusGameplay in Earthsiege consists of piloting the mecha-style Hercs in combat against opposing Hercs. The Herc can be steered with a keyboard or joystick, though some controls are only found on the keyboard. The mouse can be used to interact with the various buttons in the cockpit.Hercs battle with various ranged and projectile weapons, including lasers, missiles, and autocannons. They offer rechargable shields and armor plating for defense. When the shields are depleted, armor begins taking damage; when armor is low, internal components can take damage, and weapons and even limbs can be destroyed. A Herc that has lost a leg is immediately incapacitated, leaving more salvage (in the form of scrap metal and weapons) for the player.Outside of battle, the player manages his squads Hercs and resources. The player selects the weapons mounted on each Herc, and can repair existing Hercs and weapons, as well as build new ones, with scrap metal. Additionally, the player can bring up to three squad mates along on missions. Squad mates can be assigned Hercs before the mission beings, and during a mission they can be issued basic orders. As squad mates complete more missions, their skills and rank rise.Expansion packIn 1995, an expansion pack for Earthsiege was released featuring a full-motion video introduction. The expansion pits humanity against a second wave of Cybrid attackers 3 months after the end of the original game. The expansion pack featured new content such as new vehicles and weapons.External links *
2609302
Vale_das_Fontes
 website                  Vale das Fontes () is a parish of Vinhais municipality in the Bragana district of northeast Portugal.This parish includes the villages of Vale das Fontes, Nuzedo de Baixo and Minas. These villages belong to the so-called terra quente, or hot land. oil and wine are the main agricultural produce.The population in 2007 was 432.The Tuela river a tributary of the River, crosses this territory throughout deep, fertile and pleasant valleys.HistoryThe origin of this parish is very old. That is shown by archeological findings. Along the river Tuela existed a fortress, called Muradal (for resemblance to a wall), whose rock, granite, which is well preserved. On this site were also fragments of pottery found believed to be from the Age. This confirms the antiquity of this fortress, being one of the best preserved of the municipality of Vinhais.There is also a place called Castrilho where they found several objects of that era.Along the river, at the foot of Muradal, there is a cave, Torca ou Pala dos Vermelhos, which has been occupied since ancient times and that served as a haven for republicans fleeing the Civil War. In the zone of Nuzedo de Baixo lies the mining complex Nuzedo / Ervedosa. These pit mines, which some were already exploited since the Arab occupation, or even since the Bronze Age, operated until 1969, when the British owners abandoned them.Mining brought great development to this region and made that many people of different cultures stayed here. Thus, came a mixture, which made that the people of these lands have very distinct facial features than the areas further north.There are no indications of ancient Vale das Fontes, but there are references on Nuzedo in the Inquisition of 1258.Both Vale das Fontes and the villages belonging to it are part of the municipality of Vinhais since the end of the twelfth century.Heraldry* Coat of Arms: Red shield, three sources lined up in a band, under a silver knife and a golden palm, on top of a golden wicker hamper. Silver mural crown with three towers. White listel with caption in black: VALE DAS FONTES.* Flag: yellow. Gold and red cord and tassels. Golden rod and spear.Festivals and Fairsdas Fontesdas Fontesdas Fontesru:--das Fontes
2615837
MasPar
Image:MasPar GSFC.jpg|thumb|MasPar at NASA/GSFCMasPar Computer Corporation was a minisupercomputer vendor that was founded in 1987 by Kalb. The company was based in California.While Kalb was the Vice-President of DECs VLSI chip-building division, some researchers in that division were building a supercomputer based on the MPP (massively parallel processor) supercomputer. The DEC researchers enhanced the architecture by:* making the processor elements to be 4-bit instead of 1-bit* increasing the connectivity of each processor element to 8 neighbors from 4.* adding a global interconnect for all of the processing elements, which was a triple-redundant switch which was easier to implement than a full switch.After Digital decided not to commercialize the research project, Kalb decided to start a company to sell this minisupercomputer. In 1990, the first generation product MP-1 was delivered. In 1992, the follow-on MP-2 was shipped. The company shipped more than 200 systems. Samples of MasPar MPs, from the NASA Space Flight Center, are in storage at the History Museum.Maspar offered a family of SIMD machines, second sourced by DEC. The processor units are proprietary.  There was no MP-3.  MasPar exited the computer hardware business in June 1996, halting all hardware development and transforming itself into a new mining software company called Software. In 1999, Neovista was acquired by Software. HardwareMasPar is unique in being a manufacturer of SIMD supercomputers (as opposed to vector machines). In this approach, a collection of ALUs listen to a program broadcast from a central source. The ALUs can do their own data fetch, but are all under control of a central Array Control Unit. There is a central clock. The emphasis is on communications efficiency, and low latency. The MasPar architecture is designed to scale, and balance processing, memory, and communication.Maspar uses a custom CMOS chip, the MP-2 PE, designed in-house, and fabricated by various vendors such as HP or TI.The Array Control Unit (ACU) handles instruction fetch. It is a architecture. The MasPar architecture is Harvard in a broad sense. The ACU implements a microcoded instruction fetch, but achieves a RISC-like 1 instruction per clock. The Arithmetic units, ALUs with data fetch capability, are implemented 32 to a chip. Each ALU is connected in a nearest neighbor fashion to 8 others. The edge connections are brought off-chip. In this scheme, the perimeters can be toroid-wrapped. Up to 16,384 units can be connected within the confines of a cabinet. A global router, essentially a cross-bar switch, provides external I/O to the processor array.The MP-2 PE chip contains 32 processor elements, each a full 32-bit ALU with floating point, registers, and a shifter. Only the instruction fetch feature is removed, and placed in the ACU. The PE design is literally replicated 32 times on the chip. The chip is designed to interface to DRAM, to other processor array chips, and to communication router chips.Each ALU, called a PE slice, contains sixty four 32 bit registers that are used for both integer and floating point. The registers are, interestingly, bit and byte addressable. The floating point unit handles precision and precision arithmetic on IEEE format numbers. Each PE slice contains two registers for data memory address, and the data. Each PE also has two one-bit serial ports, one for inbound and one for outbound communication to its nearest neighbor. The direction of communication is controlled globally. The PEs also have inbound and outbound paths to a global router for I/O. A broadcast port allows a single instance of data to be promoted to parallel data. Alternately, global data can be or-ed to a scalar result.The serial links support 1 Mbyte/s bit-serial communication that allows coordinated register-register communication between processors. Each processor has its own local memory, implemented in DRAM. No internal memory is included on the processors. Microcoded instruction decode is used.The 32 PEs on a chip are clustered into two groups sharing a common memory interface, or M-machine, for access. A global scoreboard keeps track of memory and register usage. The path to memory is 16 bits wide. Both big and little endian formats are supported. Each processor has its own 64 Kbyte of memory. Both direct and indirect data memory addressing are supported.The chip is implemented in 1.0-micrometre, two-level, metal CMOS, dissipates 0.8 watt, and is packaged in a 208-pin PQFP. A relatively low clock rate of 12.5 MHz is used.The Maspar machines are front ended by a host machine, usually a VAX. They are accessed by extensions to Fortran and C. Full IEEE single- and double-precision floating point are supported.There is no cache for the ALUs. Cache is not required, due to the memory interface operating at commensurate speed with the ALU data accesses.The ALUs do not implement management for data memory. The ACU uses demand paged memory for the instruction memory.Business HistoryMasPar along with NCUBE criticized the open government support, by DARPA, of competitors Intel for their hypercube Personal SuperComputers (iPSC) and the Thinking Machines Machine on the pages of Datamation.See also* MPP* DAP* Machines CorporationExternal links*Ian Kaplans history of venture capitalru:MasPar
2621093
Egremont,_Cumbria
Egremont is a town and parish in the Borough of Copeland in Cumbria, England,  south of Whitehaven and on the Ehen. The town, which lies at the foot of Uldale Valley and Dent Fell, was historically within Cumberland and has a long industrial heritage including dyeing, weaving and iron ore mining. It had a population of 7,444 in 2001.(Office for National Statistics : Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts : Copeland Retrieved 2 June 2010)The towns layout today is much the same as at the time of de Lucy around 1200 with its wide Main Street opening out into the market place. The remains of the Norman castle, built in the 12th century, are situated at the southern end of Main Street near the market place. Egremont was granted a charter for a market and annual fair by King Henry III in 1266.(British History Online; Magna Britannia vol 4) The resulting annual Crab Fair now hosts the World Gurning Championships.(World Gurning Contest on whitehaven.org)The modern economy is built on services, media and tourism, together with nuclear industry at Sellafield. Economy Manufacturing industries have declined but service, new media and tourism industries have taken their place.Egremonts Florence Mine was (until 2008) the last working deep iron ore mine left in Western Europe and produced ore, products for the cosmetics industry and high quality haematite for jewellery.() Florence Mine can be found just south of Egremont town. A large local employer is the nuclear site at nearby Sellafield. The last few years have seen the running down of the nuclear power industry and the growth of the decommissioning industry.TransportEgremont formerly had a station on the Cleator and Egremont Railway, but it closed in 1947.Bus services 6 and X6 link Egremont to Seascale, Gosforth and towns south of Egremont. There are many other bus services that link to Whitehaven and Workington (30, 30A, 22 and 22A). The A595 bypasses Egremont, which gives strong links to Sellafield to the South and to the North, Whitehaven and Workington.(http://www.stagecoachbus.com/timetables/Service6X6from31August2008.pdf)TourismEgremont has many unique and interesting places for visitors to enjoy, including Castle, Florence Mine, Hartleys Ice Cream, Lowes Court Gallery, various walks, Clints Quarry (SSSI) and cycle paths.Community and cultureEgremont has a castle, several churches, two supermarkets, and a market selling a variety of goods held every Friday.It has had a brass band since 1904. The band aims to promote brass band music in the local area.(Egremont Town Band)The town has one secondary school, Lakes Academy, and four primary schools, which are Bookwell, Orgill and Thornhill Primary Schools, plus St Bridgets Catholic Primary School.(http://search.bbc.co.uk/search?scopeschoolsearch&tabprimary&qegremont&x19&y11 BBC: School league tables)It has an active public and community arts programme, called Creative Egremont.(http://www.creative-egremont.org/)Egremont also has a dedicated town freesheet, published by Egremont & District Labour Party and delivered to thousands of addresses in the town several times a year. The paper is financed by the Copeland Constituency Labour Party,(Copeland Constituency Labour Party 2003 accounts showing the financing of the newspaper) and its treasurer is David Southward MBE.(Members interests-shows David  Southward MBE as Treasurer of Egremont Today)Crab FairEgremonts Crab Fair is held on the third Saturday in September annually, and features unusual events - such as the world-famous gurning and greasy pole climbing. This fair is a major local event, with the towns high street being closed to normal traffic for street dancing and a parade, while sports such as Cumberland & Westmorland Wrestling are held on ground nearby.(http://www.egremontcrabfair.com/2009%20Crab%20Fair%20schedule%2015%20Aug%20Final.pdf 2009 Crab Fair schedule) The fairs origins go back to 1267, and it is claimed to be one of the oldest fairs in the world.(http://www.egremontcrabfair.com/)(http://gouk.about.com/od/whatsoninseptember/qt/gurningegremont.htm) History  History of the town Egremont pre-dates the Norman conquest of England. The Danes first established a fort on the site of Egremont castle around the end of the first millennium AD.In about 1300, the town was established much as it is seen today, surrounded by agricultural lands. In 1322, Robert Bruce attacked the town, causing a huge death toll. For the next 100 years or so an uneasy peace followed and the castle fell into ruins. In 1565, a stone bridge was built over the river Ehen to access the town, which was now smaller because of frequent Scottish raids. Little changed for a century, until new stone buildings appeared on the Main Street, probably built with stone from the castle. In 1683, Benn and his heirs were given land with the provision that they rebuild the stone bridge and maintain it for ever. In 1748, another bridge was built at Briscoe Mill at a cost of 28-15-0d, paid for by John Pearson, a local hatter. Soon Egremont began to service the Port of Whitehaven and in 1830, iron ore was mined over several sites. Over the next 60 years new schools, churches and the Town Hall were built. New housing estates were also built to accommodate the growing town, with many old parts of the town being demolished in 1968.In 1964, School was built, the first School to be built in the British Isles. In 1970, there was a large increase in workers moving into the town to work on the new nuclear site.In 1990, the Egremont by-pass was opened. Industrial history In bygone days, dyeing and weaving were traditional industries based around the River Ehen. ore mining and quarrying has been established in Egremont for more than 800 years. Industrial mining of iron ore started around 1830 with many mines being opened, and continues to this day.Around the early 17th century, agricultural lime was mined at Clints Quarry, with more heavy duty mining being undertaken to supply the iron and ore industry in the mid 19th century, finally ending in 1930. Clints Quarry (now a of Special Scientific Interest) can be found just north of Egremont town. In 1950, Rowntrees built a chocolate crumb factory near Christie Bridge and the nuclear industry became established at Sellafield. The Rowntrees site has become a new housing estate, York Place, which is located at the northern end of Main Street. The Sellafield site (now Sellafield Limited) is still operating while undergoing major change. History of the Barony of Copeland (or Egremont) When Rufus extended Norman rule into Cumbria in around 1092,(For details, see Sharpe, Norman Rule in Cumbria, pp. 368.) control of the area was given to Taillebois, who was married to of Bolingbroke, heiress of extensive lands in Lincolnshire. When Ivo died in 1094, this authority passed to Lucys second husband Roger fitz Gerold de Roumare, who survived for only two more years, then to her third husband Ranulph de Briquessart (Ranulph le Meschines). On his becoming the of Chester, his estates were returned to the Crown towards paying for the earldom. Around 1120, Henry I gave the Barony of Copeland to Ranulphs brother le Meschines who made his home at Egremont and began to build the castle, which took approximately 150 years to complete. The Barony was inherited by Williams son Ranulph le Meschines. With Ranulph having no male heir, the Barony passed to his sister Alice, who married Fitzduncan; they had a child who, after his death, became known as the Boy of Egremont; again, with no living male heir, William Fitzduncans estates passed to his three daughters Annabel, Cecily and Alice. The estates passed down to Annabels son de Lucy. Richards two daughters married two brothers of the de Multon family, Alice (now called de Morville) married Alan de Multon and Annabel (also now called de Morville) married Lambert de Multon. Annabel and Lambert de Multon inherited the Barony of Copeland and again, the castle had a lord in residence.Around 1205, the tale of Grunwilda was told; she was the wife of Richard de Lucy and was killed by a wolf on a hunting trip; this tale is recounted in the poem The Woeful Chase. Again leaving no male heir, Richard died and the superstition began that no male heir should inherit Egremont Castle because of the conduct of the forefathers. Egremont was granted its royal charter by Henry III in 1267.When the last male Multon died in 1335, one of the co-heiresses married Thomas Lucy, grandson of Thomas Multon. Anthony, the last Lord Lucy, died in 1369, and the lands passed to his brother-in-law Percy, 1st Earl of Northumberland, staying with the Percy family and its successors ever since.( The present lord is John Max Henry Scawen Wyndham, Egremont and Leconfield, who lives in the family home, one of the earliest Percy possessions: House in Sussex. The dowager Lady Egremont, Pamela, lives at Castle.ShootingsOn 2 June 2010, the area became the centre of a search after a gunman ran amok in Cumbria. Derrick Bird, a 52-year-old local driver, is known to have killed at least 12 people and two of them are reported to have been shot in Egremont.()Notable residents* Former Bites front man Dunnery was born and brought up in Egremont, as were Bobby Dalton (drums) and Richard Nolan (bass). Franciss late brother, Barry, also from Egremont () was also a guitarist and was part of the lineup of seventies bands Necromandus and Violinski.* Hodgson, the 1930s league all-time-great forward for Swinton, Cumberland and Britain was born (1909) and bred in the town.*Purdham, international Rugby League player, was born in Egremont in 1980.*Henney, a football player in the National league for Barrow AFC, currently lives in the town.*Lindow Calderwood, lawyer & politician, was born and brought up in Egremont, where his father was a local doctor.(John Venn, Ernest Stewart Roberts, & Edward John Gross, Biographical history of Gonville and Caius college, vol. 4 (1912), p. 69 online)ReferencesExternal links*Visit Egremont - official Egremont information website*Virtual Egremont - website of the Egremont and Area Regeneration Partnership with listings, whats on, news, cycling and walking routes and links to Creative Egremont, the towns innovative cultural programme.*(Cumbria)nl:Egremonti Cumbria(Kumbria)ro:Egremont
2626574
Hazelwood_Power_Station
Hazelwood Power Station, in the Valley, Victoria, Australia is a brown coal fueled base-load power station built between 1964 and 1971.() The power station is of 1,600 megawatt (1,470 net) capacity, and supplies up to 25% of Victorias base load electricity and more than 5% of Australias total energy demand. Hazelwood produces 2.8% of Australias CO2 emissions and 0.057% of World emissions. The station was listed as the least carbon efficient power station in the OECD in a 2005 report by WWF Australia.(Hazelwood tops international list of dirty power stations)International Power purchased Hazelwood from the State Government in 1996 with a 40 year life. The Bracks Labor Government subsequently approved an environmental effects statement in 2005 that allowed Hazelwood to move a road and a river to access thecoal allocated to Hazelwood at the time of sale. There is an estimated 500 years of easily accessed coal reserves remaining in Victorias Latrobe Valley.Hazelwood directly employs 540 people and at least another (full-time) 300 contractors, with hundreds more employed during major outages.In late 2008, the owners of Hazelwood, International Power, said the financial viability of the power station would be in question under an Emissions Trading Scheme (ETS), unless the company received significant compensation.(ABC News, Thu 21 May 2009 2:28pm AEST)HistoryDevelopment of the brown coal reserves at Morwell were started by the Electricity Commission of Victoria (SECV) in 1949 as the Morwell Project, which included the Morwell open cut mine, and the Morwell briquette works.() The Interconnecting Railway linked the power station and briquette works to the  Yallourn open cut mine until 1993.()Hazelwood Power Station was approved in 1959, and was to consist of six 200 MW generating units, giving a total of 1,200 MW of generating capacity. The first unit was to enter service in 1964, and the sixth in 1971. Growing electricity demand saw a review carried out by the SECV in 1963, with commissioning of the generating units moved forward to 1969. Additional capacity was provided when in 1965 two additional generating units at Hazelwood were approved, to be commissioned in 1970 and 1971 respectively.(State Electricity Commission of Victoria: Report on proposed extensions to the Hazelwood and Yallourn Power Stations - 24 February 1965)PrivatisationHazelwood Power Station and associated mine were privatised by the Kennett government in 1996. It was sold for $2.35 billion, and it operates as International Power Hazelwood (IPRH), an Australian public company, which was owned by UK company, International Power plc (91.8% share) and the Commonwealth Bank Group (the remaining 8.2%). The business office is near Morwell, 150 kilometres east of Melbourne. Prior to January 2003, International Power Hazelwood was known as Hazelwood Power.Privatisation resulted in new capital investment, with $800 million invested in Hazelwood since 1996, such as replacement of boilers, rotors, turbines and the completion of an $85 million project to reduce dust emissions by 80%. If Hazelwood had not been sold to private interests, activist groups say the SEC (State Electricity Commission) would have shut the station down in 2005.(http://www.futureenergy.org/infopolluting.html)Coal supplyHazelwood relies on brown coal deposits from the nearby Morwell open cut mine. In 2003, 17.2 million tonnes of coal was excavated by International Power Hazelwood for use by the plant which generated 12,000 gigawatt-hours. The company supplied a further 1.6 million tonnes of coal to Brix Australia.EES Approvalright|thumb|Hazelwood Power Station seen at nightBefore privatisation the power station was due to be decommissioned by the SECV by 2005, as had older plants at Newport and Yallourn. However Hazelwood had its mining licence realigned by the Victorian Government along with EES approvals to move a river and a road on 6 September 2005. This agreement ensures security of coal supply to the plant until at least 2030 by allowing access to 43 million tonnes of brown coal deposits in a realignment of Hazelwoods mining licence boundaries that were originally set in 1996.  Hazelwood returned over 160 million tonnes of coal to the State Government as part of the agreement. The agreement requires Hazelwood to reduce its estimated emissions by 34 million tonnes and caps its total greenhouse output at 445 million tonnes of carbon dioxide over its life, after which point it may be made to cease operation. However credits for investment in renewable energy and low emission technology will allow the business to operate within the cap and extend its life. Hazelwoods West Field development involved completing a new 7.5 km section of the Highway, replacing over ten kilometres of the River from an old concrete pipe into a natural open channel riverine setting, and acquiring privately owned land which was earmarked for future coal supply. Victoria, Greenpeace and Conservation Foundation opposed the development approvals, while business groups such as Minerals Council of Australia, VECCI, Aust Industry Group and Institute of Public Affairs welcomed the Governments decision.Bio-Algae trialA trial algae photobioreactor plant was established at Hazelwood in the early 2000s by Energetix, a division of the Smorgon Group. The plant houses algae that feed on emissions from the smoke stacks, which are then harvested and turned into biofuels.  The technology Hazelwood is using was developed at MIT and is licensed from Greenfuels.  The trial was successful and has now concluded.  Commercial application of the technology could see over 1000 hectares of photobioreactors be built which will turn 5% of Hazelwoods emissions into biofuels.(The Age: Trial plant to transform emissions into biofuels)DecommissionThe power station would not have had access to its purchased coal from 2009 unless approvals to move road and river infrastructure were granted under the 2005 West Field EES process. The Labor Government approved the EES in 2005 so IPRH could access its coal reserves and operate its business until 2031.( )(http://www.abc.net.au/cgi-bin/common/printfriendly.pl?http://www.abc.net.au/worldtoday/content/2005/s1354535.htm) However, there is major support for the decommission of the facility.(http://www.naturaledgeproject.net/Documents/REPLACINGHAZELWOODWITHALTERNATIVESfinal1a.pdf)Environmental impactsImage:Hazelwood Power Station ESP.jpg|thumb|right|One of the generators is coming back online, resulting in a temporary plume of visible smoke due to the precipitators being offline for the duration of the start-up; the CO2 emissions are normally invisible (42 tonnes per minute at full production). CO2 emissionsThe station was listed as the least carbon efficient power station in the OECD nations in a 2005 report by WWF Australia. The WWF reported that the power station produced 1.58 tonnes of CO2 per megawatt-hour of electricity generated in 2004 (official result was 1.55), which was a significant reduction of 6.6% from the 1996 levels of 1.66 Mt/TWh when the plant was privatised.  This CO2 per megawatt-hour reduction is now over 10% based on performance to 2009.(Hazelwood Myths & Facts (format) Fact sheet released by Power. Retrieved 17 November 2010. (an alternate version: http://www.ipplc.com.au/uploads/2010/09/fs-Hazelwood-Myth-Facts.pdf)) With a 60% increase in power generation since 1996, Hazelwood now averages up to 16.0 million tonnes of dioxide each year (the second highest emitter in the Latrobe Valley), which is 3 % of Australias total carbon dioxide emissions, and 9 % of Australias total CO2 from electricity generation.(Green groups to fight Hazelwood new coal application)Australias biggest carbon capture pilot plant, and one of the largest of its type in the world,(http://www.ipplc.com.au/news/hazelwood-carbon-capture-fact-sheet/)has been built at Hazelwood capturing up to 25 tonnes, or 0.05%, of CO2 per day.Water usage1.31 megalitres of water was consumed per gigawatt hour of power generated in 2005.() Cooling water for the power station is supplied by the Hazelwood Pondage, built for this purpose in the 1960s. The pondage is supplied with water from the Moondarra Reservoir and runoff pumped from the adjacent mine.  At the mine, water is sprayed onto the coal to reduce the chance of fire and to suppress dust.(Public access to the pondage is permitted for sailing, boating and other recreational water sports. Cichlids and other tropical fish that were released into the lake by the public have established populations, including Convict cichlids (nigrofasciatus) and the African cichlid spotted tilapia (mariae). Other fish include carp, goldfish (Carassius auratus), Gambusia (holbrooki), and the native short-finned eel (australis) and Australian smelt (semoni). Pollutants In a 2007-2008 report, the Pollutant Inventory rated the power stations dioxins and furans as high 100, acid as high 87, of nitrogen as medium 57, matter 2.5 m as low 21, and boron & compounds as low 15.(http://www.npi.gov.au/data/overview/reports/vic-facility-all.html Substance emission details - reporting facilities: Victoria. Accessed 10 July 2010)2005-2006 NPI data showed that Hazelwood releases 100,000 kg of boron and compounds into the air and 5,200 kg into water. Also released into the air: 7,700,000 kg hydrochloric acid, 27,000,000 kg of of nitrogen, 2,900,000 kg of matter 10 m, and 0.015 kg of polychlorinated dioxins and furans.Many pollutants are not measured.(http://www.aboutcarbon.com.au/fossil-fuels/latrobe-valley ALL IS NOT WELL IN THE VALLEY, About Carbon website, Accessed: 16 July 2010.) Asbestos The rate of mesothelioma among power industry workers was found to be seven times the national average. (Victorian State Government study, 2001). Latrobe Valley power industry workers die 15 years younger than the national average.(http://www.wsws.org/articles/2001/mar2001/asb-m20.shtml Accessed: 16 July 2010.)The power stations of the LaTrobe Valley used asbestos widely in their construction. The substance was banned in Victoria in 2003. However, its estimated that 146,000 employees and contractors, who worked in SEC plants from 1921 to the 1980s, were exposed to it. Between 1976 and 2008, $52.6 million has been paid to former SEC employees by the State Government insurance authority, and a further $369 million is expected to be paid out by the Victorian Managed Insurance Authority to former employees.(http://www.theage.com.au/national/why-the-valley-needs-to-hear-sorry-20080607-2n9x.html Why the Valley needs to hear sorry. CARMEL EGAN. 8 June 2008. Accessed: 16 July 2010)In June 2010, the EPA confirmed it was investigating reports asbestos could be in one of Hazelwood Power Stations smoke stacks. A former worker claims to have lost his job after speaking out about asbestos at a health and safety meeting. Speaking to The Express (Fairfax paper) he said, It is not just in the stacks, its everywhere, the place is riddled with it, Hazelwood has no duty of care to its workers or the public. Another worker, trained in asbestos identification, said for years Hazelwood management had ignored workers concerns. International Power Hazelwood spokesperson Neil Lawson has responded, It is well documented that there is still an amount of contained asbestos material which is being progressively and safely removed by specialised licensed contractors during major plant outages and maintenance activities. (http://www.latrobevalleyexpress.com.au/news/local/news/general/asbestos-probe/1857341.aspx?storypage0 Asbestos probe. BY EBONNIE LORD. 14 Jun 2010 08:59 AM. Accessed: 16 July 2010.)  The same newspaper subsequently reported comments by the EPA that the Hazelwood business had no case to answer and that asbestos fibres were not present in smokestacks.Criticisms and responsesThe Conservation Foundation have put the $400 million 2005 Hazelwood expansion(Hazelwood extension gets the green light The Age, 7 September 2005) in context by comparing it to Victorias energy efficient homes standard, which is expected to save 200,000 tonnes of greenhouse gases per annum. The ACF reason that Hazelwoods operations cancel out that benefit every four days. ACF Executive director Henry has said he would follow formal objections with legal action to prevent the grant of new coal to IPRH. Most of the West Field coal reserves were allocated to Hazelwood in 1996 in the privatisation process.Victoria have pushed for alternative baseload generation through: energy, energy, energy, new cycle gas fired generation plants, new cogeneration facilities, or increased imports of baseload electricity from interstate. In January 2005, the Energy Future Group together with Environment Victoria released the report Toward Victorias Clean Energy Future, a plan to cut Victorias Greenhouse gas emissions from electricity by 2010. It largely focused on cleaner alternatives to Hazelwood, and warned that continued support of coal-fired power development would lock the State into CO2 emissions that would dwarf any current proposed measures for reducing emissions.Greenpeace has pushed for a target of 20 % clean energy for Victoria by 2020, allowing Hazelwood to be retired, and to invigorate the La Trobe Valley as a clean energy hub.In June 2009, an anonymous letter purporting to come from the US-based Liberation Front was sent to the home of the CEO of the power station, Graeme York. The letter threatened to harm property, but did not threaten physical harm against any individuals or animals, despite being portrayed as such in commercial media.(ABC News, Mon 15 Jun 2009 9:05am AEST) ELF media spokesperson Jason Crawford defended the letter, but was unable to confirm that it had been sent by his organisation.(http://blogs.abc.net.au/victoria/2009/06/elf-and-the-hazelwood-letter.html) The ELF letter was publicly condemned by Greenpeace, whose activists had engaged in nonviolent direct action at the plant six weeks earlier.()In late 2009, in response to the Switch Off HazelwoodSwitch on Renewables protests, the state of Victoria introduced penalties of one years imprisonment for trespass, and two years imprisonment for damaging, interfering, tampering, or attaching something to electricity infrastructure. This was legislated in the Electricity Industry Amendment (Critical Infrastructure) Act 2009 (Vic). The legislation has been criticised for criminalising non-violent civil disobedience, and has been compared to the lockdown powers of the Major Events Act 2009, which has been reportedly used to intimidate and disperse peaceful protesters in NSW.(A stifling climate: targeting social movements and policing protests. Dissent 32. Autumn/Winter 2010. Zo Hutchinson and Holly Creenaune.)Protest and civil disobedience at Hazelwood;11 August 2005:Around 50 student environmentalists and Greenpeace volunteers unfurled a Quit Coal banner outside the plant while 12 activists occupied the brown coal pit, with some locking themselves to coal dredging equipment.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/australia/vic/gippsland/200508/s1435683.htm);6 November 2008:A group of 7 people protesting against Australias inaction on climate change walked onto the site of the Hazelwood power station and stopped the conveyor belts which carry coal from the mine to the power station itself.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2008/11/06/2411555.htm?sectionbusiness);28 March 2009:A group of around 30 people took part in a rally at the power station ahead of the 2009 Hour. Two protesters chained themselves to a conveyor belt, briefly disrupting the supply of coal between the Hazelwood mine and the power plant. Three people were charged by Victoria Police for unspecified reasons.(ABC News);21 May 2009:14 Greenpeace members entered the site and temporarily shut down coal production after chaining themselves to an excavator from 7am onwards. All seven were later charged by Victoria Police.(September 2009 rally;13 September 2009thumb|right|500 people symbollically decommissioned the developed worlds dirtiest power station at the Switch off coal, switch on renewables event in September 2009.:A large mass civil disobedience rally, the largest of its kind at any Australian power station, was undertaken by a network of organisations under the banner Switch Off Hazelwood. Around 500 people participated, with many camping nearby on the previous night.() The rally was supported by organisations and groups including the Conservation Foundation, Victoria and the Greens.(The Age, 12 September 2009) Many of the participants were families.(  In the week before the rally, a community meeting entitled Clean energy or coal: What future for Latrobe jobs? was held in the nearby town of Morwell.(http://indymedia.org.au/morwell-meeting-clean-energy-or-coal):Organisers liased with Victoria police prior to and during the demonstration and publicly declared intentions to undertake peaceful civil disobedience by entering the grounds of the power station to place symbolic decommission notices on the plant building. The organisers also distributed guidelines asking participants to use peaceful protest tactics and held a number of trainings on disobedience and nonviolence prior to the event.(http://www.switchoffhazelwood.org):Police responded by installing a temporary perimeter fence around the plant, with police helicopters and mounted police patrolling the site on Saturday evening. On the Sunday, police contingencies included a large number of officers on foot deployed within the perimeter fence. Many were issued with handheld video recorders and digital cameras and filmed people attending the rally. Police also deployed personnel in dingies in adjacent pondage lakes.:The rally began at 11am with speeches from Greens Senator Scott Ludlam, Dave Sweeney from the Australian Conservation Foundation, author David Spratt and Melbourne based paediatrician Merryn Redenbach, amongst others, with several speakers stressing that protesters had no argument with police or plant workers and emphasising the organising groups calls for new wind turbine, solar water and insulation manufacturing capacity to be developed in the Latrobe valley.(http://www.switchoffhazelwood.org/justtransition):The group then marched to the front of the power station, where several participants, including some dressed in mock Carbon Police outfits, climbed fencing in an attempt to issue a Community Decommission Order to the power station.(http://www.crikey.com.au/2009/09/14/hazelwood-protest-included-ordinary-people-not-just-guys-in-wombat-suits/):Part of the crowd advanced on the temporary fencing and some participants and police clashed. 22 people were arrested during the rally, many for trespassing after climbing the temporary fence. One person was also charged with assault after a police officer was allegedly thrown backwards while trying to stop a protester who was running towards the plant gates after scaling a temporary fence.() It is unknown how many protesters will be officially charged.(http://au.news.yahoo.com/a/-/latest/6027963/police-arrest-vic-power-plant-protesters/)(ABC News):Supporters of the protest said that nonviolent direct action and civil disobedience was necessary because other avenues to achieve change, such as petitions, letters, rallies and community meetings, had been explored and exhausted.((http://solveclimate.com/blog/20090911/aussie-activists-target-world-s-most-polluting-coal-plant) Environment groups had also lodged application to have the impact of greenhouse gas emissions considered in the Environmental Effects Statement which approved the expansion of Hazelwoods coal fields in 2005.(http://blogs.unimelb.edu.au/peel_climatechange/page/2/):The rally was featured in the main group of lead items on every Victorian television and radio news broadcast that same evening, and in Newspapers the following morning.October 2010 rallyAnother rally took place at the station at 11am on 10 October 2010. Approximately 150 people attended, protesters were well behaved and there were no arrests.,(Valley Express, Monday 11 October 2010, Page 5) most travelling on the train from Melbourne.  The rally coincided with the International Day of Climate Action (10/10/2010). There were two training sessions held prior to the rally for participants in non-violent direct action, these occurred 18 September and 2 October at Trades Hall, Melbourne. In preparation for the rally, around 250 Police officers were stationed around the perimeter of the station. Authorities erected several kilometres of semi-permanent fencing in contrast to the previous years rally, before which only temporary fencing was erected. The march to the station began at 11am and upon reaching the stations grounds, participants heard speeches from several speakers including Greens Eastern Victorian upper house candidate Samantha Dunn and Beyond Zero Emissions Mark Ogge. The event was MCed by Rod Qantock.Following speeches, participants then built the largest ever human-made mock Solar Thermal plant.Carbon capture plantIn July 2009, International Power opened a carbon capture and storage demonstration plant at Hazelwood power station. The process takes emissions from the power station smoke stacks, extracts  and uses a chemical process to turn it into calcium carbonate. The resulting solid can then be stored above ground or sold to industry. This process will capture 25 tonnes or 0.05% of daily emissions from the plant.(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2009/07/08/2620053.htm)See also* of least carbon efficient power stationsReferencesExternal links*HPS at Environment Victoria*Official Site*Hazelwood, CARMA database entry*Images of the September 2009 RallyHazelwoodkullkraftverk
2628163
Lake_Tahoe_Basin_Management_Unit
right|thumb|270px|A small pond in the Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit.The Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit is a unique Sierra Nevada geologic basin of federally managed land, which is interspersed with a patchwork private and state managed public land.  The Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit (LTBMU) straddles the state borders of California and Nevada, encompassing approximately 191,000 acres (773 km) of National Forest system lands, it ranges in altitude above sea level from 6,225 feet at lake level to 10,881 feet at Freel Peak, overlooking the City of Lake Tahoe, California.The Forest Service established the Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit in 1973.  The name of the Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit reflects a unique sort of National Forest, as unique as the resources of the Basin. Goals The Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit (LTBMU) is responsible for the conservation, preservation and restoration of the Tahoe watershed ecosystem within National Forest Lands. Projects and programs also include habitat, fire management, and urban lot management. Additionally the LTBMU provides and maintains high quality recreational opportunities for millions of visitors and residents annually.Compared to other National Forest Lands the LTBMU is small, yet it is the Tahoe Basins largest land manager, responsible for 78% of basin lands. As such the Forest Service has the largest single role in ecosystem and watershed management and protection. The LTBMU is a part of National Forest System Lands, yet is managed somewhat differently than other National Forests.  Many common forest activities such as mining, grazing or timber harvesting are either not a part of LTBMU management or play a very small role. Since the lake is so dependent on all that happens around it, LTBMU programs manage the whole of the basin as a complete inter-dependent system.The LTBMU is a unique inter-mix of forest and urban communities, presenting challenges and complexities few other National Forests experience. Since its establishment in 1973, the LTBMU has become a pioneer and leader in the science of forest and ecosystem management. The work of the Forest Service supports and is supported by many partners. Other federal, state and local agencies are working together in the effort to face challenges, conserve and restore natural and cultural resources, and enhance the recreational values of the Lake Tahoe Basin.HistoryIn 1899 when President McKinley created the Lake Tahoe Forest Reserve becoming the core of later National Forest Lands in the Tahoe Basin. Three separate forests were developed out of the reserve, the Tahoe, Eldorado and Toiyabe National Forests. Each of these forests extended into the basin and managed separate sections.In 1973, the LTBMU was created from basin portions of the three existing National Forests, forming a single management unit.  This unification provided the focus needed for the basin, and more effective management of its watershed, ecological and recreational values. The name Lake Tahoe Basin Management Unit was originally a temporary one, but after three decades, the name remains. See also * Tahoe External links *Official government site
2632792
Scapegoat_Wilderness
The Scapegoat Wilderness consists of 239,936 acres (971 km) spread across three different National Forests in the state of Montana. Created by an act of Congress in 1972, the wilderness is located in Lewis and Clark, Helena and National Forests. The Scapegoat Wilderness is a part of the 1.5 million acre (6,070 km) Marshall Wilderness Complex as it shares a boundary with the Marshall Wilderness, which in turn is connected to the Bear Wilderness further north.Wilderness Areas do not allow motorized or mechanized vehicles, including bicycles. Although camping and fishing are allowed with proper permit, no roads or buildings are constructed and there is also no logging or mining, in compliance with the 1964 Act. Wilderness areas within National Forests and of Land Management areas also allow hunting in season.The Divide creates the western boundary of the wilderness. Rising as much as   in places, the Wall, a portion of the expansive Mountain Front, stretches a distance of   through the wilderness. With elevations between   or more above sea level, the wilderness lies just west of the Plains, and from the higher mountaintops the views to the east extend for  . The highest peak in the wilderness is Red Mountain . left|250px|thumb|Scapegoat WildernessWith most of the wilderness heavily forested in conifers, the primary tree species found include Spruce, pine, pine and fir. The wolf and grizzly call the wilderness home as do black bears, moose, elk, goats, sheep and deer. Rare sightings of wolverine and lions are possible along with eagles, falcons, swans and pelicans. Eight species of fish inhabit the lakes and streams with trout and Pike being the most common game fish.14 lakes are located in the wilderness as well as the headwaters of the Blackfoot River.Considered an excellent backpacking region, there are over   of trails which generally follow the numerous streams and rivers. Pack trips on horseback are also a popular mode of travel. Located about   northeast of Montana, the best access is from forest service roads off Highway 287 and Montana highways 200 and 83.See also*Wilderness AssociationExternal links* * * 
2635811
Ngomongo_Villages
Ngomongo Villages is a well-known sustainable eco-cultural tourist village located in Mombasa, Kenya.Once a sun baked, arid, barren and rocky base of a former limestone mine, the floor of this quarry was barely five feet above the slightly salty water table. Dr. Gikandi, a local medical doctor started single handedly to reclaim this quarry by planting  of eighty different indigenous trees; later followed the easier to grow casuarina trees. Public awareness to tree planting was raised by inviting the public to join in the reclamation process.To date, ngomongo is fanning out its reclamation exercises to the surrounding farms by recruiting the local farmers into planting trees to mark out their farm borders. The ultimate plan is to fan out the success locally, regionally and then nationally.Reclamation of quarry siteThe Ngomongo quarry in 1991 was a neglected wasteland of approximately . This vast urban eyesore resulted from coral limestone mining.Inspired by a previously successful project, Park initiated by Dr. Haller in Bamburi Beach, Dr. Gikandi applied Hallers approach to rehabilitate the barren quarry. It was a hazard to the neighbours as it acted as a retreat for robbers.At around this time, the Mombasa municipal council  had earmarked  the  quarry  as the municipal refuse  dumping site. if carried out this would have contaminated the water table which lies only four feet below the quarry floor, and by extension the Ocean coastal and marine ecosystem.  The built up surrounding urban neighbourhood would have suffered air pollution from the decomposing dumped municipal refuse.Once reclamation work had started, he then involved individuals and the community in tree planting.  This was later followed by incorporation of tourism to ensure sustainability.Geography and climateThe quarry is located 10 km north of Mombasa Island, but within Mombasa municipality. It is about 600 m to 700 m inland of the Indian Ocean shoreline. The quarry floor lies about four feet above the water table, which interconnects with the seabed as is evident from the quarry well water level fluctuations that are coincidental with the ocean tides. The site is 4 south of the equator and 390 east of the meridian. It is excavated up to a depth of 12m and is in the coastal and marine tropical climate. Rain falls every month although not reliably, much of the rain falling during April - June period.  Average annual rainfall is about 1192 mm with a maximum of over 2056 mm. The number of rain days varies from 85130 except for a marked increase in 1997 due to the Nio weather conditions.The mean temperature is about 28.8 C in July and August. Average humidity varies too, with the lowest readings of 65% usually in February and 85% in May.The coastal region around Mombasa has two monsoon currents: the south east monsoon from May to the beginning of October and the northeast from November to March. Milestones overcome Quarry rehabilitation projectCorals usually live in colonies.  Each single animal excretes a skeleton of calcium carbonate, which cements with neighbor cell excretions, eventually forming a whole colonial build up of compacted constructions, which extend over wide areas.  Corals dont thrive in temperature below 20  c and depend on shallow seas for growth.  Once the living corals get dry from shifting sea levels, the whole coral structure dies and is then known as coral limestone rock. It is at this point that man excavates coral limestone for construction works.The arid and desolate Ngomongo quarry pit excavated to 12m was not conducive for plant growth. It had no hope of being spontaneously  inhabited by trees for  another ten  years.The reason for quarry rehabilitation was therefore to make it into a good hospitable land, with high utility to the people around, improve on the ecosystem, reduce its various hazards, and make it into a sustainable development.The total dissolved solid and the salinity of the ground water was studied for planning purposes.Casuarina  projectTree seedlings from  government forest stations were purchased and  transferred to the quarry.  The quarrys own small seed bank which  was established later with the help of  the community around the quarry, provided seeds  to set up a tree nursery.  Planted one meter apart initially, the casuarina were later thinned to two metres apart.The casuarina did very well and helped in breaking up the coral rock with their carpet like root system. Currently the casuarina trees are of average height of 10 m  and above provide a very good tree cover and  shade for the quarry floor.The dropping foliage of these trees is broken down  by microorganism and other small organisms like the millipede. The original millipede population was collected by hand by the neighbourhood community and introduced in large numbers into the quarry.  Millipedes feed on the fallen leaves (needles) thus breaking   them down to release nutrients. The forest leaf cover was continuously degraded adding much more humus to the ground, as the number of millipedes increased in this their promised land. Millipedes can reach up to a length of 12 cm, hide under the leaf foliage during the dry season, reappearing in large numbers during the rainy season. Tree species The casuarinas are famous for their prestigious timber, which is used in the construction industry.   The Neem tree is also doing very well, so are the Baobab tree, coconut, mango trees and the date palms, mvuli, muratina and others. The Neem tree (mwarobaini) is believed to be able to cure 40 diseases hence the name mwarobaini.  Akamba carvers use the logs for carving wood sculptures.  Its bark and leaves are used for treating fevers such as due to malaria and other ailments.  The leaves yield a nonsynthetic insecticide.  The small branches are used as disposable toothbrushes   The powdered bark of the tree is used for protection of maize granaries against weevils.    The Muratina tree spongy fruit is the traditional yeast for brewing traditional muratina brew for the Kikuyu and the Akamba ( this can be sipped and tasted at the Akamba village of Ngomongo villages) Mvuli is a sought for hard wood originally from Tanzania.  It is the best oak tree equivalent for furniture in  Africa. Plants and insects Ferns, mushrooms and other plants which require tree cover  and a lot of humus started appearing after just a few years in the forest.  At first only a few species were found  flourishing  but more species are now appearing, some  on branches, trunks  of dead wood and on the rock cliff faces.  Leaf shedding ants are useful in cutting leaves into small pieces.  The ants work day and night.  Their leaf shredding habit and their fungal cultivation are beneficial to the forest. These types of ants are many, an example being the weaver ants.  The termites are also in large numbers in our forest.  The termites feed on soft timber trunks, thus they are usually considered as pests, but they play a great role in reducing the dead wood in forests to  humus.Flora  #camara#oil#Hocra - ladies finger  (vegetable)  #Pumpkins  #Flamboyant tree  #Termanalia  #Eucalyptus  #almond  (fruit tree)  mkungu  #Acacia  #Bamboo  #Saman  #Guava  (fruit)  #Neem tree  (medicine)  #roots  #Bananas  #potatoes  #Sisal  #Coffee  #Algaroba  (origin Mexico)#Orange#Cassava  #Sweet potatoes  #Ananas - pineapple  #Cotton  #Cowpeas  #Paw paw#Millet#acacia#sycamorus / casuarinas forest#cane  #Euphobia#Sorghum#bamboo Wet lands Natural ponds were dug by an improvised homegrown hole and shovel. The shovel was made from an empty fifty gallon steel water storage tank whose designated shoveling edge on the tank open top was reinforced with a sharpened pick  up main leaf spring, welded on to this edge.With two men sitting on the plough or shovel to give it weight and anchorage, the donkeys would drag the plough or shovel.  This would be repeated many times until the lake was at least one meter deep below the water table. The depth of the three ponds is an average of one meter.  Crocodiles were introduced into one of the ponds that represent Lake Turkana in the village theme.  (Lake Turkana is in the northern part of Kenya.)The other pond represents in our village theme, lake Victoria that is on the Western side of Kenya.  Tilapia has been introduced into this lake.Large flocks of birds nest on and feed on these wet lands. These including king fishers, weaver birds, Egyptian geese etc. The bird sanctuary Within the quarry, a  bird sanctuary has local chicken, ostriches, geese and cranes.The daily feeding of birds at the bird sanctuary has attracted many wild birds like the Egyptian geese. These wild birds have established their breeding sites on the quarry rock out crops and most of them have made the quarry their home. There are now over 50 species of birds in the entire quarry. The birds help in seed dispersal as they feed on wild fruits and drop their droppings on other parts of the forest.Frequently identified species are:#Egyptian geese#Ostrich#Helmeted guinea fowls#Crested cranes#Tortoises#Black water tortoise#Quails#Local chicken#Peacock#Kingfisher#Weaverbirds#(bird) Farm gardens The quarry now has ten diverse rural Kenya villagers each with a niche of forest, displaying his true culture and  rural home replica.Among the things they display are huts, utensils, gardens and the crops they grow in their rural areas. The gardens  were made by  clearing patches of the new forest. Loosening the coral, then putting a 4 soil and manure cover on which various tribal unique crops are being cultivated. (See FAUNA above).The land, which was once a lifeless wasteland, now has a diversity of life. External links * NgomongoVillages* UNEP Article* Dubai Municipality Article* The Haller Foundation* Dr. Rene Hallers Work
2638035
Fitzpatrick_Wilderness
The Fitzpatrick Wilderness is located in National Forest in the state of Wyoming. The wilderness was originally known as the Glacier Primitive Area, but was redesignated a wilderness in 1976. Wilderness Areas do not allow motorized or mechanized vehicles, including bicycles. Although camping and fishing are allowed with proper permit, no roads or buildings are constructed and there is also no logging or mining, in compliance with the 1964 Act. Wilderness areas within National Forests and of Land Management areas also allow hunting in season.See also* of U.S. Wilderness AreasExternal links* * * Wilderness
2644614
List_of_University_of_Toronto_people
The following is a list of notable persons affiliated with the of Toronto, including alumni, chancellors, presidents, and current and former faculty members. AlumniTo avoid redundancy, alumni who hold or have held faculty positions in the University of Toronto are placed on this list of alumni, and do not appear on the list of faculty. Individuals are ordered by the year of their first degree from the university.For graduates of the Faculty of Arts and Science, college affiliations (if known) are indicated after degree years, with shorthands used for University College (U.C.), of Trinity College (Trin.), Victoria University (Vic.), of St. Michaels College (St.M.), College (Innis), New College (New), Knox College (Knox), Regis College (Regis), College (Wyc.), College (Wdw.) and College (Massey). Graduates from the universitys two satellite campuses are denoted with UTSC for of Toronto Scarborough and UTM for of Toronto Mississauga.GovernmentInternational*Des Vux() (B.A. 1858)  of Fiji, 188085; of Newfoundland, 188687; of Hong Kong, 188791*Gilbert Parker, 1st Baronet  British propagandaist and novelist; member of parliament in the British House of Commons for Gravesend, 190018*Hassanali() (LL.B. 1947)  2nd of Trinidad and Tobago, 198797*Vike-Freiberga (B.A. 1958, M.A. 1960)()*Giertych (Ph.D. 1962)()  Polish member of the Parliament, former Polish minister of education*Chao-shiuan (Ph.D. 1971)()  22nd of the Republic of China (Taiwan), former president of Tsing Hua University and Soochow University*P. Walters() (M.A. 1976)  Director of the House of National Drug Control Policy (colloquially Drug Czar), 200109Governors-General and Prime Ministers*Lyon Mackenzie King (B.A. 1895,LL.B. 1896, M.A. 1897)()  10th Minister of Canada*Meighen (B.A. 1896)()  9th Minister of Canada*Massey (B.A. 1910 U.C.)()  18th and first Canadian-born General of Canada, philanthropist *B. Pearson (B.A. 1919 Vic., professor of history)()  14th Minister of Canada*Clarkson (B.A. 1960 Trin.)  26th General of Canada *Martin (B.A. 1961 St.M., LL.B. 1965)  21st Minister of Canada*Harper (dropped out)  22nd Minister of CanadaSupreme Court judges*Douglas Armour (B.A. 1850)  Justice, 190203*Idington (LL.B. 1864)  Puisne Justice, 190527*Clements Killam (B.A. 1872)  Puisne Justice, 190305*Poore Duff (B.A. 1887, LL.B. 1889)  Puisne Justice, 190633, Chief Justice, 193344*Henderson Lamont (B.A. 1892, LL.B. 1893)  Puisne Justice, 192736*Hague Davis (B.A. 1907, M.A. 1909, LL.B. 1911)  Puisne Justice, 193544*Flett Spence (B.A. 1925)  Puisne Justice, 196378*Laskin (M.A. 1935)  Chief Justice, 197384*Pratte (LL.M. 1947)  Puisne Justice, 197779*Sopinka (B.A. 1955, LL.B. 1958)  Puisne Justice, 198897*C. Major (LL.B. 1957)  Puisne Justice, 19922005*Ian Corneil Binnie (LL.B. 1965)  Puisne Justice, 1998*LeBel (LL.M. 1966)  Puisne Justice, 2000*Abella (B.A. 1967, LL.B. 1970)  Puisne Justice, 2004Lieutenant-governors, premiers and mayors*Morison Gibson (B.A. 1863 U.C., LL.D. 1869)  9th Governor of Ontario*Mulock (B.A. 1863)  14th Governor of Ontario*Barclay McMurrich (B.A. 1863, M.A. 1864)  22nd of Toronto*John Macdonald (B.A. 1869)  8th of Manitoba*Aiken Howland (LL.B.)  31st of Toronto*Stewart (M.A.)  of Ottawa, 188788*Albert Manning Aikins (B.A. 1875)  9th Governor of Manitoba, founder of the Bar Association*W. A. G. Haultain (B.A. 1879)  1st of the Northwest Territories*Sifton (B.A. 1880 Vic.)  2nd of Alberta*Coatsworth (LL.B. 1886)  33rd of Toronto *William Short (LL.B.)  of Edmonton, 190104*Russ Deacon (B.A.Sc. 1891)  Mayor of Winnipeg, 191314*Alexander Bruce (M.B. 1892)  15th Governor of Ontario*W. MacKenzie (B.A. 1893)  of Edmonton, 18991901*Ferguson (B.A.)  9th of Ontario*Stewart Henry (B.A., LL.B.)  10th of Ontario*Reginald Geary (LL.B. 1896)  35th of Toronto*Fairbairn McWilliams (B.A. 1896)  Governor of Manitoba, 194053*Marshall Erskine Evans (B.A. 1897)  of Edmonton, 191718*Orville Breithaupt (B.A.)  18th Governor of Ontario*Fisher (B.A.)  of Ottawa, 191720*Ferrier Treleaven (B.A.)  of Hamilton, Ontario, 192627*Alexander Douglas McCurdy (B.A.Sc. 1906)  Governor of Nova Scotia, first person to fly an airplane in the Empire*Warriner (D.D.S. 1907)   Mayor of Winnipeg, 1937, Mayor of Beach, 193136*Edward Brownlee (B.A. 1908 Vic.)  5th of Alberta *Daniel Conant (B.A.)  12th of Ontario*Outerbridge (LL.B.)  2nd Governor of Newfoundland and Labrador*Nixon (B.Sc. OAC)  13th of Ontario*Ross Macdonald (B.A. 1914)  21st Governor of Ontario, Solicitor-General of Canada*A. Drew (B.A. 1916)  14th of Ontario and High Commissioner of Canada in London *Frost (B.A.)  16th of Ontario*MacEwan (B.Sc. 1926 OAC)  9th Governor of Alberta*Willis (B.A.)  Governor of Manitoba, 196065, a member of the Canadian curling team that won a gold medal in the Winter Olympics*Mills McGibbon (B.A. 1933 Vic.)  22nd Governor of Ontario*Hymmen (B.Sc.)  Mayor of Ontario, 196365*ODea (M.A.)  4th Governor of Newfoundland and Labrador*Black Aird (B.A. 1945 Trin.)  23rd Governor of Ontario; Senator, 196474*Dantzer (M.A.)  of Edmonton, 196568 *Gordon Robertson (Ph.D.)  7th of the Northwest Territories *Davis (B.A. 1951)  18th of Ontario *N. R. Jackman (B.A. 1953 Vic., LL.B. 1956)  25th Governor of Ontario, financier and philanthropist*Patterson Alger (M.B.A.)  Mayor of Calgary, 197780*Trenholme Counsell (M.D.)  Governor of New Brunswick, 19972003*Higdon (B.Ed.)  of Ottawa, 200001*Roberts (B.A. 1960, LL.B. 1964)  11th Governor of Newfoundland and Labrador*Sewell (B.A. 1961, LL.B. 1964)  58th of Toronto*Peterson (LL.B. 1967)  20th of Ontario *Cousens (D.Th. Knox)  Mayor of Ontario, 19942006*Rae (B.A. 1969, LL.B. 1977)  21st of Ontario, 5th Leader of the New Democratic Party*Onley (B.A. 1975)  28th Governor of Ontario*Fennell (B.Sc. 1977 UTM)  Mayor of Brampton, Ontario, founder and commissioner of the Womens Hockey League*David Miller (LL.B. 1984)  63rd of TorontoMinisters, diplomats, party leaders and other political figures*Adam Crooks (LL.B.)  Treasurer of Ontario, 187277, Attorney General of Ontario, 187172, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for West, 187174 *Alexander Harrison (B.C.L. 1855, D.C.L. 1859 Trin.)  Member of the Parliament for Toronto, 186772*Matheson (B.A. Trin.)  Treasurer of Ontario, 190513, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for South, 18981913*Thomas Moss (B.A. 1858, M.A. 1859)  Member of the Parliament for Toronto, 187375, Justice of Ontario, 187880*Wellington McLaughlin (B.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Durham West, 187990*Lount (LL.B.)  Member of the House of Commons for Centre, 189697, former justice in the Common Pleas division of the Court of Ontario*Dixon Craig (B.A.)  Member of the House of Commons, 18911900, as an independent Conservative member*Joseph Foy (B.A. St.M.)  General of Ontario, 190514, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for South, 18981916 *Harcourt (B.A.)  Treasurer of Ontario, 189099, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Monck, 18791908*Ralph Meredith (LL.B. 1872)  Leader of the Conservative Party of Ontario, 187894*Bristol Aylesworth (B.A. 1874, M.A. 1875)  Minister of Justice, 190611, Minister of Labour, 190506, General of Canada, 190506*Hughes (B.A.)  Minister of Militia and Defence, 191116, Member of the Parliament for Victoria, 190421*Sifton (B.A. 1875 Vic.)  Minister of the Interior, 18961905*Findlay Maclean (B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for South, 190426, and East, 18921904*Henry Clarke (LL.B.)  Member of the Parliament for South, 190417, member of the Party of Canada*Alexander Lougheed (B.A.)  Leader of the Government in the Senate, 191121, Leader of the Opposition in the Senate, 190611, 192125*Allan Pyne (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Education, 191418, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Northeast, 18981918*Barton Northrup (B.A. 1877, M.A. 1878)  Clerk of the House of Commons, 191824, Member of the Parliament for East, 189296*Chisholm (M.D. 1879)  Member of the House of Commons for East, 190411, member of the Party of Canada *James Roche (M.B. Trin.)  Minister of Indian Affairs and Northern Development, 191217, of State for Canada, 191112 *Franklin Sutherland (B.A.)  of the Canadian House of Commons, 190509, Member of the Parliament for Essex North, 190009*Dewart (B.A.)  Leader of the Liberal Party, 191921*S. Woodsworth (B.A. Vic.)  First leader of the Commonwealth Federation (later became the Democratic Party), 193242*James Bristol (B.A. 1883)  Member of the Parliament for East Centre, 192526, and Centre, 190525 *Taylor Gilmour (M.D. Trin.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for West, 188694*Grant MacKay (M.B.A.)  Leader of the Liberal Party, 190711, Member of the Assembly of Alberta for Athabasca, 191320*Benson Lucas (B.A.)  General of Ontario, 191419, Treasurer of Ontario, 191314*John Cody (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Education, 191819 *Erlin Kaiser (M.D. 1890)  Member of the Parliament for Ontario, 192530*Henry Moore (B.A. 1894)  Former Member of the Parliament for Ontario, member of the Party of Canada *Thomas White (B.A. 1895)  Minister of Finance and Receiver General, 191119, Member of the Parliament for Leeds, 191121*Currie (M.D. 1895)  Member of the House of Commons, 190811, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Prince Edward, 190208*Doherty (B.Sc. 1895 OAC)  Leader of the Farmers of Ontario, 192425, vice-president of the Stock Exchange, 1938*Proulx (M.A. St.M.)  Member of the Parliament for Prescott, 190421, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Prescott, 192329 *E. N. Sinclair (LL.B.)  Leader of the Liberal Party, 192330*Herbert Price (B.A.)  General of Ontario, 192634, Treasurer of Ontario, 192326, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Parkdale, 191437*James Rutherford (M.B.)  Member of the Parliament for Kent, 192639, member of the Party of Canada*Arthur Welsh (B.Ed.)  Secretary and Registrar of Ontario, 194955, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for MuskokaOntario, 194555*C. Downey (B.A.)  Chairman of the Transit Commission, 196063*James Dunlop (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Education, 195159, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Eglinton, 195161 *Timmins (B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for Parkdale, 194649, member of the Conservative Party of Canada*Campbell Elliott (B.A. Trin.)  Minister of Public Works, 192630, Minister of Labour, 1926, General of Canada, 193539 *H. Wrong (B.A., professor of history)  Ambassador to the United States, 194653*Joseph James Martin (B.A. 1925)  Senator for Windsor-Walkerville, Ontario, 196874, Member of the Parliament for Essex East, 193568 *Hannam (B.Sc. 1926 OAC)  General Secretary of the Farmers of Ontario, 193342, former President and managing director of the Federation of Agriculture*Reid (B.A. 1927 Trin.)  Canadian High Commissioner to India, 195257, Director of the South-Asia and Middle Easter Department of the Bank, 196265 *Railton (M.B.)  Member of the Parliament for Welland, 197279, member of the Party of Canada*Herbert Little (B.A. 1930 Trin.)  Director of Naval Intelligence during the World War, recipient of the Queens Jubilee Medal*Yaremko (B.A.)  Secretary and Registrar of Ontario, 196066, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Bellwoods, 195175*Herbert Norman (B.A. Vic.)  Canadian Ambassador to Japan, 194650*Jolliffe (B.A. Vic.)  First leader of the Ontario Commonwealth Federation, 194253, leader of the Opposition in the Legislature *Hees (B.A.)  Minister of Transport, 195760, Member of the Parliament for Broadview, 195062*Hales (B.Sc. 1934 OAC)  Member of the Parliament for Wellington, 196874, and South, 195768*Frederick Robertson (M.D.)  Member of the Parliament for Northumberland, 194957, member of the Party of Canada*Ignatieff (B.A. 1936 Trin.)  Ambassador to the United Nations, 196668; president of the Nations Security Council, 196869*Rae (B.A. 1936 U.C.)  Ambassador to the United Nations, 197276*Kenneth Macalister (B.A. 1937 U.C.)  Operations Executive operative in the World War*Harries (M.A.)  Member of the Parliament for Edmonton-Strathcona*Martin OConnell (M.A., Ph.D.)  Minister of Labour, 1972, 197879, Member of the Parliament for East, 196872*H. Aitchison (Ph.D.)  Leader of the Democratic Party of Nova Scotia, 196368*Gillespie (M.Comm.)  Member of the Parliament for Etobicoke *LaMarsh (B.A. Vic.)  of State for Canada, 196568, Minister of National Health and Welfare, 196365*James McNulty (B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for St. Catharines, 196872, and Lincoln, 196268, member of the Party of Canada*Bryden (M.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario, 197590, Member of the Parliament for BeachesWoodbine, 197590*Joe Greene (B.A.)  Minister of Energy, Mines and Resources, 196872, Member of the Parliament for Niagara Falls, 196872*Alexander Charles Auld (B.A.)  Minister of Colleges and Universities, 197475, Ontario Minister of the Environment, 197274  *Brunelle (M.A.)  Provincial Secretary for Resources Development of Ontario, 197781, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for North, 195881 *Andy Thompson (dropped out)  Leader of the Liberal Party, 196466*Stephenson (M.D. 1946)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Mills, 197587*Craig Parrott (D.D.S. 1947)  Ontario Minister of the Environment, 197881, Ontario Minister of Colleges and Universities, 197578 *Frith (B.A.)  Canadian High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, 199496, Leader of the Opposition in the Senate of Canada, 199193*Shulman (M.D. 1948)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario, 196775, member of the Democratic Party*Hellyer (B.A. 1949)  First leader of the Action Party, 19972004*Joan Smith (B.A. St.M.)  Solicitor General of Ontario, 198789, member of the Liberal Party*Lazure (B.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Quebec for La Prairie, 198996, Bertrand, 198184, and Chambly, 197681*Haidasz (M.B. 1951)  Member of the Parliament for Parkdale, 196278, Member of the Parliament for Trinity, 195758 *G. Hill (M.A., 1951; Ph.D., 1960, Sociology).  Founding head of the Human Rights Commission*S. Macdonald (B.A. 1952 Trin.)  Minister of National Defence, 197072; President of the Council, 196870; High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, 198891*Yalden (B.A. 1952 Vic.)  of Official Languages, 19771984*Nixon (B.Ed.)  Leader of the Liberal Party, 196775, 199091, Treasurer of Ontario, 198590*Baetz (LL.B.)  Ontario Minister of Intergovernmental Affairs, 198587, Ontario Minister of Tourism and Recreation, 198285, Provincial Secretary for Justice of Ontario, 1985*Flis (B.A., M.Ed.)  Member of the Parliament for Park, 197984, 199397, member of the Party of Canada*Cullen (B.A. 1954)  Federal Court judge, Minister of National Revenue, 197576 *McMurtry (B.A. 1954 Trin.)  High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, 198588, Justice of Ontario, 1996, Chancellor of University, 2008*LaPierre (B.A. 1955 St.M., M.A. 1957, Ph.D. 1962)  Senator, member of the Party of Canada, Officer of the of Canada *Saunderson (B.A. 1956 Trin.)  Ontario Minister of Economic Development, Trade and Tourism, 199597*Ian Scott (B.A. St.M.)  General of Ontario, 198590, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for St. David, 198587, and GeorgeSt. David, 198792*Leluk (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Correctional Services, 198185, member of the Conservative Party of Ontario *Porter (B.A.)  Chairman of the Transit Commission, 197987, former President of the National Exhibition*Reimer (B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for Kitchener, 197980, 198493*Grier (B.A. 1958 Trin.)  Member of the Parliament for EtobicokeLakeshore, 197274, President of University, 198895 *Grier (B.A. 1958 Trin.)  Ontario Minister of the Environment 199093, Ontario Minister of Health 9395, Member of the Parliament for EtobicokeLakeshore 198795*Kaplan (B.A. 1958)  Member of the Parliament for Centre, 197493, and Don Valley, 196872*Broadbent (B.A. 1959 Trin.)  Leader of the Democratic Party, 197589*Oostrom (B.A. 1959, M.B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for Willowdale, 198488, member of the Conservative Party of Canada*Michael Wilson (B.A. 1959 Trin.)  22nd Ambassador to the United States, 200609; Minister of Finance, 198491*Martiniuk (M.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario, 2007, member of the Conservative Party of Ontario*Shymko (B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for Park, 197879, member of the Conservative Party of Canada*Graham (B.A. 1961 Trin.)  Minister of Foreign Affairs, 200203; Minister of National Defence, 200406; Leader of the Party of Canada, 2006*McCaffrey (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Community and Social Services, 1983, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Armourdale, 197787 *Stewart (B.Sc.N.)  Minister of the Environment, 199799, Secretary of State (America and Africa), 199397*Stong (B.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Centre, 197581, judge in the Superior Court of Justice *Duhamel (M.A., Ph.D.)  Minister of Veterans Affairs, 200002, Member of the Parliament for Saint Boniface, 19882002*MacGuigan (Ph.D.)  Minister of Justice, 198284, Secretary of State for External Affairs, 198082, Member of the Parliament for WindsorWalkerville, 196884*McDougall (B.A. 1963)  Minister responsible for the Status of Women, 198690, Member of the Parliament for St. Pauls, 198493*Wong (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Citizenship and Immigration, 198990, Ontario Minister of Energy, 198789*Cassidy (B.A. Trin.)  Leader of the New Democratic Party, 197882*Hays (LL.B.)  Leader of the Opposition in the Senate of Canada, 200607, of the Canadian Senate, 200105, Senator Alberta, 19842007*Kergin (B.A. 1965)  19th Ambassador to the United States*Greene (B.A. 1966 St.M.)  Member of the Parliament for Valley North, 198893, member of the Conservative Party of Canada *Taylor (B.A. Vic.)  of Finance of Columbia, 200508, member of the Assembly of British Columbia for Vancouver-Langara, 200508*Godfrey (B.A. 1967 Trin.)  Member of the Parliament for Valley West, 19932008*Oda (B.A.)  Minister for International Cooperation, 2007, of Canadian Heritage, 200607, Member of the Parliament for Durham, 2004 *Fogal (M.A.)  Leader of the Action Party, 200408*Lewis (dropped out)  Leader of the New Democratic Party, 197078*Prue (B.A.)  City Councillor, 19982001, Member of the Parliament for York, 2001 *Sorbara (dropped out)  Ontario Minister of Finance, 200305, 200607, Ontario Minister of Labour, 198789*McLean (M.Div. Knox)  of State for Canada, 198485, Member of the Parliament for Waterloo, 197993*John Hastings (M.A. 1967)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Etobicoke North, 19992003, member of the Conservative Party of Ontario*Bosley (B.A. 1968 Trin.)  of the Canadian House of Commons, 198486, Member of the Parliament for Valley West, 197993*Frith (B.Pharm. 1968)  Minister of Indian Affairs and Northern Development, 1984, Member of the Parliament for Sudbury, 198088*Fraser (B.A. 1968, M.A. 1972)  Canadas 6th of Official Languages*Ignatieff (B.A. 1969 Trin.)  Leader of the Party of Canada, 2008, director of Center for Human Rights Policy at F. Kennedy School of Government, 200005*Langdon (B.A. 1969 Trin.)  Member of the House of Commons, 198493, member of the Democratic Party *Boyer (M.A., LL.B.)  Member of the Parliament for Etobicoke-Lakeshore, 198493, member of the Conservative Party of Canada*Volpe (B.A. 1970, B.Ed. 1971, M.Ed. 1980)  Member of the Parliament for EglintonLawrence, 1988*David Berger (B.A. 1971)  Canadian Ambassador to Israel, 199599, Member of the Parliament for Saint-HenriWestmount, 198894*Wappel (B.A. 1971)  Member of the Parliament for Southwest, 19972008, and West, 198897 *Tonks (M.Ed.)  Member of the Parliament for South-Weston, 2000, 6th Metro Toronto Chairman, 198797*Turner (B.A.)  Minister of National Revenue, 1993, Member of the Parliament for Halton, 200608, Member of the Parliament for HaltonPeel, 198893*Nash (B.A.)  President of the New Democratic Party of Canada, 2009, Member of the Parliament for Park, 200608 *Wiseman (B.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for West, 199095, member of the New Democratic Party *Hampton (B.Ed.)  Leader of the New Democratic Party, 19962009*Minna (B.A.)  Minister for International Cooperation, 19992002, Member of the Parliament for York, 1997 *Bulte (B.A. U.C.)  Member of the Parliament for Park, 19972006*Bennett (M.D. 1974)  Member of the Parliament for St. Pauls, 1997, member of the Party of Canada*Wilfert (B.A., M.A., B.Ed.)  Member of the Parliament for Richmond Hill, 2004, Member of the Parliament for Oak Ridges, 19972004*Tory (B.A. 1975 Trin.)  Leader of the Conservative Party of Ontario, 200507*Morton (M.A. 1975, Ph.D. 1981)  Minister of Sustainable Resource Development in the Alberta government, 2006, Member of the Assembly of Alberta, 2004*Hornby (M.A. 1976)  Canadian Ambassador to the European Union, 2006*Himelfarb (Ph.D.)  Canadian Ambassador to Italy, 2006*S. Lyons (J.D.)  Chairman of the Transit Commission, 198789, former Chairman of Coach and Trentway-Wagar*Wayne Arthurs (B.Ed.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for East, 2007, member of the Liberal Party*Hall Findlay (B.A.)  Lawyer, Member of the Parliament for Willowdale, 2008*Karygiannis (B.ASc.)  Member of the Parliament for ScarboroughAgincourt, 1988, member of the Party of Canada*Oliphant (B.Comm. 1978)  Member of the Parliament for Valley West, 2008, member of the Party of Canada*Marchese (B.A. 1978, B.Ed.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Trinity-Spadina, 1999, member of the Democratic Party of Ontario*Bentley (LL.B. 1979)  General of Ontario, 2007, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for West, 2003*Dombrowsky (B.A. 1979)  Ontario Minister of Agriculture, Food and Rural Affairs, 2005, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for EdwardHastings, 2007*Wynne (M.A. 1980)  Ontario Minister of Education, 2006, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Valley West, 2003*Bountrogianni (M.Ed. 1980)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario, 19992007, member of the Liberal Party*Ianno (B.Sc.)  Member of the Parliament for Trinity-Spadina, 19932006, Minister of Families and Caregivers, 200406*Silipo (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Community and Social Services, 199395, Ontario Minister of Education, 199193, Chair of the Management Board, 199192*Wrzesnewskyj (B.Comm. Trin.)  Member of the Parliament for Etobicoke Centre, 2004, member of the Party of Canada*Christie (Ph.D.)  Chairman of the Transit Commission, 199498*Cordiano (B.A.)  Ontario Minister for Economic Development and Trade, 200306, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for SouthWeston, 19992006*Best (B.A. UTSC)  Ontario Minister of Health Promotion, 2007, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for ScarboroughGuildwood, 2007*Clement (B.A. 1983, LL.B. 1986)  Minister of Industry, 2008, Minister of Health, 200608, Member of the Parliament for SoundMuskoka, 2006*Apps (LL.B. 1984)  President of the Party of Canada, 2009*Berardinetti (B.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Southwest, 2003, member of the Liberal Party*Tim Murphy (LL.B.)  Chief of Staff of the Prime Ministers Office, 200306, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for GeorgeSt. David, 199395*Dechert (LL.B.)  Member of the Parliament for MississaugaErindale, 2008, member of the Party of Canada*Jim Wilson (B.A. St.M.)  Ontario Minister of Northern Development and Mines, 200203, Ontario Minister of Health, 199597*Martel (B.A.)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for East, 198799, member of the New Democratic Party*Van Loan (B.A. 1987, M.A. 1989, M.Sc. 1993)  Minister of Intergovernmental Affairs, 200607, of the Queens Privy Council for Canada, 200607*Newman (B.A. 1987 U.C.)  Minister of Northern Development and Mines, 200102, Ontario Minister of the Environment, 200001*Duncan (B.A. 1988)  Member of the Parliament for North, 2008, member of the Party of Canada*Qaadri (M.D. 1988)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Etobicoke North, 2003, member of the Liberal Party*Anne Chambers (B.Comm. 1988)  Member of the Assembly of Ontario for East, 200307, member of the Liberal Party*MacLaren (M.Div. 1991 Trin.)  High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, 19962000, Member of the Parliament for North, 197984, 198896*Smith (B.A.)  Ontario Minister of Tourism, 2008, Member of the Assembly of Ontario for Nipissing, 2003*Dearborn (B.A. 1994 Trin., M.Div. 1996 Trin.)  Member of the Assembly of Saskatchewan for Kindersley, 200207, member of the Party*Chong (B.A. 1994 Trin.)  Member of the Parliament for Hills, 2004, President of the Privy Council for Canada, 2006*Holland (B.A. 1996)  Member of the Parliament for AjaxPickering, 2004, member of the Party of Canada*Patrick Brown (B.A.)  Member of the Parliament for Barrie, 2006, President of the Conservative Youth Federation, 19982002Natural sciences, mathematics, medicine and engineeringMathematics and statistics*Charles Fields (B.A. 1884, professor of mathematics 190232)  Mathematician and founder of the Medal()*H. Coats (B.A. 1896 U.C., visiting professor of statistics)  Canadas first Dominion Statistician*Herbert Marshall (B.A. 1915)  Statistician, academic, Canadas third Dominion Statistician*Samuel Beatty (Ph.D. 1915)  Mathematician and educator, sequence is named after him, 21st Chancellor of the of Toronto *Krieger (B.A. 1924, M.A. 1925, Ph.D. 1930)  Mathematician, the first woman to earn a Ph.D. in mathematics in Canada*de Beauregard Robinson (B.A. 1927)  Mathematician in combinatorics and representation theory of the groups, known for the correspondence*W. Tucker (B.A. 1928)  Mathematician; co-discoverer of the conditions*Halperin (B.A. 1932 Vic.)  Mathematician, social activist, Fellow of the Society of Canada, Marshall Tory Medal recipient*Mendelsohn (B.A., M.A., Ph.D. 1941)  Mathematician, former President of the Mathematical Society, fellow of the Society of Canada, winner of the Marshall Tory Medal*J. Nesbitt (B.A. 1934, M.A. 1935, Ph.D. 1937)  Mathematician, co-discoverer of the formula*Carson Mark (Ph.D. 1938)  Mathematician, noted for his work on developing weapons for the United States at Alamos National Laboratory   *Kaplansky (B.A. 1938, M.A. 1940)  Mathematician, member of the National Academy of Sciences and the Academy of Arts and Sciences, former director of the Sciences Research Institute and President of the Mathematical Society *Lin (M.Sc. 1941)  Applied mathematician, Professor emeritus at the Institute of Technology, former President of the for Industrial and Applied Mathematics*Synge Morawetz (B.A. 1945)  Mathematician, Professor Emerita at the Institute of Mathematical Sciences at the York University, former President of the Mathematical Society, the Medal of Science winner *Moser (M.Sc. 1945)  Mathematician, best known for his polygon notation*Steinberg (Ph.D. 1948)  Mathematician, professor emeritus of mathematics at the of California, Los Angeles, winner of the Prize and Prize, member of the National Academy of Sciences*B. Gillies (B.A. 1950)  Mathematician and computer scientist known for his work in game theory, computer design, and minicomputer programming environments*C. Siebenmann (B.Sc.)  Professor of mathematics at the de Paris-Sud at Orsay, co-discoverer of the class, winner of the Prize*James Arthur (B.Sc., M.Sc.)  Former President of the Mathematical Society*E. Marsden (B.Sc.)  American applied mathematician, the Carl F. Braun Professor of Engineering and Control & Dynamic Systems at the Institute of Technology *Benedetto (Ph.D. 1964)  Professor of mathematics at the of Maryland, College Park, Director of the Wiener Center for Harmonic Analysis and Applications*Moody (M.A. 1964, Ph.D. 1966)  Mathematician, co-discoverer of algebra, Fellow of the Society of Canada*Friedlander (B.Sc. 1965)  Mathematician in number theory*Norman Johnson (Ph.D. 1966)  Mathematician, famous for solids*Masoom Ali (M. Sc. 1967, Ph.D. 1969) - Statistician State University. *James Stewart (Ph.D. 1967)  Mathematician and educator, professor emeritus of mathematics at University*Campbell (Ph.D. 1981)  Mathematician, former President of the Mathematical Society, current President of the of New Brunswick *Yldrm (Ph.D. 1990)  Turkish mathematician who specializes in theory, professor of mathematics at University  *Vakil (B.Sc., M.Sc. 1992)  Four-time William Lowell Putnam Scholar, professor of mathematics at UniversityMedicine and dentistry*James Thorburn (M.B.)  Physician and university professor, consulting surgeon at the General Hospital, President of the Medical Association, 1895*Ruffin Abbott (M.D. 1861)  First Black Canadian doctor, participated in the Civil War*Oronhyatekha (M.D. 1866)  First Canadian Aboriginal medical graduate, former President of the Grand Council of Canadian Chiefs *Mills (B.A. 1871 U.C., M.A. 1872)  Physician and physiologist, taught at University, fellow of the Society of Canada*Kirk Clarke (M.D. 1879)  Psychiatrist who co-founded the Canadian National Committee for Mental Hygiene (now the Mental Health Association)*Stowe-Gullen (M.D. 1883)  First female Canadian doctor, awarded the of British Empire*Joseph Mackenzie (B.Sc. 1886 U.C., professor of pathology and bacteriology)  Pathologist and bacteriologist,  member of the of American Bacteriologists and the Association of Pathologists and Bacteriologists*Stephen Cullen (M.B. 1890)  Gynecologist associated with Hopkins Hospital, sign is named for him*Thomas McCrae (M.D. 1903)  Professor of Medicine at Medical College, collaborated with Osler on Principles and Practice of Medicine*Menten (B.A. 1904, M.B. 1907, M.D. 1911)  Major contributor to kinetics and histochemistry, for whom the equation is named*Bagshaw (M.B.)  Medical director of the first control clinic in Canada*Archibald Graham (M.B. 1905)  Physician and academic, Physician-in-Chief at the General Hospital until 1947*Smillie Robertson (M.B. 1909)  First female surgeon in Canada*Defries (M.D. 1913)  Physician, Former director of Medical Research Laboratories*Drake (M.B. 1914)  Pediatrician and nutrition expert; inventor of the food Pablum with Tisdall at the for Sick Children*Bethune (M.D. 1916)  Physician and humanitarian; developed the first transfusion service in the Civil War, doctor to Zedongs army in the Sino-Japanese War*Banting (M.B. 1916)  Co-discoverer of insulin, with student Charles Best, co-researcher Collip and professor of physiology James Richard Macleod*Collip (B.A. 1912 Trin., M.A. 1913, Ph.D. 1916)  Significant member of the research team that discovered insulin; later served as the Chair of the Department of Biochemistry at University and Dean of Medicine at the of Western Ontario   *Charles Best (B.A. 1921, M.D. 1925)  Student of Frederick Banting in the discovery of insulin; later adviser to the medical research committee of the Health Organization*Chisholm (M.D. 1924)  Director-General of the Health Organization, 194853*Ham (M.B. 1927)  Prominent histologist, Fellow of the Society of Canada, textbook Histology *Noble (M.D. 1934)  Physician who was involved in the discovery of vinblastine, recipient of the Foundation International Award*Thornton Mustard (M.D. 1937)  Physician and cardiac surgeon, one of the first to perform surgery, well-known for Mustard cardiovascular procedure*Gordon Bigelow (M.D. 1938)  Heart surgeon who developed the pacemaker and the use of hypothermia in heart surgery*E. Johns (M.A., Ph.D. 1939)  Medical physicist who developed of the use of radiation to treat cancer*Stern (M.D. 1939)  Professor of epidemiology at the of California, Los Angeles who published the first case report linking a virus to a cancer*Copp (M.D. 1939)  Biochemist who discovered and named calcitonin, a hormone used in the treatment of treatment of hypercalcemia and osteoporosis*Barootes (M.D. 1943)  Physician and urologist, former treasurer and deputy president of the Medical Association*Kanee Schachter (M.B. 1943, associate professor)  Renowned dermatologist, former president of the Canadian Dermatological Association  *J. M. Barnett (M.D. 1944)  Pioneer of the use of aspirin as a preventive therapy for heart attack and stroke*Basmajian (M.D. 1945)  Physician, noted for his work in rehabilitation science, taught at University, University and University*Callaghan (M.D. 1946)  surgeon who pioneered open-heart surgery in Alberta ()*Heimbecker (M.D. 1947)  Cardiovascular surgeon who performed the worlds first complete heart valve transplant in 1962 and Canadas first modern heart transplant in 1981*B. Salter (M.D. 1947)  Pediatric orthopaedic surgeon who originated the passive motion (CPM) treatment to aid the recovery of joints after trauma *McCulloch (M.D. 1948)  Cellular biologist and Award recipient credited with the discovery of the cell*Fraser Mustard (M.D. 1953)  Physician and scientist, a founding member of the Universitys Faculty of Medicine, past Chairman of Power Systems*Walfish (M.D. 1958)  Endocrinologist, noted for his research in thyroid physiology and pathology, worked at Mount Sinai Hospital*Chetsanga (M.Sc. 1965, Ph.D. 1969)  Professor of the of Zimbabwe who discovered two DNA repair enzymes()*McMurtry (M.D. 1965)  Physician, special advisor to the Canadian Royal Commission on the Future of Health Care*Ling (B.Sc. 1966)  Medical researcher known for the discovery of P-glycoprotein*Bradley (M.D. 1966)  Psychiatrist best known for her work in identity disorder in children, former Psychiatrist-in-Chief at the for Sick Children *Michael Baker (M.D. 1966)  Physician and cancer researcher, Physician-in-Chief of the General Hospital, recipient of the Elizabeth II Golden Jubilee Medal*Hirsh (D.Sc.)  Clinician, and scientist specializing in anticoagulant therapy and thrombosis, fellow of the Society of Canada*Jack Newman (M.D. 1970)  Physician specializing in breastfeeding support and advocacy, consultant for Unicefs Friendly Hospital Initiative*Ticktin (M.D. 1973)  Psychiatrist, therapist and lecturer, notable figure in the movement*John Blatherwick (D.PH. 1975)  One of Canadas trailblazing leaders in health, the longest-serving medical health officer in Canada *Lau (B.A. 1975)  Family physician, member of the Medical Association and Medical Association, Elizabeth II Silver Jubilee Medal recipient*Ernest Archer (M.D.)  Physician and political activist, President of the Medical Association, 194243*Goldenberg (M.D. 1978)  Pioneer in the role of MRI and focal therapy in the treatment of cancer*Goldman (M.D. 1980)  Doctor and radio personality, practices at Mount Sinai Hospital, produces a radio documentary series, Coat, Black Art*Basrur (M.D. 1982)  Chief Medical Officer of Health and Assistant Deputy Minister of Public Health in the Ontario Ministry of Health and Long-Term Care, 200406*A. Singer (M.D. 1984)  Former director of the of Toronto Joint Centre for Bioethics and member of the scientific advisory board of the & Melinda Gates Foundation*Chan (B.Sc.)  Emergency physician at the for Sick Children, expert in peadiatric population health*Upshur (M.Sc. 1997)  Physician and researcher, Director of the Primary Care Research Unit at Research Institute*Orbinski (M.A. 1998, associate professor of medicine)  President of Sans Frontires; fellow at the Centre for International StudiesPhysics, chemistry and astronomy*Frederick King (B.A. 1874)  Astronomer, founding director of the Observatory, President of the Society of Canada, 191112*Fulford Ruttan (B.A. 1881)  Chemist and educator, former president of the Society of Canada and the Canadian Golf Association *Chant (B.A. 1890)  Physicist and astronomer, president of the Astronomical Society of Canada and principal founder of the Dunlap Observatory, considered the father of Canadian astronomy*Cunningham McLennan (B.Sc. 1892, Ph.D. 1900)  Physicist of the Cavendish Laboratory and McLennan Laboratories, key founder of the National Research Council*Stanley Plaskett (B.Sc. 1899)  Astronomer who discovered the  binary nature of star*Franklin Burton (B.Sc. 1901, Ph.D. 1910)  Fellow of the Society of Canada and member of the National Research Council, co-developer of the first practical microscope *Edmund Harper (B.Sc. 1906, M.Sc. 1907)  Astronomer, Fellow of the Astronomical Society of Canada, member of staff at the Observatory *V. Redman (B.A. 1908)  Chemist, a pioneer in the industrial applications of plastics, former president of the Chemical Society*Jeffrey Dempster (B.Sc. 1909, M.Sc. 1910)  Physicist who developed the worlds first modern spectrometer and discovered uranium isotope 235U*Algernon Pearce (B.Sc., M.Sc.)  Astrophysicist, director of the Astrophysical Observatory, 194051, former president of the Astronomical Society of Canada and the Society of Canada*Hemley Plaskett (B.A. 1916)  Astronomer who made significant contributions to the fields of physics, spectroscopy and spectrophotometry, taught at Oxford and won the Medal of the Royal Astronomical Society.()*Scott Hogg (B.Sc.)  Astronomer who pioneered in the study of spectrophotometry of stars and of spectra of comets.(), the crater Hogg on the Moon is co-named for him *Misener (M.Sc. 1935)  Discoverer of the superfluid phase of matter together with Leonidovich Kapitsa*MacRae (B.Sc. 1937)  Astronomer, Director of the Dunlap Observatory, 196578, appeared in the Academy Award-nominated NFB documentary Universe*Leonard Schawlow (B.A. 1941 Vic., M.A., Ph.D. 1949)  Developer of spectroscopy*Kohn (B.A. 1945 U.C., M.A. 1946)  Pioneer of chemistry and leading developer of the functional theory*P. Stoicheff (B.Sc. 1947, Ph.D. 1950, professor of physics)  Physicist, former president of the Society of America, recipient of the Frederic Ives Medal*Brockhouse (M.A. 1948, Ph.D. 1950)  Developer of triple-axis spectrometry and other neutron scattering techniques for studies of condensed matter()*Ackman (B.A. 1950)  Chemist and pioneer in marine oils and fatty acid*Franklin (Post-doctoral studies)  Metallurgist, research physicist, humanitarian, the first female professor in the of Torontos department of metallurgy and materials science, fellow of the Society of Canada*Abella (B.A. 1957)  Physicist specializing in laser physics, quantom optics and spectroscopy, professor of physics at the of Chicago*Timusk (B.A. 1957)  Physicist, professor emeritus of physics at University, co-winner of the Isakson Prize for Optical Effects in Solids *J. LeRoy (B.Sc. 1965, M.Sc. 1967)  Developer of the near-dissociation theory and the Radius with Barry Bernstein*Hugh Ross (M.Sc., Ph.D.)  Astronomer, astrophysicist, Earth creationist and Christian apologist, established his own ministry called Reasons To Believe *V. Elaguppillai (M.Sc. 1968, Ph.D. 1970)  Nuclear scientist, former Senior Scientific Advisor of Nuclear Safety Commission, member of the Nations Scientific Committee on the Effects of Atomic Radiation, 199296*Richard Peltier (M.Sc. 1969, Ph.D. 1971)  Physicist in atmospheric, oceanic and geophysical turbulence and fluid dynamics, fellow of the Society of Canada and the Geophysical Union*B. Wise (B.Sc. 1976, M.Sc. 1977)  Theoretical physicist known for his role in the development of heavy quark effective theory,  John A. McCone Professor of High Energy Physics at Institute of Technology*Franklin (B.Sc. 1977 Innis)  Experimental particle physicist, professor of physics at University*Dorn (Ph.D. 1985)  Chemist and educator, Chair of the Canadian Pugwash Group, the Canadian branch of the Conferences on Science and World Affairs which received the 1995 Peace Prize*Arkani-Hamed (B.Sc. 1993)  Theoretical physicist,  former professor of physics at University  and faculty of the for Advanced Study*Charbonneau (B.Sc.)  Thomas D. Cabot Associate Professor of Astronomy at University, recipient of the J. Trumpler Award and the T. Waterman AwardBiology and ecology*Macallum (B.A. 1880)  Biochemist and founder of the Research Council of Canada*Playfair McMurrich (M.A. 1881)  Zoologist and academic, winner of the Medal, former president of the Society of Canada and the Association for the Advancement of Science*E. Saunders (B.A. 1888)  Agronomist and inventor of Marquis wheat*Gowanlock Huntsman (B.A. 1905, professor of marine zoology 192754)  Fisheries biologist, invented the fast freezing of fish fillets, recipient of the Medal, former president of the Society of Canada  *Jackson (B.Sc., M.Sc., Ph.D)  Prominent biochemist, former biochemist-in-chief at the Toronto for Sick Children, inventor of the bilirubinometer*S. Holling (B.A., M.Sc. 1952)   Ecologist and pioneer in economics, director of the Institute for Applied Systems Analysis in Vienna*Zeller (M.A. 1971, Ph.D. 1978)  Physical anthropologist specialized in the study of primates*William E. Rees (Ph.D.)  Ecologist, professor of ecology at the of British Columbia, origininated the footprint concept and co-developed the method *Rodd (M.Sc. 1982, associate professor 1998)  Zoologist, recipient of the Premiers Research Excellence Award*Conn (Ph.D. 1987)  Geneticist and poet, her book South of the Tudo Bem Cafe shortlisted for the Lowther Award*Arrowsmith (Ph.D.)  Structural biologist, Chief Scientist at the Toronto lab of the Genomics ConsortiumEngineering and computer science*E. T. Haultain (B.A.Sc. 1889)  Mining engineer who began Ritual of the Calling of an Engineer; inventor of the Superpanner and Infrasizer, instruments used in dressing ore*Walker Baldwin (B.A.Sc. 1906)  Hydrofoil and aviation pioneer, designer and builder of the Silver Dart, White Wing and Red Wing aircraft *W. Harvey (B.A.Sc.)  General Manager of the Transit Commission, 192438, played a key role in its early development *G. Inglis (B.A.Sc. 1923)  General Manager  Operations of the Transit Commission, 195968*MacGill (B.A.Sc. 1927)  The worlds first female aircraft designer, Queen of the Hurricanes, commissioner on the Commission on the Status of Women of 1967*R. Franks (M.B. 1928)  Aviation medical scientist and inventor of the G-suit, awarded the of Merit*Chamberlin (B.A.Sc. 1936)  Aerodynamicist and chief designer of the Arrow, major designer for the Gemini space capsule and Apollo Lunar Module*Hillier (B.A. 1937, M.A. 1938, Ph.D. 1941)  Scientist and inventor who designed and built the first practical microscope with Hall and Prebus*Etkin (B.A.Sc. 1941, M.A.Sc. 1947)  Authority on aircraft guidance and control*Shemilt (B.A.Sc. 1941)  Dean of engineering at University, 196979, fellow of the Society of Canada, recipient of the Centennial Medal*Gotlieb (B.Sc. 1942, M.Sc. 1944, Ph.D. 1947, professor of computer science)  Computer scientist who has been called the Father of Computing in Canada, former president of the Information Processing Society*Milton Ham (B.A.Sc. 1943, professor of electrical engineering)  Founding fellow and former president of the Academy of Engineering *Bull (B.A.Sc. 1944, M.A.Sc. 1948, Ph.D. 1951)  Ballistics engineer and developer of long-range superguns, headed HARP for the States Department of Defence and later Babylon for Husseins government*Slemon (M.A.Sc. 1948, professor of engineering)  Electrical engineer, the Nikola Tesla Award winner, wrote Magnetoelectric Devices and Electric Machines and Drives*Urry (B.A.Sc. 1950)  Inventor of the battery and the battery*Kahan (B.A. 1954, M.A. 1956, Ph.D. 1958)  Architect of the 754 standard for floating-point computation, developer of the summation algorithm, recipient of the Award in 1989*Brzustowski (B.A.Sc. 1958)  Former president of the Sciences and Engineering Research Council, taught mechanical engineering at the of Waterloo *Money (B.Sc. 1958, M.Sc. 1959, Ph.D. 1961, professor of physiology)  Retired NRC/CSA Astronaut, Spacelab Payload Operations Controller for a Spacelab mission in 1992*Vranesic (B.Eng., M.Eng., Ph.D)  Electrical engineer, Master of chess and developer of chess software*Aho (B.A.Sc. 1963)  Co-creator of the programming language, co-author of Principles, Techniques, and Tools and several other textbooks on computer science*Kernighan (B.A.Sc. 1964)  Labs computer scientist who co-authored The C Programming Language and UNIX Programming Environment*von Ramm (B.Sc. 1968, M.Sc. 1970)  Thomas Lord Professor of Engineering at University and holder of the first patent on three-dimensional ultrasound *Geddes (M.Sc. 1970, Ph.D. 1973)  Professor Emeritus in the David R. Cheriton School of Computer Science at the of Waterloo, member of the for Computing Machinery*Maibaum (B.A. 1970)  Computer scientist concentrating on the theory of specification, taught at College London, College London and University*Bondar (Ph.D. 1974)  First neurologist in space and Canadas first female astronaut; former head of space medicine research at NASA*Hehner (Ph.D. 1974, professor of computer science)  Influential computer scientist who focuses on methods, particularly for programming*Schaeffer (B.Sc. 1979)  Developer of Chinook, the worlds strongest checkers-playing computer program, and Polaris, a program that plays hold em*Arthur Whitney (M.A.)  Computer scientist most notable for developing the APL-inspired programming languages A+ and K.(An Interview with Arthur Whitney, Kx CEO and Developer of Kx Technology, Kx Systems, January 4, 2004.), CEO and co-founder of Systems*Vicente (B.A.Sc. 1985, professor of engineering 1998)  Mechanical and industrial engineer, specializing in the field of human factors, author of The Human Factor*Cleve (Ph.D. 1989)  Professor of computer science at the R. Cheriton School of Computer Science at the of Waterloo, associate member of the Institute for Theoretical Physics*Megginson  Computer software consultant and developer, the lead developer and original maintainer of the API for XML*Payette (M.A.Sc. 1990)  Chief astronaut of the Space Agency, 200007; former research engineer at IBM and Research*Dudek (M.Sc., Ph.D.)  Professor of computer science and Director of the University School of Computer Science at University*North (M.Sc. 2005)  Writer and computer programmer, creator and author of Comics, co-creator of Whispered Apologies and Happy Dog the Happy DogEarth science*Tyrrell (LL.B. 1880)  Geologist and mining consultant who discovered dinosaur bones in Albertas Badlands and coal around Drumheller*William Parks (B.A. 1892, Ph.D. 1900)  Geologist and paleontologist, following in the tradition of Lambe, Parksosaurus was named for him*S. Moore (B.A. 1904, M.A. 1908)  Economic geologist, former president of the of Economic Geologists, Society of Canada and Canadian Institute*S. Wright (B.Sc. 1908)  Glaciologist and member of the British Antarctic Expedition led by Falcon Scott, navigator of the sledge team that found Scotts perished body*R. Derry (M.A. Ph.D.)  Economic geologist, creator of the World Atlas of Geological and Mineral Deposits( )*Sherwood Hume (B.Sc.)  Geologist, former president of the Association of Canada, the Society of Canada and the Society of America*Tuzo Wilson (B.Sc. 1930 Trin.)   Geologist, geophysicist and pioneer in the theory of tectonics who conceived of the fault concept, the Medal winner*Thorsteinsson (M.Sc.)  Award-winning geologist, noted for his contribution to the geology of the Proterozoic and Paleozoic rocks*Morley (B.Sc. 1946, M.Sc., Ph.D.)  Geophysicist known for his study of magnetic properties of ocean crust, founder of the Centre for Remote Sensing*Blais (Ph.D. 1954)  Geological engineer who helped develop a number of prospecting and exploration technologies, Fellow of the Society of Canada*W. Mountjoy (Ph.D. 1960)  Award-winning geologist, professor emeritus of geology at University, fellow of the Society of Canada  *Harold Williams (Ph.D. 1961)  Geologist and expert on the Mountains and tectonic development of mountain belts, advanced the theory of colliding super-continents*J. Currie (B.Sc. 1972)  Paleontologist,  museum curator who helped found the Tyrrell Museum of Palaeontology, teaches at the of AlbertaSocial sciencesAnthropology, geography and archaeology*Trick Currelly (B.A. 1898 Vic., M.A. 1902)  First director of the Ontario Museum, member of the staff of the Exploration Fund which was conducting excavations at Abydos in Upper Egypt*Black (M.A. 1906, M.D. 1909)  Paleoanthropologist who identified and named Sinanthropus pekinensis, better known as Man()*Custance (M.A., Ph.D.)  Anthropologist, scientist and author specializing on science and Christianity.()*Bott Spillius (B.A., 1954)  Key founder of network analysis(Encounters with Melanie Klein: Selected Papers of Elizabeth Spillius)*Robert Bateman (B.A. 1954 Vic.)  Naturalist, painter*Keith Fraser (M.A. 1955)  Physical geographer, former president of the Association of Geographers and the executive secretary, publisher and general manager of the Canadian Geographical Society*B. Redford (B.A., M.A., Ph.D.)  Egyptologist and archaeologist, editor of the The Encyclopedia of Ancient Egypt, director of the Temple Project*F. MacDonald (B.A. 1961)  Anthropologist  and director of the Museum of Civilization, 198398, member of UNESCOs drafting committee on the protection of world cultural and natural heritage*John McGhee (B.A. 1964, M.A. 1966)  Author and specialist in Arctic archaeology, former president of the Canadian Archaeological Association, fellow of the Society of Canada *Borshay Lee (B.A., M.A.)  Anthropologist studying indigenous people in hunting and gathering societies, best known for his work on the Ju/hoansi*Ally (M.A.)   President of the Islamic Information & Dawah Centre International in Toronto*J. Brand (Ph.D. 1998)  Egyptologist, Field Director of the Karnak Great Hypostyle Hall Project of the of Memphis, 2001Sociology*Delbert Clark (Ph.D. 1938; professor of sociology, 193876)  Sociologist known for studies on Canadian social development and political economics*Burnet (B.A. Vic.)  Sociologist specializing in ethnic studies, founder of the Glendon Sociology Department at University*Goffman (B.A. 1945)  Sociologist, author of Presentation of Self in Everyday Life, taught at Cal and UPenn, 73rd president of the Sociological Association()*G. Hill (M.A. 1951, Ph.D. 1960)  Sociologist, human rights specialist and Black Canadian historian, Ombudsman, 198489, founder of the Ontario Black History Society*Bannerji (Ph.D.)  Writer, academic, professor of sociology at University, known for her activist work and poetry*Wellman (Ph.D. 1969) Director of NetLab and S.D. Clark Professor of Sociology at the University of Toronto, Fellow Society of Canada*Leyton (Ph.D. 1972)  Sociologist, educator and author on serial homicide and juvenile delinquency *A. Visano (B.A. 1973, M.A. 1974, Ph.D. 1986)  Professor of sociology and criminology at University, associate editor of the International Journal of Comparative Sociology*Hirsh (B.Sc.)  information scientist, Broadcasting Company broadcaster and writer about new technologiesPsychology and linguistics*Jaques (B.A. 1935)  Psychoanalyst and organizational psychologist who developed the notion of organization*Hyman (B.Pharm. 1946)  Jewish linguist, anthropologist, pharmacist, composer, artist, and translator, proprietor of the second branch of Book and Art Shoppe*Hoffer (M.D. 1949)  Psychiatrist; proposed controversial megavitamin therapies for the treatment of schizophrenia *Tulving (B.A. 1953 U.C., M.A. 1954, professor emeritus)  Neuroscientist whose research developed the distinction between episodic and memory; famously worked with patient KC; fellow of the Royal Societies of Canada and London*Bregman (B.A. 1957. M.A. 1959)  Psychologist, known for coining the term scene analysis, taught at University, fellow of the Society of Canada*Lefebvre (M.D. 1970)  Child psychiatrist at the for Sick Children and founder of Online*Alice Shaw (M.A. 1973, Ph.D. 1976)  Linguist, noted for her work on Nations languages, associate professor of linguistics at the of British Columbia*Bialystok (Ph.D. 1976)  Psychologist, Distinguished Research Professor of Psychology at University, fellow of the Society of Canada*Schacter (M.A. 1977, Ph.D. 1981, assistant professor of psychology, 198187)  Psychologist, William R. Kenan, Jr. Professor of Psychology at University, 2002, author of Seven Sins of Memory, Fellow *Massam (B.A. 1980, professor of linguistics)  Linguist specializing in the syntax of Niuean, developed an analysis of incorporation*Feldman Barrett (B.A., 1985) - Distinguished Professor of Psychology, University, who developed the model of emotion*Brodbeck (M.A. 1989, Ph.D. 1994)  Psychologist specializing in psychology in humans and non-human animals*Carnie (B.A. 1991 St.M.)  Linguist, professor of linguistics at the of Arizona, known for his research on syntactic theory*Sarah Herz (Ph.D. 1992)  Researcher, writer and consultant on the psychology of olfaction()Economics, management and political science*Cudmore (B.A. 1905, professor of political economy 190845)  Economist, academic, civil servant, Canadas second Dominion Statistician *Thomas Gould Hackett (B.A.Sc.)  Economist, economic adviser for the of Montreal*Kenneth Galbraith (B.Sc. 1931 OAC)  Economist, former professor of economics at Harvard, former States Ambassador to India(), former president of the Economic Association, recipient of two U.S. Presidential Medals of Freedom, Great Crash, 1929, Affluent Society, Age of Uncertainty, Anatomy of Power*B. Macpherson (B.A. 1933, professor of political economy 195687)  Political scientist who contributed to the theory of possessive individualism, fellow of the Society of Canada, officer of the of Canada, The Life and Times of Liberal Democracy *Rasminsky (B.A.)  3rd of the Bank of Canada, 196173, who helped form the postwar international finance system; executive director at the Monetary Fund and the Bank for Reconstruction and Development *Hodgetts (B.A.)  Political scientist who is regarded as the father of public administration studies in Canada*Easton (B.A. 1939)  Political scientist, renowned for his application of systems theory to science, former President of the Political Science Association, active member in the Academy of Arts and Sciences, A Framework for Political Analysis, A Systems Analysis of Political Life*Tarshis (B.A.)  Economist and educator, professor of economics at University, 19461970*Gordon Johnson (M.A. 1943)  Economist who focused on trade and finance, distinguished fellow of the Economic Association*Meisel (B.A., M.A.)  Political scientist, 103rd President of the Society of Canada, former Chairman of the Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission*Shubik (B.A. 1947, M.Sc. 1949)  Mathematical economist in  theory, Seymour H. Knox Professor Emeritus of Mathematical Institutional Economics at University*Lipsey (M.A. 1953)  Economist and educator, fellow of the Society of Canada and the Society, winner of the Prize, wrote Economics, of the Second Best *Cairns (B.A., 1953, M.A. 1957)  Political scientist, professor emeritus of political science at the of British Columbia, recipient of the Prize*Caplan (M.A.)  Canadian academic, public policy analyst, commentator and political activist, former political organizer for the Democratic Party*Clarkson (B.A. Trin., professor of political economy)  Political scientist, Senior Fellow at the CIGI, fellow of the Society of Canada *William Christian (B.A. 1966, M.A.)  Professor of political science at the of Guelph, author of biography on George Grant and Political Parties and Ideologies in Canada( )*Knight (B.A. 1967, professor of economics 197175)  Economist, vice-chairman of Bank, visiting professor of finance at the School of Economics, former General Manager of the for International Settlements, former Senior Deputy Governor of the of Canada*Cappe (B.A. 1971 New)  President and CEO of the for Research on Public Policy, 2006, High Commissioner to the United Kingdom, 200206*Kirton (B.A. 1971)  Political scientist specializing in Canadin foreign policy, the director and co-founder of the Research Group, Canadian Foreign Policy in a Changing World*A. Ross (B.A., M.A., Ph.D.)  Political scientist specializing in international relations, author of In the Interests of Peace: Canada and Vietnam, 19541973*Yack (B.A.)  American political theorist, The Problems of a Political Animal*Rubin (B.A.)  Economist and author, former economist at World Markets*Chong (M.A. 1978)  Canadian economist and writer, author of on Mao: The Story of an Ordinary Man Who Defaced an Icon and Unmasked a Dictatorship*Trefler (B.A. 1982, professor of economics 1997)  Economist specializing in economics, known for empirical research on patterns of trade*Martinsons (B.A.Sc. 1982, M.B.A. 1984)  professor of management; government advisor; international business consultant*Benjamin (B.Sc. 1984, professor of economics)  Economist, managing editor of Journal of Economics, editor of Development and Cultural Change*Andrew Pyle (B.A. 1987, M.A. 1988)  Economist, adviser with ScotiaMcLeod, former AMROs Chief Canadian Strategist*E. Zin (Ph.D. 1987)  Cyert and DeGroot Professor of Economics and Statistics at Mellon University, research associate at the Bureau of Economic Research, Medal recipient*Shi (M.A. 1988, Ph.D. 1991)  Economist, tier 1 Research Chair, research fellow at the of CanadaHumanitiesPhilosophy*Blewett (B.A. 1897 Vic.)  First native-born philosopher in Canada, authored The Study of Nature and The Vision of God*A. Goudge (Ph.D. 1937)  Philosopher, member of the Philosophical Association, President of the Canadian Philosophy Association in 1964, President of the Charles S. Peirce Society 1957 59, wrote The Ascent of Life, which won the Generals Award  *Glassen (B.A. 1944, M.A. 1945)  Philosopher, noted for his arguments against metaphysical materialism *Fackenheim (Ph.D. 1945)  Jewish philosopher and Reform rabbi*Joseph Owens (Ph.D. 1951)  Catholic priest, scholar in philosophy, fellow of the Society of Canada*James Robb (M.A., Ph.D. 1953)  Professor of philosophy at University, expert in philosophy*Gauthier (B.A. 1954)  Philosopher known for his contract theory of morality, author of by Agreement*Stroud (B.A.)  Willis S. and Mario Slusser Professor of Philosophy at the of California at Berkeley*Honderich (B.A. 1959)  Grote Professor Emeritus of the Philosophy of Mind and Logic at College London*Adelman (B.A. 1960, M.A. 1963, Ph.D. 1971)  Philosopher, retire Professor Emeritus of Philosophy at University *N. Deck (Ph.D. 1960)  Philosopher, known for Nature, Contemplation and the One*Goldstick (B.A. 1962, professor of philosophy)  Long-time member of the Central Committee of the Party of Canada, Professor Emeritus in philosophy at Toronto*W. Sumner (B.A. 1962)  Philosopher in normative and applied ethics and political philosophy, Fellow of the Society of Canada*William Hare (Ph.D. 1971)  Philosopher, noted for his work in of education, Professor Emeritus of Saint Vincent University*Neumann (Ph.D. 1975)  Political philosopher, Whats Left?, The Rule of Law*Normore (Ph.D. 1976)  Philosopher, an expert in Philosophy, past president of the Pacific division of the Philosophical Association, teaches at UCLA *Thagard (Ph.D. 1977)  Philosopher, former Chair of the Governing Board of the Science Society, fellow of the Society of Canada *Zwicky (Ph.D. 1981)  Philosopher, poet, essayist, winner of two Generals Awards*Kingwell (B.A. 1985 St. M., professor of philosophy)  Philosopher, winner of the Prize, contributing editor to Magazine and Globe and Mail*Blattberg (B.A.)  Professor of political philosophy at the de Montral*Russon (Ph.D. 1990)  Philosopher, known for his interpretations of W. F. Hegel, author of Human Experience and Bearing Witness to Epiphany.*Sztybel (Ph.D. 2000)  Ethicist specializing in animal ethicsLiterature*Campbell (B.A. 1882 U.C., M.A. 1883 Wyc.)  Poet*Connor (B.A. 1883, D.Th. Knox)  Novelist*Lampman (B.A. 1882 Trin.)  Early Canadian poet belonging to the Poets group*Leacock (B.A. 1891 U.C.)  Humorist, writer and political economist, Sketches of a Little Town*McCrae (B.A. 1894, M.B. 1898)  Poet, physician and soldier; Flanders Fields*J. Pratt (B.A. 1911 Vic., M.A. 1912, B.D. 1913)  Poet, the Society of Canada member, three Generals Awards, one Pierce Medal, the Last Spike *Bourinot (B.A. 1915 U.C.)  Poet, lawyer, won the Generals Award for Under the Sun*Hiebert (M.A.)  Writer and humorist, Leacock Medal for Humour recipient, Binks*Knister (B.A. Vic.)  Novelist, short story writer anc critic, My Star Predominant*Callaghan (B.A. 1925)  Novelist, writer and playwright*Birney (M.A., professor of English, 193641)  Poet, winner of two Generals Awards*Staebler (B.A. 1929, B.Ed. 1931)  Author, best known for a series of cookbooks, awarded the of Canada *Buckler (M.A. 1930)  Novelist and short story writer, awarded the Centennial Medal, The Mountain and the Valley*Livesay (B.A. 1931 Trin.)  Poet, winner of the Generals Award for Day and Night and Poems for People*Frye( (B.A. 1933 Vic.; professor of English 193991)  Literary critic and theorist; author, Fearful Symmetry, of Criticism, The Well-Tempered Critic *LePan (B.A. 1935)  Poet, novelist and academic, won two Generals Awards, one Pierce Medal, Fellow, The Deserter, The Net and the Sword *Waddington (B.A. 1939)  Poet, her poem Jacques Cartier in Toronto is on the back of the Canadian $100 bill released in 2004*Avison (B.A. 1940, M.A. 1965)  Poet, Poetry Prize recipient*George Elliott (B.A.)  Short Story writer, reporter and editor of the Daily Press *Kenner (B.A. 1945, M.A. 1946)  Literary scholar, critic and professor, taught at UC Santa Barbara, Johns Hopkins and Georgia, Dublins Joyce, The Poetry of Ezra Pound  *Kreisel (B.A. 1946, M.A. 1947)  Writer, officer of the of Canada, The Rich Man*Lochhead (M.A. 1947)  Poet, the Betocchi Poetry Prize recipient, Fellow of the Society of Canada*Gotlieb (B.A. 1948, M.A. 1950)  Science fiction novelist and poet, winner of the Award*Coles (B.A. 1949, M.A. 1952)  Poet, received the Generals Award and the Book Award*Walter Stewart (dropped out, 1953)  Writer, editor and educator of journalism*Adachi (B.A., M.A., professor of English 195871)  Writer and literary critic, The Enemy That Never Was*Outram (B.A. 1953 Vic.)  Poet*Macpherson (M.A. 1955, Ph.D. 1964, professor of literature, 195796)  Lyric poet and scholar, winner of the Generals Award, The boatman*Rod Anderson (B.Sc. 1956)  Poet, musician and accountant, member of the Canadian League of Poets*Mandel (Ph.D. 1957)  Poet and literary academic, winner of the Generals Award, An Idiot Joy*Symons (B.A.)  Writer, Place dArmes*Robert Colombo (B.A. 1959)  Poet, anthologist, editor, essayist, Canada, Maurice Bucke*Clarke (B.A.)  Novelist, essayist and short story writer, Prize and Writers Prize winner, Polished Hoe*Pratt (B.A. Vic.)  Poet, artist, editor, senior editor of & Stewart*Callaghan (B.A. 1960 St.M., M.A. 1962)  Author, poet, son of Callaghan*Helwig (B.A. 1960)  Poet, novelist and essayist, professor of literature at University, member of the of Canada*Godfrey (B.A. Trin.)  Writer and publisher, won the Generals Award for his novel The New Ancestors*Sheila Watson (Ph.D. 1961 St.M.)  Novelist, critic and educator, the Pierce Medal recipient, Double Hook*Atwood (B.A. 1961 Vic.)  Writer, poet and novelist; Handmaids Tale, Blind Assassin;  recipient of one of Asturias Award, one C. Clarke Award, five Prizes and two Generals Awards*Dennis Lee (B.A. 1962, M.A. 1965)  Childrens writer and poet, Pie*Eric Wright (M.A. 1963)  Writer of mystery novels, Ellis Award, of Toronto Book Award and Derrick Murdoch Award recipient*Matt Cohen (B.A. 1964, M.A. 1965)  Writer, recipient of the Generals Award, and After, Arithmetic*Ondaatje (B.A. 1965 U.C.)  Poet and novelist, English Patient; recipient of the Prize*Fielding (B.A. 1966)  Novelist and actress, Mommy Goodbye, Jane Run *Cole (M.A.)  Contemporary American poet, visual artist and frequent translator, Mace Hill Remap, Do the Monkey *Staines (B.A. 1967)  Literary critic and university professor, taught at several institutions including Harvard, Pierce Medal recipient, fellow of the Society of Canada*Visser (Ph.D.)  Writer, broadcaster, Award and Grigson Award recipient, The Geometry of Love: Space, Time, Mystery and Meaning in an Ordinary Church  *Hutcheon (B.A. 1969, Ph.D. 1975; professor of literature, 1988)  Former president of the Language Association*Susan Wood (B.A. 1969, M.A. 1970, Ph.D. 1975)  Author and critic, recipient of three Hugo Awards for Best Fan Writer, co-publisher of Energumen *Brewster (B.LSc.)  Poet and academic, member of the of Canada*Hollingshead (B.A.)  Novelist, winner of the Generals Award for his short fiction The Roaring Girl*Steffler (B.A. 1971)  Poet and novelist, recipient of the Head Raddall Award and the Poetry Prize, former Parliamentary Poet Laureate *Gilmour (B.A. 1972, B.Ed., M.A. Vic.)  Novelist and television journalist, winner of the Generals Award, Perfect Night to Go to China, Film Club  *Tefs (M.A.)  Novelist, critic and anthologist, recipient of the Canadian Magazine Fiction Prize for Red Rock and After*T. Kelly (M.A.)  Novelist, poet and playwright, the Generals Award recipient, A Dream Like Mine*Carson (B.A. 1974 St.M., M.A. 1975, Ph.D. 1981)  Poet, essayist and translator; professor of classics at the of Michigan*de Kerckhove (Ph.D. 1975, professor of French)  Theorist on Western civilization, literacy and society; former Director, Marshall McLuhan Program; The Skin of Culture*Brand (B.A., M.A., Ph.D)  Poet, novelist, Fellow of the Society of Canada, Laureate of Toronto for a three-year term*Gavriel Kay (LL.B. 1976)  Author of fantasy fiction, Fionavar Tapestry*Brandt (M.A.)  Poet and literary critic, recipient of the Lampert Award, juror of the Governor Generals Awards*Quarrington (B.A.)  Novelist and playwright, winner of Leacock Award, Generals Award and Cohen Prize, Leary, Music, Spirit Cabinet *Mighton (B.A. 1978 Vic., Ph.D. 2000)  Author and mathematician, winner of two Generals Awards, Possible Worlds*Gavriel Kay (LL.B. 1978)  Author of fantasy fiction, winner of Award, Wandering Fire, Tigana, Last Light of the Sun*Glickman (Ph.D., professor of English, 1993)  Writer and critic, received several prizes such as the Gabrielle Roy Prize *Michaels (B.A. 1980)  Poet and novelist; Prize, Prize recipient *W. Powe (M.A. 1981)  Author, poet, essayist *Ackerman (M.A. 1981)  Playwright, novelist, journalist, theatre critic for Gazette, the Nathan Cohen Award winner *Foran (B.A. St.M.)  Novelist and non-fiction writer, contribution editor to Walrus, contributing reviewer for Globe and Mail*Mistry (B.A. 1982)  Author, Generals Award, Writers Prize and Prize recipient, Such a Long Journey and Fine Balance*Manicom (B.A.)  Poet, novelist and diplomat, a finalist for the 2004 Generals Award for English language poetry*Fradkin (M.A.)  Mystery writer, two-time winner of the Ellis Award for Best Novel, past president of Writers of Canada*Redhill (B.A.)  Poet, playwright, novelist, publisher and editor of Brick*Oppel (B.A. Trin.)  Author, the Generals Literary Award recipient, Silverwing, Airborn, Skybreaker*Gibb (B.A. 1991 U.C.)  Author, Mouthing the Words and Sweetness in the Belly*Ruth (B.A., M.A.)  Novelist, Ten Good Seconds of Silence*Archer (B.A. St.M.)  Author, journalist, and critic, former editor of Star, Globe and Mail, columnist of Life*Pyper (LL.B.)  Writer of fiction, winner of the Ellis Award for Lost Girls*Niedzviecki (B.A.)  Novelist and cultural critic, co-founder of the magazine Pencil*Crosbie (Ph.D., professor of literature)  Poet and novelist, columnist for Globe and Mail*Lam (M.D. 1999)  Writer and medical doctor, recipient of the Prize, and Miraculous Cures *Gilbert (M.A. 2000)  Writer, actor, academic and performer, appeared in Much Sex*Heti (B.A.)  Writer, Ticknor, The Middle Stories*Rosenblum (M.A. 2007)  Author, a Prize finalistHistory*John George Bourinot (dropped out)  Historian and civil servant, founding member of the Society of Canada, creator of the Rules of Order*T. Shotwell (B.A. 1898)  History professor at University, president of the Endowment for International Peace, member of the Francisco Conference that drafted the Nations Charter*R. M. Lower (B.A.)  Historian, recipient of two Generals Awards, former president of the Society of Canada*Underhill (M.A., professor of history)  Historian, social critic and political thinker, a founder of the Commonwealth Federation, In Search of Canadian Liberalism*P. Stacey (B.A. 1924)  Official historian of the Army in the World War; contributor to the study of the Raid and Spring*Creighton (B.A. 1925 Vic.; professor of history, 194579)  Historian, novelist and noted anglophile, author of Commercial Empire of the St. Lawrence*Bliss (B.A., M.A., Ph.D., professor)  Medical, business and political historian, author of The Discovery of Insulin, William Osler: A Life in Medicine and Harvey Cushing: A Life in Surgery*Lange (M.A. 1931 U.C.)  Renowned Germanist; president of the International Society of Germanists, John M. Woodhull Professor of Modern Languages at University*Wendell Holmes (M.A. 1933)  Historian and diplomat, former president of the Institute of International Affairs, recipient of the B. Tyrrell Historical Medal*Bailey (Ph.D. 1934)  Ethno-historian and educator, former assistant director and associate curator of the Brunswick Museum, fellow of the Society of Canada  *M. S. Careless (B.A. 1940)  Historian and biographer, two-time winner of the Generals Award*Kilbourn (B.A. Trin. 1948)  Historian, member of the executives of the Council and the Canadian commission for UNESCO, fellow of the Society of Canada*Clarkson (B.A. 1959 Trin.)  Political scientist specializing in foreign policy, neoconservatism, globalization and North American integration; Generals Award winner*Granatstein (M.A. 1962)  Historian, winner of the Tyrrell Historical Medal, Award  *Abella (B.A. 1963, M.A. 1964, Ph.D. 1969)  Historian, writer, is Too Many: Canada and the Jews of Europe 1933-1948, fellow of the Society of Canada *Horn (M.A., Ph.D.)  Historian and educator, fellow of the Society of Canada*Eksteins (B.A. Trin., professor of history 1970)  Historian, winner of the Book Award and the Writers Trust Non-Fiction Prize, Rites of Spring: The Great War, The Birth of Modern Age*Bothwell (B.A., professor of Canadian history 1981)  Historian, best known for his work on Canadian War participation *Hillmer (B.A. 1966, M.A. 1967)  Historian and educator, For Better or For Worse: Canada and the United States to the l990s*Bercuson (M.A. 1967, Ph.D. 1971)  Labour, military and political historian, Award winner, fellow of the Society of Canada, Deconfederation: Canada without Quebec  *Conrad (M.A. 1968, Ph.D. 1979)  Historian specializing in Canada and history, recipient of the Golden Jubilee Medal, fellow of the Society of Canada*Strong-Boag (B.A. 1970, Ph.D. 1975)  Historian, former president of the Historical Association, fellow of the Society of Canada*R. D. Goulet (LL.M.)  Mtis best-selling author and retired lawyer *Sweeny (B.A. Trin.)  Historian, author and publisher, wrote Cartier: A Biography*Sarty (B.A.)  Historian specializing in the history of Canadas navy and coastal defence *Brune (B.A. 1975, M.A. 1976, B.Ed. 1977)  Educator, historian and author, winner of the Generals Award for Excellence in Teaching Canadian History*R. Bartlett (Ph.D. 1978, professor of history)  Renaissance historian, president of the Canadian Society for Renaissance Studies *Cooper (Ph.D.)  Historian and poet, Memories Have Tongue, The Hanging of Angelique*Imre (B.A. 2005)  Historian, political scientist and public servant at the Research Council of CanadaLaw (excluding the Supreme Court judges mentioned above)*Arnup (B.A. 1932 Vic.)  Judge of the of Appeal for Ontario, 197085, best known for having pioneered universal aid in Ontario*Bayefsky (B.A., M.A., LL.B.)  Human rghts scholar and activist, senior fellow at the Institute, teaches at University*Dubin (B.A. 1941)  Justice of Ontario, 199096, best known for leading the Dubin Inquiry into the use of steroids by athletes*Ducharme (LL.B. 1986)  First Mtis to be appointed to the Superior Court of Justice*Glenholme Falconbridge (B.A. 1866 U.C., M.A. 1870)  Chief Justice of Superior Court of Justice, 190020 *Friedland (B.Comm. 1955, LL.B. 1958)  Lawyer, academic and author; recipient of the Prize in 1994*Alexander Gale (B.A. 1929)  Justice of Ontario, 196476*Hibbitts (LL.M. 1986)  Lawyer, professor and publisher, founder and publisher of JURIST, teaches at the of Pittsburgh School of Law*Goldwin Carrington Howland (B.A. 1936)  Justice of Ontario, 197792*Kaplan (B.A. 1980)  Lawyer and writer, professor of law at the of Ottawa Law School, 19892001  *Moran (S.J.D. 1999, dean of the faculty of law, 2006)  Law professor who published extensively in comparative law, law, and legal and theory*Ed Morgan (LL.B. 1984), Professor of International Law at the of Toronto*Roach (B.A. 1984 Vic., LL.B. 1987, professor of law)  Legal academic noted for his writings on law, former clerk to Justice Wilson of the Supreme Court  *Ruby (LL.B. 1969)  Lawyer, specializing in constitutional and criminal law and civil rights, former acting Treasurer of the Society of Upper Canada*Sharpe (LL.B. 1970, dean of the faculty of law, 199095)  Judge of the of Appeal for Ontario.(), 1999, patron of the University Commonwealth Law Journal.()*Marshall Tory (B.A.)  Chair Emeritus and Counsel at LLP*A. Tory (B.A., LL.B. 1952)  Co-founder of the law firm, Tory, Tory, Deslauriers, a director of Communications*S. D. Tory  Founder of LLP, a director of A.V. Roe Canada*Waddams (B.A., professor of law)  Legal academic specializing in law, former Visiting Fellow at Souls College, Oxford, Fellow of the Society of CanadaTheology*Burwash (B.A. 1859 Vic.)  Methodist minister and university administrator*Benjamin Simpson (B.Th. 1865 Knox)  Preacher, theologian and author, founder of the and Missionary Alliance*Coughlin (B.A. 1911 St.M.)  Religious and political speaker, noted radio opponent of D. Roosevelt*Baird McClure (M.B. 1922)  23rd of the United Church of Canada, 196871*Harpur (B.A. 1951 U.C., D.Th. 1956 Wyc.)  Theologian, author and columnist, former religion editor of the Star, recipient of a State of Israel Silver Medal for Outstanding Journalism, fellow of the American Religious Public Relations Council  *Hutchison (L.Th. 1969 Trin.)  of the Anglican Church of Canada, 200407, Bishop of Montreal, 19902004*James Reimer (M.A., Ph.D. St.M.)  Mennonite theologian, Mennonites and Classical Theology*Reinhartz (B.A. 1975, M.A. 1977)  Theologian, former president of the Canadian Society of Biblical Studies, fellow of the Society of Canada*Jo Leddy (Ph.D.)  Theologian, writer and social activist, founding editor of the New Times, former member of the Catholic Sisters of Our Lady of Sion*Rosica (D.Th. 1985 Regis)  Catholic priest and Basilian Father, CEO of Canadian Catholic + Light Television network*Turcescu (Ph.D. 1999)  Theologian, professor of theology at Concordia UniversityMedia and artsJournalism and publishing*James Ross (B.A. 1857, M.A. 1865)  Journalist, lawyer, member of the government established by Riel during the River Rebellion of 18691870*Albert Harper (B.A. 1895)  Journalist and civil servant, the statue of Galahad at Hill was built in honour of him *C. Newman (B.A. 1950 Vic., M.Comm. 1954)  Journalist; former editor, Macleans and Star; author, Canadian Establishment, Secret Mulroney Tapes*Landsberg (B.A. 1952)  Writer, social activist and feminist, columnist for the Star, recipient of the Generals Award*Walter Stewart (dropped out)  Writer, editor and journalism educator, Canadas conscience *McCall (B.A. 1956 Vic.)  Journalist and political writer, journalist at Globe and Mail, Saturday Night and Macleans, senior editor at Chatelaine*Frum (B.A. 1959)  Prolific journalist and interviewer for the Broadcasting Corporation, host of The Journal*Amiel (B.A. 1963 U.C.)  British journalist, socialite, spouse of publishing mogul Black*Kesterton (B.A.)  Columnist for Globe and Mail*Honderich (B.A.)  Publisher of the Star, 19942004*Wente (M.A.)  Columnist for Globe and Mail, winner of two National Newspaper Awards for column*Tesher (B.A.)  Journalist and advice columnist for the Star*McQuaig (B.A.)  Journalist, columnist and non-fiction author, business reporter at Globe and Mail, columnist for the Star*Fuller (B.A. 1977 U.C.)  Media executive, editorial director of American Media and editor of Flare, Cosmopolitan, YM, Claire, Glamour and Weekly. *Mallick (B.A. U.C., M.A.)  Columnist for Chatelaine, Guardian and Globe and Mail*Ibbitson (B.A. 1979)  Writer and journalist, columnist for Globe and Mail*Coyne (B.A. Trin.)  National editor for Macleans, former columnist with the Post*Matthew Fraser (B.A. 1981 Vic.)  Editor-in-chief, Post*Pike (B.A. Trin.)  Publisher of the Star 200608, President of Media Group*Gladwell (B.A. 1984 Trin.)  Journalist; staff writer for Washington Post and New Yorker; author of Tipping Point, Blink and Outliers*Vincent (B.A.)  Investigative journalist for the Post*Klein (B.A. 1995)   Journalist and activist; author, Logo; contributor to The Nation, Globe and Mail and Guardian*Dillon Riddell (B.A. 1997 St.M.)  Award winning Broadcast Journalist*Joffe-Walt (B.Ed. 2003)   Writer, CNN Africa Print Journalist of the Year*Pulsifer (B.A. 2004 Vic.)  Prolific contributor to Wikipedia under the username SimonP*North (M.Sc. 2005)  Webcomic authorFilm, television and theatre*Shuster (B.A. 1939 U.C.)  Comedian, member of the comedy duo & Shuster*Wayne (B.A. 1940 U.C.)  Comedian, member of the comedy duo & Shuster*Hiller (B.A. 1947 U.C., M.A. 1950)  Film director, Man in the Glass Booth, Silver Streak*Yost (B.A. 1948)  Television host, hosted Passport to Adventure series, Shadows and Night at the Movies*William Hutt (B.A. 1948 Trin.)  Actor of stage, television and film, Lear, Days Journey into Night, Wanamaker Prize recipient*Wesley Johnson (M.PA.)  President of the Broadcasting Corporation, 19751982*Jewison (B.A. 1949 Vic.)  Film director, In the Heat of the Night, Fiddler on the Roof, Moonstruck*Patrick Watson (M.A.)  Broadcaster and television writer, Titans, Watson Report, Canadian Establishment, Minutes*Kotcheff (B.A. 1952)  Film and television director, Blood, & Order: Special Victims Unit*Major (B.A. 1955)  Opera and theatre director, artistic director of Lyric Opera, 19982003*Gzowski (dropped out)  Broadcaster, writer and reporter, the CBS radio show Morningside*Sutherland (B.A. 1958 Vic.)  Actor, Dirty Dozen, M*A*S*H (film), People, JFK*B. Davis (B.A. 1959)  Actor, known for his role as the Smoking Man on The X-Files*Michaels (B.A. 1966 U.C.)  Creator and producer  of Night Live*Cronenberg (B.A. 1967 U.C.)  Film director, Videodrome, The Fly, A History of Violence*Hanson (B.A.)  American television writer and producer, Bones, of Arcadia *Stohn (J.D. 1977)  Entertainment lawyer and television producer, President of Pictures, The Next Generation, Star*Mann (B.A. 1980 Innis)  Documentary filmmaker, the Sound, Grass*Yost (B.A. 1980 Trin.)  Screenwriter, Speed, to Mars*Egoyan (B.A. 1982 Trin.)  Film director, Sweet Hereafter, the Truth Lies*Shore (LL.B. 1982)  Television screenwriter, House, & Order*Hiscox (B.A. 1986)  News anchor who works for the Broadcasting Corporation, host of News: Morning*Rowswell (B.A. 1988 U.C.)  Media personality, one of the best-known Western performers in China*Long (B.A. 1992 U.C.)  Comedy screenwriter, Simpsons, Incorrect, Magazine, Late Show with David Letterman*Chi-ling (B.A.)  Taiwanese actress and model, Red Cliff*Sung (B.A. 2000 Trin.)  Television and radio broadcaster, journalist, a former MuchMusic VJ*Perlmutter (M.B.A.)  Government Film Commissioner and Chair of the Film Board of Canada()Music, fine arts and architecture*Parmenter (B.A. 1933 Trin.)  Music editor for New York Times, expert on indigenous Mexican culture*John Beckwith (B.Mus. 1947, M.Mus 1961, professor of music)  Composer, writer and pianist,  written over 130 compositions, Member of the of Canada *Iseler (B.Mus. 1950)  Conductor of the Mendelssohn Choir and founder of the Singers of Canada*Moriyama (B.Arch. 1954)  Architect, winner of the Generals Award in Visual and Media Arts*Stratas (Art Dip. Mus. 1959)  Soprano opera singer with the Opera*Shaffer (B.A. 1971 U.C.)  Leader of the Orchestra for Late Show with David Letterman, former musical director of Night Live, co-writer of Raining Men*Boyd (B.Mus. 1972)  Classical guitarist*Kuwabara (B.Arch. 1972)  Architect, partner in the firm Kuwabara Payne McKenna Blumberg Architects (KPMB), recipient of the RAIC 2006 Gold Medal*J. Elliott (B.Mus., M.Mus., B.Ed.)  Professor of music at York University, Music Matters: A New Philosophy of Music Education*Sky (B.Mus. 1982)  Singer, songwriter and actor*Danna (B.Mus. 1986, B.Ed. 1987)  Film composer, Hearts in Atlantis, Capote*Pieczonka (B.Mus. 1988)  Soprano opera singer, received the title Kammersngerin from the Austrian government, officer of the of Canada*McCarthy (B.A. 1989 UTSC)  Artist, known for her landscape paintings*Maida (dropped out)  Vocalist of the Canadian rock band Lady Peace*Bayrakdarian (B.A.Sc. 1997)  Opera singer*MacDonald (B.A. U.C.)  Playwright, musician and writer, member of the indie pop band Hidden Cameras *Brueggergosman (B.Mus. 1999)  Concert artist and opera singerEducation*Lincoln McCrimmon (B.A. 1890)  Chancellor of University, 191122*E. MacKenzie (B.A., LL.B. 1893)  Chancellor of the of Saskatchewan, 194046*Currie (dropped out)  President and Vice Chancellor of University, 192033*Alexander Robb Kerr (B.A. 1899, M.A. 1901)  President of the of Alberta, 193641*Wentworth Beatty (B.A.)  Chancellor of University, 192142, Chancellor of University, 191823*P. Thompson (B.A. 1910)  President of the of Saskatchewan, 194959*Shrum (B.A. 1919 Vic., M.A. 1921, Ph.D. 1923)  Chancellor of Fraser University, 196468   *Porter (B.A. 1921)  Chancellor of the of Waterloo, 196066 *John Lowe (B.A. 1922 Trin.)  Vice-Chancellor of the University of Oxford, 194851, Dean of Church, Oxford, 193959*Josiah Robinette (B.A. 1926)  Chancellor of University, 198487*Hillen Kerr (B.A.Sc. 1926)  President of University, 194866*Pollock (B.Eng.)  Chancellor of the of Waterloo, 197578*G. Ross (M.A. 1938)  President of University, 195970*Gunning (B.A., M.A., Ph.D. 1942)  President of the of Alberta, 197479*Wei-zang (Ph.D. 1942)  President of University, 1982*Matthews (B.A.Sc. 1947)  President of the of Guelph, 198388, President of the of Waterloo, 197081*Kates (B.A. 1948, M.A. 1949, Ph.D. 1951)  Chancellor of the of Waterloo, 197985 *Arthur Cochrane (M.D. 1949)  President of the of Calgary, 197478*Tyndall Wright (B.A.Sc. 1949)  President of the of Waterloo, 198193*Connell (B.A. 1951, Ph.D. 1955)  President of the of Western Ontario, 197784*Symons (B.A. 1951)  President and vice-chancellor of University, 196172 *Lampman Watts (B.A. 1952 Trin.)  Principal of University, 197484*Ian Macdonald (B.Comm. 1952)  President of University, 197484*Pitman (B.A. 1952, M.A. 1954)  President of University, 197580*Winegard (Ph.D. 1952)  President of the of Guelph, 196775*Arthurs (B.A. 1955, LL.B. 1958)  President of University, 198592*Strangway (B.A. 1956, M.A., Ph.D. 1960, 11th President)  President of University, 200207, President of the of British Columbia, 198597*Forster (B.A.)  President of the of Guelph, 197583*Wagner (M.A. 1960, Ph.D. 1965)  President of the of Calgary, 197888 *Peter George (B.A. 1962, M.A. 1963, Ph.D. 1967)  President of University, 1995*Mann (B.A. 1963)  President of University, 199297 *Birgeneau (B.Sc. 1963)  Chancellor of the of California, Berkeley, 2004()*MacMillan (B.A. 1966 Trin.)  Warden of Antonys College, Oxford, 2007*Szathmry (B.A. St.M., Ph.D.)  President of the of Manitoba, 19972008 *Marsden (B.A. 1968)  President of University, 19972007, President of Laurier University, 199297*Davenport (M.A. 1970, Ph.D. 1976)  President of the of Western Ontario, 1994()*W. Higgins (B.Ed. 1973)  President of St Thomas University*Owram (Ph.D. 1976)  Provost and Vice-President of the of Alberta, 19982003*J. Daniels (B.A. 1982, J.D. 1986; dean of law)  President of Hopkins University, 2009; Provost of the of Pennsylvania, 200509*Joseph Cassidy (S.T.B., M.Div. 1986 Regis)  Principal of St Chads College, Durham, 1997Business*R. MacMillan (B.Sc. 1906 OAC)  Founder of the H.R. MacMillan Export Company, Ltd, Chairman of the Board of Trade, 1933*Koffler (Phm.B. 1946)  Founder of Drug Mart*Arthur Cochrane (M.D. 1949)  Chairman, President and CEO of Laboratories Limited, 197889, President of the of Calgary, 197478*Munk (B.A.Sc. 1952)  Founder and Chairman of Gold*Robert Evans (M.D. 1952)  Former President of Torstar*Dan (B.Sc. 1954)  Founder of Novopharm*Samuel Rogers (B.A. 1956 Trin.)  Former President and CEO of Communications*A. Cohen (B.A.)  President and CEO of Molson, 198896*M. Thomson (B.A.Sc.)  Chairman and CEO of Bank, 197897*Godsoe (B.Sc. 1961 Vic.)  President and CEO of of Nova Scotia, 19922003; Chairman of Hotels and Resorts and Sobeys, Chancellor of the of Western Ontario, 19962000*Charles Baillie (B.A. 1962 Trin.)  Chief executive of Bank, 19972002, President of University, 200208*Sherman (B.A.Sc. 1964)  Founder, Chairman and CEO of Inc., 1974*Anthony Comper (B.A. 1966 St.M.)  President and CEO of of Montreal, 19902007*A. Galloway (B.A. 1966)  Chairman of of Montreal, 2004, President and CEO of Torstar, 19882002, President and CEO of Enterprises, 198388*Brenneman (B.Eng. 1968)  President and CEO of Petro-Canada, 2005*Edmund Clark (B.A. 1969)  President and CEO of Bank, 2002*Kempston Darkes (B.A. 1970 Vic., LL.B. 1973)  President of Motors Latin America, Africa and Middle East *Sproule (M.B.A. 1971)  CFO of York Life Insurance Company(New York Life Elects Michael Sproule to CFO post) *Fung (B.A.Sc. 1971, M.B.A. 1973)  Chairman and CEO of Hang Bank(Fung) *Marchionne (B.A. U.C.)  CEO of Fiat S.p.A. and Chrysler Group, 2009, Chairman of Automobile Manufacturers Association, 2006*Prichard (LL.B. 1975)  President of Torstar, 2001 (13th of the University of Toronto as well)*Orsino (B.A. 1976 Vic.)  President and CEO of Masonite International Corporation, 19892005*Peters (M.A. 1977)  CEO of Science Centre, 2000*Swift (B.A. 1977)  President and CEO of the Federation of Independent Business, 1995 *Downe (M.B.A. 1978)  President and CEO of of Montreal, 2007 *M. Cassaday (M.B.A. 1981)  President and CEO of Entertainment(Great Minds)*Ian Bennett (M.A.)  President and CEO of Canadian Mint, 2006*Tsaparis (B.Sc. UTSC)  President and CEO of Packard Canada(*di Massimo (B.Comm. UTM 1982)  Vice-President and CFO of Rhodia Canada(*Adelman (B.A. Political Science & History) - President and Chief Operating Officer of GoDaddy.com()*Balsillie (B.Comm. 1984 Trin.)  Co-chief executive of In Motion, 1992*Nesbitt (M.B.A. 1985)  CEO of World Markets, 2008, CEO of the Group, which operates the Stock Exchange and the Venture Exchange, 200408;*Dibb (M.B.A. 1987)  Chief administrative officer of PLC(Rotman Alumni Leaders)*Skoll (B.A.Sc. 1987)  First President of eBay, philanthropist *Cooper (M.B.A. 1988)  President and COO of the Hotel Company*Zalzal (B.A.Sc. 1988)  Founder and President of Cargo(Hana Zalzal, engineering grad creates make-up for the stars)*Asper (LL.B. 1989)  President and chief executive of Global Communications*Charles Foster (M.B.A. 1989)  Managing director of Capital *Sabourin (M.B.A. 1990)  President and CEO of the Deposit Insurance Corporation(*Noss (B.A. UTSC)  President and CEO of Tucows(Humanitarianism, social work and others*Solandt (M.D.)  First Chairman of the Canadian Research Board, 194756, vice president for research and development at National Railways, 195663*Wolfe (B.A. 1938, diploma in social work 1939)  Member of the of Ontario since 1992, and of the of Canada since 1999*Cohen (M.A. 1945)  Community builder and philanthropist, member of the of Canada *Golden (B.A. 1962 U.C.)  Administrator, President of the Way of Canada, 19872001, former President and CEO of the Board of Canada*Freiman (B.A. 1969, J.D. 1983)  President of the Jewish Congress, Deputy Attorney-General of Ontario and Deputy Minister Responsible for Native Affairs, 200004 *Ezrin (B.A.)  Chief Executive Officer of the Council for Israel and Jewish Advocacy*Paul Fromm (B.A. St.M., B.Ed., M.A.)  Activist, an alleged Canadian neo-Nazi leader with ties to the Klux Klan*Weinberger (Ph.D.)  American technologist, professional speaker and commentator, co-author of Cluetrain Manifesto and author of Pieces Loosely Joined*McLaren (B.Ed., Ph.D.)  One of the key figures in pedagogy, professor of education at the of California at Los Angeles*Gopie (B.A. 1975, M.Ed. 1990)  Political activist best known for her community activism in Toronto, president of the Canadian Association, 197980*Rancourt (M.Sc. 1981, Ph.D. 1984)  Former physics professor, scientist, academic dissident, anarchist and activist*Griffiths (B.A. 1993 Trin.)  Public commentator and adviser, co-founder of the Institute, author of We Are: A Citizens Manifesto  *Kibria (B.A. 2006 UTM)  Anti-poverty advocate; executive director of Relief Canada(From One Woman: Story of Shaila Kibria)*Kielburger (B.A. 2006 Trin.)  Childrens rights advocate; founder and chair of The Children*Singh (attended Trin.)  Anti-globalization and justice activistAthletics*Smythe (B.A.Sc. 1920)  NHL builder; principal owner of the Maple Leafs, 192761; builder of the Leaf Gardens*Stan Brown (D.M.D. 1922)  Defenceman for the York Rangers and the Detroit Cougars*Hunter  College ice hockey, lacrosse, and soccer coach at Cornell, Yale, West Point, and Harvard*Albert Sullivan (M.D. 1926)   Ice hockey player, surgeon and politician; goaltender on the gold medalist hockey team at the Winter Olympics*Kidd (B.A. 1965)  Medalist in the British Empire and Commonwealth Games and competitor in the Summer Olympics*Dupuis (B.A. St.M.)  Ice hockey player on gold medal winning Winter Olympics team *Buttle (B.Eng. on hiatus)  Figure skater, 2008 World Figure Skating Champion and Winter Olympics bronze medalistPaul Poirier - Firgure Skater (2010 Olympics), B.A. 2014, LinguisticsFacultyTo avoid redundancy, alumni who hold or have held faculty positions in the University of Toronto are placed on the list of alumni, and do not appear on this list of faculty.  Natural sciences and mathematicsMathematics*Lighton Synge (assistant professor of mathematics, 192025)  Irish mathematician, member of the Mathematical Society, former treasurer of the Irish Academy*Scott MacDonald Coxeter (professor of mathematics, 193680)  Geometer with major contributions in polytopes, non-Euclidean geometry, group theory and combinatorial theory, for whom the group is named*T. Tutte (professor of mathematics, 194862)  Mathematician and cryptographer who deduced the German SZ 40/42 (Tunny) machine; namesake of the theorem, matrix, graph, graph, 12-cage and fragment.*Robinson (professor of mathematics, 195157)  Mathematician who developed analysis*Davis (professor of mathematics, 1962)  Mathematician, writer and educator, one of the co-Editors-in-Chief of the Intelligencer*Heilbronn (professor of mathematics, 196475)  Mathematician who devised the Davenport-Heilbronn method*Warwick Sawyer (professor of mathematics, 196576)  Mathematician, known for his semi-popular works in Mathematicians Delight*Lionel Cooper (professor of mathematics, 196566)  South African mathematician who worked in various fields including theory, theory and equations *Klawe (professor of mathematics)  Mathematician, Fellow of the for Computing Machinery*Milman (professor of mathematics, 1986)  Mathematician, Fellow of the Society of Canada, recipient of the Prize*Bar-Natan (professor of mathematics, 2002)  Researcher in theory, type invariants and homologyMedicine and dentistry*James Richard Macleod (professor of physiology, 191828)  Physician and physiologist; recipient of the Nobel Prize for the discovery of insulin*Botterell (professor of neurophysiology, 193639)  Neurosurgeon, Head of neurosurgery at the General Hospital, 195362*Siminovitch (professor of medical genetics and microbiology, 195685)  Molecular biologist; founding director of research at Lunenfeld Research Institute; foreign associate to the National Academy of Sciences*Till (professor of medical biophysics, 195897)  Biophysicist; academic on research ethics and the Access movement*Hollenberg (professor of medicine, 197081)  Physician, educator and resarcher, former Physician-in-Chief of the General Hospital*V. Levine (professor of psychiatry, 197093)  Psychiatrist, former Senior Psychiatrist at the for Sick Children*Buchwald (professor of molecular and medical genetics, 197386)  Geneticist who identified the gene that causes anemia and, with Tsui, that which causes fibrosis*MacLennan (professor of medicine, 1974)  Biochemist who made fundamental contributions to our understanding of the mechanism of ion transport by SR calcium pumps*Wah Mak (professor of medical biophysics, 1975)  Immunologist who discovered the T-Cell receptor, and was the first to clone the genes for the receptor*Greenblatt (professor of molecular medicine, 1977)  Pioneer in research on protein-protein interactions and on mechanisms that regulate gene expression*E. David (professor of surgery, 1980)  Cardiovascular surgeon who developed the reimplantation technique for aortic root replacement*Buckman (professor of medicine, 1985)  Medical oncologist and comedian; president of the Association of Canada*Rossant (professor of medical genetics, 1985)  Developmental biologist known for research in the role of genes in early embryo development *Pawson (professor of molecular and medical genetics, 1985)  Microbiologist specializing in mechanisms for protein-protein interactions in intracellular signal transduction*John E. Dick (professor of molecular genetics)  Scientist who first identified the stem cell in leukemia and later cancer; also known for demonstrations with blood stem cells in mice*St. George-Hyslop (professor of medicine, 1991)  Geneticist who isolated the key genes linked to inherited and early-onset forms of disease*Beiser (professor of cultural pluralism and health, 19912009)  Psychiatrist and epidemiologist, noted for his research in immigration and resettlement*Teebi (professor of pediatrics and medical genetics, 1998)  Head of the Section of Clinical Genetics & Dysmorphology at the for Sick Children*Alman (professor of surgery)  Orthopaedic surgeon and researcher in developmental signaling pathways in musculoskeletal tumours*J. Conboy (professor of dentistry)  47th of Toronto, secretary of the Dental Association and editor of the associations journal*Jaffray (associate professor of radiation physics)  physicist, Senior Scientist in the Division of Biophysics and Bioimaging at the Cancer Institute*J. Jenkins (professor of nutritional sciences)  Nutritionist who developed the concept of index (GI)*Koren (professor of pediatrics, pharmacology and pharmacy)  Pediatrician, clinical pharmacologist and toxicologist, Senior Scientist of the Institutes of Health Research*W. Semple (professor of pharmacology)  Medical researcher at St. Michaels Hospital, co-discoverer of immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP)*Skinner (former professor and dean of public health sciences)  Psychologist. Dean of Health, University since 2006. One of the first to link behaviour change, organizational improvement and technology (e-health)Physics, chemistry and astronomy*Sawyer Hogg (professor of astronomy, 193676)  Astronomer; authority in the field of stars within clusters*Infeld (professor of physics, 193950)  Physicist and peace activist; co-formulated the equation describing star movements and co-author of Evolution of Physics with Einstein*Montgomery Pidgeon (professor of metallurgy, 194369)  Chemist who developed the process of magnesium metal production via a silicothermic reduction*McKellar (visiting professor of physics, 195253)  Astronomer noted for his work in molecular spectroscopy, former president of the Society of the Pacific and the Astronomical Society of Canada  *Charles Polanyi (professor of chemistry, 1956)  Physical chemist credited with developing the technique of infrared chemiluminescence to explain energy relationships in chemical reactions*van den Bergh (professor of astronomy, 195877)  Astronomer who discovered II; former president of the Astronomical Society*West Brewer (professor of physics, 196277)  Physicist and climatologist, whose observation of the stratosphere resulted in the circulation model*Franklin (professor of metallurgy and materials science, 196589)  Physicist who pioneered use of modern techniques of material analysis in archaeometry; pacifist and humanitarian since retirement*Prugovecki (professor of physics, 196797)  Mathematical physicist in geometro-stochastic theory*K. Logan (professor of physics, 19682005)  Physicist and media ecologist, best known for his research in media ecology and the evolution of language, The Alphabet Effect  *Thomas Bolton (professor of astronomy, 1973)  Astronomer who was the first to present evidence of a holes existence in X-1, later confirmed as the first black hole candidate*Tremaine (professor of astronomy, 198597)  Astrophysicist and contributor to the theory of solar system and galactic dynamics; first director of the Institute for Theoretical Astrophysics*John (professor of physics, 1989)  Together with Yablonovitch, identified crystals as a class of materials designed to affect the motion of photons*Lidar (associate professor of chemistry, 200005)  Chemist and physicist, known for his research on control of systems and information processing*John Moffat (professor of physics, retired)  Physicist, noted for his work on gravity and cosmology suggesting that the speed of light has varied in the past*Jayawardhana (professor of astronomy, 2005)  Astronomer and Holder of the Canada Research Chair in observational astrophysics who reported the first direct image and spectroscopy of a likely extra-solar planet around a normal star*Abraham (professor of astronomy)  Astronomer best known for his work on high-redshift galaxy morphologyBiology and ecology*Fernow (dean of forestry, 190719)  American conservationist; chief of forestry in the States Department of Agriculture, 188698; editor-in-chief of the of Forestry*Caccia (professor of forestry, 195568)  Politician, member of Parliament for Davenport, 19682004*Wah Mak (professor of biophysics and immunology, 1984)  Award-winning biochemist and geneticist, widely known for his pioneering work in the genetics of immunology*Pawson (professor of molecular genetics, 1985)  Geneticist whose research has revolutionized the understanding of transduction*Shettleworth (professor of ecology, evolutionary biology and psychology)  Zoologist and psychologist, Fellow, Psychological Association Distinguished Scientist LecturerEngineering and computer science*Legget (professor of engineering, 193647)  Civil engineer, historian and non-fiction writer, founding President of the Academy of Engineering *Borodin (professor of computer science, 1969)  Mathematician and computational theorist in computational complexity theory and algorithms*P. Collins (professor of civil engineering, 1969)  Structural engineer; expert on the design and evaluation of reinforced and prestressed concrete under shear stress*Cook (professor of computer science, 1970)  Recipient of the Award for formalizing the notion of NP-completeness through theorem*Rackoff (professor of computer science)  Noted modern cryptologist, won the Prize for his work on proof systems and proofs.*Hinton (professor of computer science, 1987)  Informatician who co-introduced the backpropagation algorithm, the machine and the machine*Mann (professor of computer engineering)  Researcher in transform, equations and sousveillance; pioneer in computers*J. Miller (professor of computer science, 2000) - Fellow of the for Computing Machinery (ACM)*Chignell (professor of mechanical and industrial engineering, 1990)  Researcher who co-introduced the concept of Databases*Holt (professor of computer science, 1997)  One of the original developers of the programming language, programming language, SP/k, and of the programming language*V. Wilson (assistant professor of computer science, 2006)  Computer scientist, an editor for Computing in Science and Engineering and Dobbs JournalEarth science*Philemon Coleman (professor of geology, 190122)  Geologist, former President of the Society of America, recipient of the Medal, Medal and Medal, fellow of the Society of Canada *Harris (professor of geography, 196471)  Former president of the Association of Geographers and recipient of the Medal*J. Naldrett (professor of geology, 196798)  Former President of the of Economic Geologists, the Mineralogical Association and the Society of America*Edvard Krogh (professor of geology, 197696)  Geochronologist who developed new techniques of radiometric uranium-lead dating for Precambrian rocks*Vanek (professor of geodesy)  Geodesist and theoretical geophysicist, made significant breakthroughs in theory of spectral analysis and geoid computationSocial sciencesAnthropology and geography*Snow Carpenter (professor of anthropology, 194857)  Anthropologist known for his work on tribal art and visual media*Schapera (visiting professor of anthropology, 1953)  Academic from the School of Economics and leading scholar in the anthropology of South African tribesmen*Michael Wickens (professor of Middle Eastern studies, 195784)  Prolific Iranologist and translator of Persian literature; founding chair of the universitys department of Near and Middle Eastern civilizations*Harris (assistant professor of geography, 196471)  Geographer, winner of the Medal, fellow of the Society of Canada *Maracle (professor of Aboriginal studies)  Nations poet and author, recipient of the Book Award*Danesi (professor of semiotics and linguistic anthropology)  Italian-Canadian semiotician*H. Turner (professor of anthropology)  Anthropologist who focuses on comparative religion and the role of music in the indigenous societies of Australia, North America, Africa, and IndiaSociology and psychology*Martin Lipset (lecturer of sociology, 194648)  American political sociologist; senior fellow at the Institution *Wrong (professor of sociology)  American sociologist, Power: Its Forms, Bases and Uses, annual award for the best graduate paper in sociology at NYU is named after him *Wellman (professor of sociology, 1967)  Sociologist; founder of the Network for Social Network Analysis, former president of the Research Association(http://www.chass.utoronto.ca/~wellman/vita/index.html; www.urbancentre.utoronto.ca/about/aboutcucshistory.htm; www.chass.utoronto.ca/~wellman/publications/networkingnetwork/networkingnetwork.pdf)*Rapoport (professor of mathematics and psychology, 197079)  Mathematical psychologist; founding professor of the Centre for Peace and Conflict Studies*I. M. Craik (professor of psychology, 1971)  Cognitive psychologist known for research on levels of processing in memory*Moscovitch (professor of psychology, 1971)  Leading neuropsychologist, Senior Scientist at the Rotman Research Institute of Baycrest Centre for Geriatric Care*E. Smith (professor of sociology, retired)  Sociologist, founder of the sociological sub-disciplines of feminist theory and Ethnography *William Johnson (professor of sociology)  Academic, journalist and author, former parliamentary correspondent for Globe and Mail and journalist for the Gazette*John Hagan (professor of law and sociology, 198296)  Senior research fellow of the Bar Foundation; former president of the Society of Criminology; visiting John D. MacArthur Professor of Sociology and Law at University*Walcott (associate professor, 2002)  Academic, writer, Research Chair of Social Justic and Cultural StudiesEconomics, management and political science*Mavor (professor of political economy, 18921923)  Political economist and activist who was instrumental in assisting the emigration of the Doukhobors to Canada, and the establishment of the Ontario Museum*Innis (professor of political economy, 192052)  Political economist and communication theorist who developed the thesis and and space-bias; former president of the Economic Association*James Mallory (lecturer of political economy, 194344)  Academic and constitutional expert, fellow of the Society of Canada, the Elizabeth II Silver Jubilee Medal winner *H. Russell (professor of political science, 195896)  Scholar on aboriginal peoples, constitutional politics and the Charter of Rights and Freedoms; president of the Canadian Law and Society Association*Hollander (professor of economics, 196398)  Scholar and author on the of economic thought and classical economics *Edward Smith (professor of political economy, 196599)  Noted biographer of S. Grant and D. Roosevelt; John Marshall Professor of Political Science at University*F. Hough (professor of political science, 196873)  Researcher on American politics, the Soviet Union and the democratization of Russia*E. Floyd (professor of economics, 1970)  Scholar in international monetary economics *Trebilcock (professor of law, 1972)  Scholar specializing in law and economics, international trade law and competition law; president of the Law and Economics Association*Pangle (professor of political science, 19792004)  Political scientist; holder of the Joe R. Long Chair in Democratic Studies at the of Texas at Austin*Stein (professor of political science, 1983)  Director of the Centre for International Studies*Carens (professor of political science, 1985)  Political scientist who focuses on contemporary theory, Culture, Citizenship and Community, A Contextual Exploration of Justice as Evenhandedness*David Foot (professor of economics)   Economist and demographer; author of Boom, Bust & Echo*C. Hull (professor of finance, 1988)  Prominent researcher in finance and co-developer of the model*Deibert (professor of political science)  Researcher in Internet and human rights; director of the Lab and co-founder of the Initiative*Rayside (professor of political science, 1974present)  Academic and activisit; a member of the Right to Privacy Committee and co-founder of the Canadian Lesbian and Gay Studies Association.*Jahanbegloo (professor of political science, 19972001, 2008present)  Iranian intellectual and academic; recipient of the Peace Prize from the United Nations Association*S. Detsky (professor of public health policy, management and evaluation)  Physician and health policy expert, Physician-in-Chief at Sinai Hospital, Toronto*Watkins (professor of economics and political science, retired)  Political economist and activist, founder and co-leader of Waffle*Horowitz (professor of political science)  Political scientist who specialized in labour theory, most notably cointed the appellation Tory*Orwin (professor of political science)  Political scientist of ancient, modern, contemporary and Jewish political thought, a FellowHumanitiesPhilosophy and classics*Mark Baldwin (chair of logic and metaphysics, 188992)  American philosopher and psychologist, important contributor to psychology, psychiatry and the of evolution *A. Havelock (professor of classics, 192947)  British classicist; author, History of the Greek Mind*Churchland (lecturer of philosophy, 196769)  Philosopher, noted for his works in neurophilosophy and the of mind, major proponent of materialism.*Barnes (professor of classics, 19702007)  Classicist specializing in Christianity in the Later Roman Empire*Bloom (professor of political science, 197079)  American philosopher and critic of contemporary higher education, best known for authoring Closing of the American Mind*Allen Graff (professor of philosophy and ethics, 19702002)  Founder of the Near East Cultural and Educational Foundation of Canada (NECEF), former vice-chair of the North American Co-ordinating Committee for NGOs on the Question of Palestine*de Sousa (professor of philosophy, 19712005)  Scholar in the philosophy of emotions, mind and biology*Hacking (professor of philosophy, 1982)  Noted member of the Stanford School of philosophers, known for bringing a historical approach to the philosophy of science, author of the Soul: Multiple Personality and the Sciences of Memory*Heath (professor of philosophy)  Philosopher and author, Rebel Sell*James Tully (professor of philosophy, 200103)  Distinguished political philosopher, fellow of the Society of Canada*Robert Brown (professor of philosophy)  Philosopher of science, Fellow of the Society of Canada since 2007*van Fraassen (professor of philosophy)  Philosopher, specializing in the of science, Laws and Symmetry, The Scientific Image*Ludlow (professor of philosophy)  Philosopher, noted for his research in cyberspace, High Noon on the Electronic Frontier and Crypto Anarchy, Cyberstates, and Pirate Utopias *Howson (professor of philosophy, 2008)  British philosopher, Scientific Reasoning: the Bayesian Approach*Owen Lee (Father Owen Lee), professor emeritus of classics*J. Zydenbos (professor of South Asian studies, philosophy and linguistics)  Dutch-Canadian scholarLiterature and linguistics*McLuhan (professor of English literature, 194679)  Influential literary critic and communications theorist, known for coining the expressions medium is the message and global village*Davies (professor of literature, 196081)  Novelist and playwright; founding master of College; author of Deptford Trilogy*Angus Cameron (professor of literature, 196883)  Linguist and lexicographer who initiated the of Old English*kvoreck (professor of literature, 196890)  Leading contemporary Czech writer, winner of the International Prize for Literature, Generals Award, a Fellow and a Fellow of the Society of Canada  *Jack Chambers (professor of linguistic, 1970)  Linguist, expert on language variation and change, pioneered research on English and coined the term raising *Kramer (professor of Slavic languages, 1986)  Specialist on Balkan languages and semantics; former translator for the Berlitz Translation Service*Namjoshi (professor of literature, 1972mid 90s)  Indian writer*Elliott Clarke (professor of literature, 1999)  Poet, playwright, Falls*LAbbe (professor of creative writing)  Poet and critic, reviewer for Globe and Mail, Wallace Memorial Award recipient*Wex (professor of literature)  Novelist, playwright, translator and performer, to Kvetch*Cowper (professor of linguistics, 2004)  Linguist, specializing in tense and aspect in English and SpanishHistory*MacKinnon Wrong (professor of history, 18941927)  Historian and Anglican priest, Canada and the American Revolution: The Disruption of the First British Empire*Saywell (professor of history, 195462)  Historian specializing in the fields of politics and constitution*Heichelheim (professor of Greek and Roman history, 196268)  historian who specialized in ancient economic history *Ker Conway (professor of history, 196475)  Australian-American author, Road from Coorain, North; president of College, 197585*Sharan Sharma (professor of history, 196566)  Eminent historian of Ancient India()()() who has been a historian of international repute() and the founding chairperson of Council of Historical Research. *Goffart (professor of history, 196099)  Historian who specializes in late Roman Empire, early Middle Ages and barbarian kingdoms*Paton Thornton (professor of history, 196087)  Academic and historian, author of The Imperial idea and its enemies: a study in British power*Salutin (professor of Canadian studies, 1978)  Novelist, playwright and critic, columnist for Globe and Mail*Zemon Davis (professor of history)  Canadian and American historian of early period; first woman president of the Historical Association*Penslar (professor of Jewish history)  Historian specializing in Jewish history, Contemporary AntisemitismLaw*Atkey (professor of law)  Legal academic and Member of the Parliament for St. Pauls, 197274, 197980*Barak (professor of law)  President of the Court of Israel, 19952006, General of Israel, 197578*Dalfen (professor of law, 197274)  Chairperson of the Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission, 200206, legal advisor for the Government of Canadas Department of Communications, 197072*Leal (professor of law, 197277)  Chancellor of University, 197786, Deputy General of Ontario, 197781, Dean of Hall Law School, 195866*Iacobucci (professor of law, 196782)  Justice, 19912004*St. John Macdonald (professor of law, 196172)  Legal academic and jurist, founding President of the Canadian Council on International Law, President of the Academy of Art and Science, 198387*Michael Mandel (professor of law)  Legal academic specializing in law, noted critic of the Charter of Rights and Freedoms*Ed Morgan (professor of law), noted international law expert*Wright (dean of the faculty of law, 194967)  Prominent figure in the Canadian legal education reform, one of the first law professors to import the Harvard method into Canadian legal educationTheology*Coggan (professor of theology, 193744)  101st of Canterbury, 197480*Baum (professor of theology and sociology, 195986)  Roman Catholic theologian, Religion and Alienation, Officer of the of Canada *Jocz (professor of theology, 196076)  Hebrew Christian theologist; author, The Jewish People and Jesus Christ, The Jewish People and Jesus Christ After Auschwitz*Lonergan (professor of theology, 196575)  Jesuit priest, economist, Insight: A Study of Human Understanding *Jo Leddy (professor of theology, Regis College). Writer, theologian, social activist, founder of Catholic New Times*G. Oxtoby (professor of comparative religion, 197199)  Founding director of the graduate centre for religious studies; author, World Religions: Western Traditions, World Religions: Eastern Traditions*Ching (professor of religion and philosophy, 19782001)  Expert on the neo-Confucian philosophy of ChinaFine arts, music, drama and architecture*William Jefferys (professor of architecture, 191239)  Painter and historical illustrator; co-founder of the Canadian Society of Graphic Art with Lewis*Arthur (professor of architecture 192366)  Architect, member of the Torontos Hundred Years Publication Committee, which published 100 Years.*Allen Brooks (professor of the history of art)  Architectural historian known for research on Lloyd Wright, the School and Corbusier*Andrew Hughes (professor of music, 196996)  Musicologist specializing in medieval music; former president of the Academy of America(The Canadian Encyclopedia, Huges, Andrew)*Sears (professor of drama, 2000)  Playwright, actor and director, won four Mavor Moore Awards and one Generals AwardEducation*MacKenzie (professor of law, 192740)  President of the of New Brunswick, 194044; president of the of British Columbia, 194462*Lloyd Johnston (professor of law, 196874)  Principal of University, 197994; president of the of Waterloo, 1999; dean of law at the of Western Ontario, 197479*Hare (professor of geography and physics, 196988)  President of the of British Columbia, 196869; chancellor of University, 198895*R. Williams (professor of education, 197077)  Principal of University, 2008*Leal (lecturer in property law, 197277)  Chancellor of University, 197786*Forster (professor of economics)  President of the of Guelph, 197583*Lowy (professor of psychiatry, 197480; dean of medicine, 198087)  President and vice-chancellor of Concordia University, 19952005*Klawe (professor of computer science, 197880)  President of Mudd College, 2006 ; dean of engineering and applied science at University, 200206; dean of science at the of British Columbia, 199802*Tsui (professor of molecular and medical genetics, 19832002)  Vice-chancellor of the of Hong Kong, 2002*Munroe-Blum (professor and dean of social work, 19942002)  Principal of University, 2003Business and public policy*Cassidy (professor of social work, 192934)  Social reformer and civil servant who was infliential in the creation of the Canadian welfare state*Dalfen (professor of law, 197274)  Chairman of the Radio-television and Telecommunications Commission, 200206*Fleck (professor of business-government relations, 1979)  Businessman and philanthropist; former chairman of Technologies, director of AMD and Certicom*Coyne (professor of law, 198688)  Constitutional lawyer who had worked in the Office of the Prime Minister, Council on National Issues and Human Rights Commission*Martin (professor of strategic management, 1998)  Former director of Group; dean of the School of Management*Eysenbach (professor of health policy, 2002)  Researcher on Open access, health policy, eHealth and health informatics*Florida (professor of business, 2007)  Economist and urban studies theorist who introduced the concept of the class*Tapscott (professor of management)  Business executive and consultant; author of WikinomicsNobel laureates*Banting (alumnus and former faculty)  Prize in Physiology or Medicine, 1923*James Richard Macleod (former faculty)  Prize in Physiology or Medicine, 1923*B. Pearson (alumnus and former faculty)  Peace Prize, 1957*Leonard Schawlow (alumnus)  Prize in Physics, 1981*Charles Polanyi (faculty)  Prize in Chemistry, 1986*Brockhouse (alumnus)  Prize in Physics, 1994*Kohn (alumnus)  Prize in Chemistry, 1998*Orbinski (alumnus and faculty)  Peace Prize, 1999*Smithies (former faculty)  Prize in Physiology or Medicine, 2007 Chancellors  Presidents See also*of people from Ontario*of people from Toronto*of people from Quebec*of people from Quebec City*of people from Montreal*of people from Calgary*of people from Edmonton*of people from British Columbia*of people from VancouverReferencesExternal links*Nobel Laureates who were based at the University of Toronto at significant points in their careers
2646876
Lena_massacre
The Lena Massacre or Lena Execution () refers to the shooting of striking goldfield workers by the Empires tsarist army on  in northeast Siberia near the River.(Russian Lenzoloto strike in 1912) It has been suggested that Ulyanov adopted his more popular alias after the river Lena &mdash; Lenin &mdash; after this event, although he had in fact started using it years earlier.(Lenins note written August 10, 1904 in the Swiss mountains)The incident took place at the goldfields of the Lena Gold Mining Joint Stock Company (a.k.a. Lenzoloto), located along the shores of the Lena River about 28 miles northeast of the town of Bodaybo, north of Irkutsk (coordinates for monument: 581107.06N, 1143501.91E.). Merciless exploitation of the workforce provided enormous profits for the British and Russian shareholders, such as A.I. Vyshnegradsky, Putilov (both on the of directors), Count Witte, Empress Maria Fyodorovna, and others. The working conditions at the goldfields were extremely harsh. The miners had to work fifteen to sixteen hours a day. For every thousand workers, there were more than 700 traumatic accidents(Russian Documents site about Lena execution in 1912). Part of the meager salary was often used to pay fines. The other part of it was given in the form of coupons to be used in stores at the mine itself. All this led a spontaneous strike at the Andreyevsky goldfield on February 29 (March 13). An immediate cause for the strike was distribution of rotten meat at one of the stores. On March 4 (17), the workers established their demands: an 8-hour workday, 30% raise in wages, the elimination of fines, and the improvement of food delivery, among others. However, none of these demands were satisfied by the administration. With the Central Strike Committee and Central Bureau (P.N. Batashev, G.V. Cherepakhin(Russian G.V.Cherepakhin personal memoirs), R.I. Zelionko, M.I. Lebedev, and others) in charge of the strike, it had extended to all the goldfields, and included over 6,000 workers, by mid-March. The tsarist government sent troops from Kirensk to Bodaybo, and on the night of April 4 (17), all members of the strike committee were arrested. The next morning, the workers demanded their immediate release. That afternoon, some 2,500 people marched towards the Nadezhdinsky goldfield to deliver a complaint about the arbitrariness of the authorities to the prosecutors office. The workers were met by soldiers, who began shooting at the crowd by the order of Captain Treshchenkov, resulting in 270 dead and 250 wounded (as reported by a local newspaper Zvezda). These numbers were used for propaganda purposes during Soviet times. However, one of the reports from the mine dated 5 April mentions 150 dead and 100 wounded. The public demanded the government send a commission to the goldfields to investigate the incident. Interior Minister Maklakov dismissed the massacre: So it was. So it will be.(Simon Sebag Montefiore, Young Stalin, page 210) Soon afterwards, the administration offered its workers a new contract, which failed to meet their satisfaction. News of the massacre provoked nationwide strikes and protest meetings totaling more than 300,000 participants, with 700 political strikes during the month of April, and 1,000 strikes on 1 May in the Petersburg area alone. The strike continued until August 12 (25), when the last of the workers withdrew from the mines and moved elsewhere. Altogether, an estimated 9,000 employees and family members abandoned the goldfields. The number of strikes in Russia had sharply declined from 14,000 in 1905 to just 222 in 1910. Next year it increased to 466 and 1,918 in 1912.(libcom.org/history/1912-lena-massacre)The Duma commission on the Lena execution was headed by Kerensky. His colourful reports of the incident greatly promoted widespread knowledge of the event, and also advanced his career from a backbencher to a popular leader of the Duma, as well as head of the Provisional Government of 1917.Stalin declared: The Lena shots broke the ice of silence, and the river of popular resentment is flowing again. The ice has broken. It has started!(Simon Sebag Montefiore, Young Stalin, page 210)  See also *of massacres in Russia References (de la Lenadella Lenaja: 1912 zh:
2655582
Clifton,_Greater_Manchester
Clifton is a small town within the borough of the of Salford, in Manchester, England. It lies in the Valley in the northern part of the City of Salford.Historically a part of Lancashire, Clifton, a former centre for mining, once formed part of the municipal borough of and Pendlebury.HistoryClifton is derived from the English clif and tun, and means the settlement near a cliff, slope, or riverbank.(isbn0-19-852758-6)Clifton was mentioned in the Pipe Roll of 11834.()Coal miningHall Colliery was situated a few yards to the west of Lumns Lane on a site currently occupied by a domestic refuse and recycling site, run by the Manchester Waste Disposal Authority.  It is thought that the colliery was operating by 1820, and its tramway is shown on a parliamentary plan from 1830. It is also shown on an 1845 map. Hall Colliery closed in 1929.On 18 June 1885, an explosion within the colliery killed 178 men and boys.(Clifton Colliery Explosion: A brief description and memorial Durham Mining Museum) It is thought that the explosion was caused by firedamp igniting upon contact with a candle. Blacksmith George Hindley (aged 16 at the time) and fireman George Higson, were part of a band of men who descended into the mine immediately after the explosion. They both later received an Albert Medal (2nd class) in recognition of their heroism.GovernanceClifton was a township in the parish of Eccles in the hundred of Salford in the county of Lancashire.()GeographyClifton lies five miles north west of Manchester on the road to Bolton. The township covered 850 acres in the valley of the Irwell, which flows on the north east boundary. The Manchester and Bolton railway line passes through and there was a junction with the line to Bury and Rossendale which opened to Rawtenstall in September 1846.The highest land rises to over 300 feet above sea level to the west of the township near the Worsley boundary and is moss land. The underlying rocks are New Red Sandstone between Clifton and Ringley while the rest of the township lies on the Middle Coal Measures of the Coalfield.( The remains of the Earth Colliery are located in Country Park.TransportClifton is served by Clifton railway station, a small station on the main to Preston Line. In earlier and more labour-intensive times, the station was known as Junction due to it being located at the junction of the and Bolton Railway and Manchester, Bury and Rossendale Railway lines.  The Bury line left the station/junction and soon passed over Viaduct, known locally as the thirteen arches(Clifton Railway Viaduct: A brief description)(Listed Building Register C - Salford City Council) and across the Irwell Valley. Junction was, in the days before mass ownership of the family car, vitally important in bringing workers to the three large factories located minutes away, namely, Magnesium Elektron Ltd (M.E.L.), Chloride Batteries and Pilkingtons Tiles. The Bolton and Bury Canal ran through Clifton and once served these businesses. The Aqueduct carried the canal across the River Irwell.(Clifton Aqueduct on the Manchester Bolton and Bury Canal) and is preserved as a Grade 2 building.( There are plans to restore the canal for leisure use at a cost of over 50M.EducationClifton currently has two schools and a referral unit within its boundaries:SportCricket Club play in the Lancashire Cricket League. The clubs ground is on Manchester Road (road), Clifton, about half a mile northwest of Junction 16 of the motorway.Queensmere Dam off Queensway is leased from the Commission by Swinton and Pendlebury Angling club.See also*Canal*Lancastrian PotteryReferences(Greater Manchester)
2661373
Hurlet
Hurlet (or The Hurlet) is a small semi-rural district and former mining village, straddling the Renfrewshire-Renfrewshire-Glasgow border near the town of Barrhead in the lowlands of Scotland. During the late twentieth century, most of the Hurlet was consigned to the history books when the Paisley-Kilbride road, which cut through the village, was widened to become a carriageway.
2663229
Bone_Valley
Image:Nicholsfertilizer.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Phosphate fertilizer processing plant -- Florida.The Bone Valley is a region of central Florida, encompassing portions of present-day Hardee, Hillsborough, Manatee, and Polk counties, in which phosphate is mined for use in the production of agricultural fertilizer. Florida currently contains the largest known deposits of phosphate in the States.ProcessImage:PhosphateGon.JPG|thumb|150px|Rotary gondolas such as these are used by CSXT to transport phosphate rock from the Bone Valley region to transloading facilities along Tampa Bay -- Junction, Florida.Large walking draglines, operating twenty-four hours a day in surface mines, excavate raw pebble phosphate mixed with clay and sand (known as matrix).  The matrix contains a number of chemical impurities, including naturally occurring uranium at concentrations of approximately 100 ppm.The matrix is then dropped into a pit where it is mixed with water to create a slurry, which is then pumped through miles of large steel pipes to washing plants. These plants crush, sift, and separate the phosphate from the sand, clay, and other materials, and mix in more water to create a granular rock termed wetrock. The wetrock, which is typically of little use in raw form, is then moved largely by rail to fertilizer plants where it is processed. The final products include, but are not limited to, phosphate (DAP), phosphate (MAP) and superphosphate (TSP).Waste byproducts are stored in large phosphogypsum stacks and settling ponds, often hundreds of acres in size, and up to  tall. Phosphate processing produces significant amounts of fluorine gas, which must be treated by filtering through special scrubbers.Much of the final product (known within the industry as dryrock) is transported by rail to facilities along Bay, where they are transloaded onto ships destined for countries such as China.Phosphate product intended for domestic use is assembled into long trains of hopper cars for northbound movement.HistoryWhen the narrow gauge() Southern Railway reached Arcadia in 1886, it was only a sleepy little town and the builders paused only briefly before pushing the railroad south to Punta Gorda. Unknown to the railroad and the general public at this time, a great discovery had been made in 1881 by Captain Francis LeBaron of the States Army Corps of Engineers, who was surveying the lower Peace River area for a canal to connect the headwaters of the Johns River to Harbor. Here he found and shipped to the Institution nine barrels of prehistoric fossils from the sand bars prevalent on the lower Peace River. He also noticed that there was a phosphatase quality to the fossils and the deposit they were found in was very valuable. The Smithsonian wanted him to return and lead an expedition for prospecting more fossils, but Captain LeBaron was unable to return due to important duties at Fernandina where he was put in charge of harbor improvements.Finally in December 1886, LeBaron was able to return to the Peace River where he dug some test pits and sent the samples to a laboratory for analysis. His suspicions were confirmed as the tests showed high quality bone phosphate of lime. LeBaron tried in vain to round up  investors in New York, Boston and Philadelphia, but none were willing to invest in the project. Frustrated, he left the United States for the ill-fated Nicaraguan Canal Project. Meanwhile, the test results became known to Colonel G.W. Scott who owned the G.W. Scott Manufacturing Co. of Atlanta and he quickly sent a representative down to Arcadia who made several large purchases along the Peace River. Colonel T.S. Moorhead of Pennsylvania had also learned about the deposits from Captain LeBaron, but not the secret of their location, traveled to Arcadia where he stumbled onto the famous sand bars. Mr. Moorhead formed the Arcadia Phosphate Company, with the Scott Mfg. Co. quickly agreeing to purchase the entire output. The first shipment of Florida phosphate was made in May 1888 when the first ten car loads were dispatched to Scotts Fertilizer Works in Atlanta, Georgia. Soon after, G.W. Scott formed the Desoto Phosphate Co. at Zolfo where the Florida Southern Railway crossed the Peace River. The biggest player was the Peace River Phosphate Co. (formed in January 1887) which was located in Arcadia by M.M. Knudson of New York and they quickly built a narrow gauge railroad from the works on the river to the interchange with the Florida Southern. It is this company and its railroad that is the first direct ancestor of the future Charlotte Harbor & Northern. The Peace River Phosphate Co. began mining in the Winter of 1889, and most of the ore was shipped to Punta Gorda via the Florida Southern, where it was loaded onto ships for export to Europe.Early mining was with pick and shovel where the above-water sand bars were mined by hand. The material was carried on barges to the nearby drying works. Soon suction dredges were put into use and the mining spread along the lower Peace River.Moorhead soon sold his Arcadia Phosphate Co. to Hammond & Hull of Georgia a large fertilizer operation in that city. Moorhead then left Florida and returned to Pennsylvania, where he developed a phosphate mine in Juniata County, PA and formed the narrow gauge Tuscarora Valley Rail Road. Hammond & Hull also owned the Charlotte Harbor Phosphate Co. which had their works at Hull, connecting with the Florida Southern by a short branch line. Wanting to connect the two plants, Hammond & Hull built a narrow gauge railroad between Arcadia and Hull around 1890. The railroad served various load outs along the river, where the barges carrying pebble were unloaded into ore cars for the journey to the drying plants at Arcadia and Hull. Hammond dropped out around 1890 and the new firm was known as Comer & Hull. The Peace River Phosphate Co. in the mean time had built a narrow gauge railroad north of Arcadia to their load-outs along the Peace River. Like the Comer & Hull operations, the ore was hauled to the drying plant at Arcadia where it was loaded into the narrow gauge boxcars of the Florida Southern. When the railroad converted its Charlotte Harbor Division to standard gauge in 1892, both the Peace River Phosphate Co. and Comer & Hull operations converted their respective railroads. Joseph Hull of Comer & Hull purchased a half interest in the Peace River Phosphate Co. about this time.In December 1894, Joseph Hull consolidated the Arcadia Phosphate Co., Charlotte Harbor Phosphate Co., Desota Phosphate & Mining Co. & Peace River Phosphate Co. into the Peace River Phosphate Mining Co.Peter Bradley of New York was one of the fertilizer capitalists (Bradley Fertilzer Co.) that Captain LeBaron had first approached about the sand bars, but was initially rebuffed. In May 1899, he was involved in the merger of 22 fertilizer companies into the American Agricultural Chemical Co., becoming vice president and a director of the new corporation.AACC began buying the stock of the Peace River Phosphate Mining Co. beginning in June 1899 and finishing in January 1902.The Peace River Phosphate Mining Company Railroad consisted of a mainline running south from Arcadia to Liverpool. A few short branches connected the railroad to the Florida Southern (later the Plant System in 1896 and the ACL after 1902) at Arcadia, Hull and Liverpool. At Hull was the washing plant where sand was removed. Liverpool housed the drying plant and barge loading facilities. A branch running north for about  upstream from Arcadia served the many load outs along the river.In the early years, phosphate from the Peace River area was barged to Punta Gorda, or shipped by rail to Port Tampa. Other important ports were later established at Island, Boca Grande, and Rockport.Today, there are two companies which mine phosphate rock in the region, Mosaic Inc. (formed from the merger of IMC-Global and Cargill Crop Nutrition) as well as Industries. At present, Mosaic is seeking to mine properties further south, in Hardee and Manatee Counties.With renewed interest in corn-based fuel, the demand for fertilizer is expected to increase.Rail ServiceThroughout most of the twentieth century, the Bone Valley region received service from two major railroads, the Atlantic Coast Line and Seaboard Air Line. More than a few plants and mines saw the services of both railroad companies, such as the Ridgewood facility located at Bartow, and the massive Pierce complex south of Mulberry. It was not until the 1967 Seaboard Coast Line merger that the bitter rivalry was put to rest. SCL itself was later absorbed into CSX, who have since pursued an aggressive strategy of abandoning redundant trackage.Risks of miningImage:GypStack.JPG|thumb|right|210px|Phosphogypsum stack located near Meade, Florida. These contain the waste byproducts of the phosphate fertilizer industry.Phosphate is a declining export to China. Previously, significant amounts of rock were shipped to China, where it was processed into phosphate fertilizer. The majority of phosphate mining in Florida is done in the Peace River watershed. Phosphate mining companies use draglines to remove surface soils up to   deep over thousands of contiguous acres. Once land is mined, state law requires that it be reclaimed.  Wetlands are reclaimed on an acre for acre, type for type basis.  Most modern mining permits actually require companies to recreate more wetlands than were initially present on the land.  More than  have already been mined and reclaimed in the Peace River watershed. As reserves in the northern portion of the bone valley are depleting, mining companies are now seeking permits for another , which will replace reclaimed mines to the north. One byproduct of the extraction process is clay, which is stored in settling ponds and eventually comprise thirty to forty percent of a mine site. Some of these ponds can measure thousands of acres. Rain drains slower through these clay-laden ponds than typical soil.  Critics argue that this, in turn, reduces baseflow to the Peace River. Some studies have indicated that reclaimed lands actually provide a more consistent baseflow because the sandier soils of the reclaimed land provide faster baseflow, while the clay provides a slower steady flow, creating more flow during dry periods than native land.  Since the 1960s, the average annual flow of the middle Peace River has declined from  to  per second (38.23 to 22.65 m/s). Critics argue that this flow reduction is due to phosphate mining, but studies by the Southwest Florida Water Management District have shown that the reduction in flow is due to multidecadal oscillation in Atlantic Ocean temperatures.  Critics argue that each holding pond has been perceived as a risk that threatens water quality, public health, wildlife, and the regional economy. Dams restraining the ponds have overflowed or burst, sending a slurry of clay into the river, and coating the riverbed for many miles with a toxic clay slime that suffocates flora and fauna. One such incident in 1971 killed over three million fish when  of phosphate waste swept into the river, causing an estimated  tide of slime that spread into adjacent pastures and wetlands.  Since the 1971 spill, clay settling areas are now constructed as engineered dams.  No such spills have occurred from any settling areas built to these standards.  The current dams even withstood three hurricanes which crossed directly over the Bone Valley in 2004.   Most recently, in 2004, during Frances, a phosphogypsum stack was overwhelmed by hurricane rains and the levees were breached, sending over  of acidic process water into Bay. Cargill Crop Nutrition, who owned the stack, added lime into the affected areas in an attempt to neutralize the highly-acidic runoff. Due to the extraordinary amount of runoff created by the hurricane, the spill was quickly diluted and environmental damage was minimal.  In a consent agreement with the Department of Environmental Protection, Cargill greatly increased its water treatment capacity at the facility.  The facility is a no discharge facility and was overwhelmed by the above normal rainfall in 2004, in addition to being affected by three hurricanes.  On occasion, clay slime spills have prevented the Peace River Manasota Water Supply Authority from using river flows for drinking water, forcing municipalities to seek water supplies elsewhere, or rely on stored supplies. On several occasions, the effects of heavy rainfall have created sinkholes beneath the settling ponds.ReferencesExternal links*CF Industries, Inc.*Mosaic Co.*Florida Phosphate Facts
2665272
Maalaala_Mo_Kaya
Maalaala Mo Kaya (lit. Would You Remember) is a Philippine drama series broadcast on ABS-CBN every Saturday evening and being hosted by Santos-Concio. Currently, it became the longest-running drama anthology on Philippine television and on Asia.() The program features weekly real life stories or anecdotes of common people or even famous celebrities and personalities through letter sending. The series has a counterpart radio program being broadcast on DZMM called Maalaala Mo Kaya sa DZMM, a paperback (pocketbooks) adaption and a book adaptation under Mango Comics & Sterling.()The program is named after the song, Maalaala Mo Kaya by Constancio de Guzman, which also serves as the programs main theme song which was performed by Dulce. During 2000s airing of the program until now, the main theme song was covered by Banawa replacing Dulces version.EpisodesTranslations of the Filipino titles are in the parentheses.Notable episodes*Rubber Shoes:The first episode of MMK aired on May 15, 1991 starring Sarmenta and Morales.*Regalo (Gift):MMK episode topbilled by Santos, Davao and Salvador and considered as one of the most critically successful episode.*Lobo (Balloon):One of the highest-rating episode (47.9% in Mega Manila) that featured Velasquez and Pascual. Also Regine won her first acting award at the PMPC Star Awards for TV in 2002.()()*Pier 39:10th Anniversary Presentation. First Maalaala Mo Kaya episode filmed outside the Philippines starring Ann Santos and Pascual. Shot in San Francisco, California, the episode tells about a caregiver who falls in love with a wayward man, despite being beholden to her elderly, wheelchair-using employer.*Ferris Wheel:A Christmas presentation of Maalaala mo Kaya which reunites ex-lovers Rosales and dela Cruz.*Unan(Pillow):The episode which tells the Life Story of Vega, as portrayed by Panganiban. Michael de Mesa and Rio Locsin acted as Drs. Julio and Pearl Postigo, Julie Vegas Parents. Aired in October 2003.*Pendant:A Valentines Day Special aired on February 14, 2009 and first episode for Gonzaga with Abalos and Ryan Eigenmann. This episode was about first love and how to let go and take the risk in order to be in love.()()*Reseta (Prescription):A Mothers Day Special aired on May 9, 2009 starring Sta. Maria and Villaroel. This marked Villaroels new appearance in a MMK episode on ABS-CBN after a few episodes she has done in the 1990s before leaving the network.*Blusa (Blouse):A controversial episode starring Locsin and Romana that focuses on a story of a UP Los Baos summa cum laude graduate who found herself applying as a Guest Relations Officer (GRO), shown February 28, 2009. UPLB released a statement pointing out the credibility of the facts presented in the episode.()  On March 10, 2009, ABS-CBN issued an apology for not verifying with UPLB the veracity of the facts.()*Ice Cream:This the life story of Pempengco, as portrayed by herself. This is Charices first acting appearance with Zsa Padilla and Salazar played as the role of her mother and younger brother. The story features about her growing up in a middle class family before her successful singing career. The episode aired on June 2008.*Teddy Bear:This is the story of comedienne, Pokwang portrayed by herself.*Kwintas (Necklace):The first episode of Geronimo and also mark as the first on-screen tandem of her and Lloyd Cruz.*Gitara (Guitar):This is the real life story of Tara Santelices, who was comatose for a year after being shot to the head by a mugger on August 6, 2008. She was portrayed by Karylle.*Upuan (Chair):The episode of former senator Cayetano, portrayed by Valdez about his battle with hepatitis and his son, Lino Cayetanos contribution to extend his life as portrayed by Lloyd Cruz. This episode is also directed by Lino himself.*Bangka (Boat) and Isda (Fish):This two-part episode tells the life of Curita Villar, the mother of Senator Villar played by Pareo.*The Ninoy and Cory Aquino Story:On January 23 and 30, 2010 respectively, a two-part episode of the life story of former Senator Aquino, Jr. and former President Aquino was aired for Corys 77th Birthday. The first part was Kalapati which featured the humble beginnings of the said couple, from their marriage up to their political conflicts. The second part was Makinilya which depicted the latter days of Ninoy and the end of Martial Law. The series also featured real footage of the events that occurred during martial law and during Corys success in the presidential race. Pascual portrayed the role of Aquino Jr.(http://www.abs-cbn.com/Feature/Article/6169/Piolo-Pascual-plays-Ninoy-Aquino-in-a-two-part-Maalaala-Mo-Kaya-special.aspx) while Alonzo played the role of Aquino.(http://www.abs-cbn.com/Feature/Article/6170/Kris-Aquino-plays-Cory-Aquino-in-a-special-episode-of-Maalaala-Mo-Kaya.aspx)*Bola (Flatter):The life story of Jose Viceral or also known as Philippine comedian Ganda.*Siomai:The life story of the first Got Talent winner Baldivino.*Tsinelas (Slippers):This is the story of 17 year-old Edgar and 11 year-old Dagul, two homeless brothers that suffer the severe trials of life with no food or money while travelling an, exhilarating journey from Manila to Samar for a better life. This is the posthumous work of actor Perez, who died in a car crash on April 17, 2011.*Krus (Cross):The Mothers Day Special of MMK for the year 2011 with Delas Alas, John Arcilla, Wayne Sace and Lester Liansang. A story about a struggling mother with her kids not blessed with perfect health.*Balot:This is the story of Pomoy, the second winner of Got Talent. It is about how he found his mother after she left his father when he was in jail, how he helped his long lost family by winning singing competitions, and how he saw the true colors of his long lost mother and sister. Reaching the climax of the story, he decided to enter Pilipinas Got Talent to help his family. After he won PGT, he accomplished his dream of bringing his family back together. It was aired on August 20, 2011.*Tap Dancing Shoes:The life story of the runners-up of Pilipinas Got Talent season 2, Happy Feet.Award-winning episodes*Abo (Ash):Paulate was awarded by the 1st TV Awards as Best Drama Performance By An Actor in 1996.()*Wristwatch:Paulate was awarded again by the 5th TV Awards as Best Drama Performance By An Actor in 2000.(*Song Book:Seguerra was awarded by the 7th TV Awards as Best Drama Performance By An Actress in 2002.()*Rehas (Jail Bars):Pareo was awarded Best Drama Performance By An Actress by 12th TV Awards in 2007.()*Pilat (Scar):For this episode, Locsin won her first acting award for Best Single Performance By An Actress in the 22nd Star Awards for TV.()*Lobo (Balloon):The episode stars Velasquez and Pascual. Regine won Best Single Performance By An Actress for this episode at the 16th PMPC Star Award for Television.((*Skating Rink:Lloyd Cruz won Outstanding Lead Actor In A Drama Special at the 2nd Enpress Golden Screen Entertainment TV Awards in 2005. He played the role of Jonel, a guy with cerebral palsy, but had a hidden talent in skating.()*Sako (Sack):This episode starring Jay Manalo and Joshua Dionisio, won in the 17th Golden Dove Awards. It tells the story of an abusive father who keeps his children working while he spends all their hard-earned money.*Regalo (Gift):Starring Santos with Salvador. This episode won the Best TV Drama Program at the 15th Golden Dove Awards while actress Vilma won Best Single Performance By An Actress at the 20th Star Awards for TV in 2006.(*Lupa (Soil):Starring Ketchup Eusebio and Pareo, the episode was nominated as Best Drama Series in the 4th Seoul International Drama Awards in 2009.() The story is about a boy that returns to a poor neighborhood in Bicol in order to make his sick mothers wish come true.*Basket:Starring Judy Ann Santos and Caridad Sanchez, this episode won the 2001 Catholic Mass Media Awards for Best Drama and the 2001 KBP Golden Dove Awards Best Drama Program. It is also became finalist at the Magnolia Award for Best Film for TV during the 9th Shanghai Television Festival 2002 in China.Best of MMKAs listed on the official website of the show:Rubber Shoes:*Sarmienta:*In this very first episode of Maalaala Mo Kaya aired on May 15, 1991, Sarmienta plays Allan, a social climber who is ashamed of his impoverished state and pretends to be well-off to blend in with his rich friends in school. His father, a street sweeper, works very hard to meet his luxurious needs. Only when it was too late that Allan realizes that money does not necessarily make a man happy.Sako (Sack):*Manalo:*Miong (Manalo) and his entire family work as tenants for a sugarcane plantation in Negros Occidental. The eldest child, Giling (Dionisio) is forced by his father to give up schooling to help in the farm. Giling suffers maltreatment not only from the abusive people in the plantation but from his own father, who is so consumed by his obsession for money and power. When their family is struck by a tragedy, Giling vows to rise above the oppression.Regalo (Gift):*Santos:*Daisy Hernandez (Santos), a mother must divide her time between work and taking care of her daughter April (Salvador) who has cerebral palsy. Daisys heart is wrenched every time she sees her eldest child suffer because of her illness. But Daisy never loses hope, and April manages to live a normal life until she is 18. Just when Daisy thought things are doing fine with her daughters disability, a tragedy will further test her faith.Pier 39 (MMKs first out of the country episode aired on July 26, 2009):*Ann Santos, Pascual:*When Miguel (Piolo Pascual) got petitioned by his father to the States, he thought that his dad intended to make up for all the lost time between them. However, he was treated so badly that he would rather be homeless than live with him and his nasty second wife. Miguel would have starved to death if not for Arlene (Judy Ann Santos) who helped him pick up the pieces of his life. Together they were able to conquer their fears and create something beautiful out of their miserable past.Baul (Chest):*Santos, Reyes:*Years after a heart-wrenching incident, Minda (Charo Santos-Concio) returned to her hometown to make Letty (Connie Reyes) pay for stealing her fianc (Belmonte) away from her. But it was not sweet revenge because their friendship mattered more than the man who came between them. Would Letty and Minda truly open their hearts and let the healing begin?Unan (Pillow) (portrayal of Vegas lifestory):*Panganiban:*Ever since she was young, people already noticed her talent. Little Darling as her family calls her, Julie Vega started in showbizness very young when she was first discovered by a talent coordinator and offered her a commercial stint. She personally felt the love of working for TV that as a young kid, she would pray that she get the roles she auditions for. Her first project was Ang Mga Mata ni Angelita. From then on, her popularity was irrepressible. The most tragic part of her life was when his brother died. Julie Vega deeply mourned. One day, she felt weak and weaker as the days pass. At the height of her career, Julie died. Until now, her family never revealed her illness.Sing-along Bar (portrayal of Ai delas Alass lifestory):*Soriano:*When Ai-Ai (played by Maricel Soriano) was young, she was given away by her biological mom to her aunt. As she was growing up, she considered herself unlucky for always getting caught in a series of unfortunate events. She cannot also find a decent job to help her earn a living. Until one day, she was offered a job in a comedy bar. A famous person discovered her talents and offered her to sing in a concert. This paved her way to TV shows and movies where she started very low. Later on, she will meet a man that she will marry and from then on, she considers her life a roller coaster. Amidst all the challenges she is facing, she made her way on top of her dreams.Sa kandungan mo, Inay (In my mothers lap):*Linda:*Sisters Millet (Janice De Belen), and Cielo (Charo Santos-Concio) despised their mother (Anita Linda) because of her cruelty towards them. Millet especially envied her sister Leslie (Bonnevie), because she was their moms favorite and received special treatment.Retaso (Remnant):*Aunor:*Since the beginning of her relationship with Dado (Joel Torre), a widower, Anita (Nora Aunor) knew that she will become a step-mother to his three children. It was hard for Anita to win the love of the children but later they felt Anitas genuine concern and eventually opened up to her. But just when things were slowly falling into place she discovers that Dado has been cheating on her. Will she be able to turn her back on the children, whose lives now depended on her?Burda (Pillowcase):*Cuneta:*Lita (Sharon Cuneta) has been taking care of Stephen (Patrick Garcia) since he was a baby because his parents are always busy with work and going out of the country. Even though shes just his yaya, Lita looked after Stephen like a real mother. Stephen eventually reaches his teens and Lita is often caught in between her ward and his parents differences. An incident makes Lita realize her limitations as yaya and in stills in her the hard lesson of letting go.Lapida (Gravestone):*Aquino, Salvador:*Jan (Phillip Salvador), a single parent, earns a living as a fireman. During a mission, he is able to save the lives of Annie (Aquino) and her son. But unknown to him, his own son sneakily follows him inside the burning house and dies. Annie in return helps him with his grief and they become close friends. As their friendship blossom into love, will Annie and Jan be able to reconcile their differences and make their relationship work?Bisikleta (Bicycle):*Dolphy:*When Abel (Dolphy) caught his wife cheating on him with his best friend Carding, he angrily drove them away and was left with a son to care for. He would have made amends with Liza for their sons sake but an unfortunate circumstance got him imprisoned for 40 years. As soon as he got out, however, he sought his family again to prove his innocence to his son whom he lived for all this time.Specials15th Anniversary CelebrationIn 2006, MMK marked their 15th anniversary on television by presenting a two-part special episode that stars Santos, Davao and Salvador entitled Regalo (Gift). The story was about Daisy Hernandez, a mother who devote most of her time to her daughter.()()16th Anniversary CelebrationIn 2007, MMK presented an episode of their 16th anniversary entitled Rehas (Jail) where actress Pareo played the story of a mother who stuggles to take care of her three mentally ill children in Aklan. Her acting won her Best Drama Performance By An Actress at the 12th Television Awards() while director Jerry Lopez Sineneng won the Best Direction in 2008.() Also for this episode, MMK won the Special Award in Drama at the 2008 Seoul International Drama Awards.()()18th Anniversary CelebrationIn 2009, MMK celebrated their 18th anniversary by presenting five special episodes and four of which were filmed in the States, in association with Filipino Channel.:Pansit (August 1, 2009)::*features Gonzales and de las Alas::*A story about an 18 year old debutant who struggles to cope in adolescence due to money problems, including her own debut.:Cap (August 8, 2009)::*features Noel Trinidad, Nanding Josef, Joji Isla, Lucita Soriano, Louella Albornoz and Luna::*A story of Filipino World War II veterans living in Francisco, California and their fight for equal benefits from the United States.:Apron (August 15, 2009)::*features Toengi and Ryan Eigenmann::*A story of a couple having a life in America and the struggles they face while living their Dream.:Letters (August 22, 2009)::*features Princess Punzalan and Michael De Mesa::*A story of a woman struggling in her own divorce and finding love again.:Car (August 29, 2009)::*features Alajar, Young, Ilonah Jean and Anne Walters::*A story of a friendship between a Filipino caregiver and a patient with disease.20th Anniversary - Dalawang DekadaDocumentaryOn September 25, 2011 Sundays Best, Maalaala Mo Kaya aired its 20th year anniversary documentary special called MMK 20: Maalaala Mo Kaya Dalawang Dekada on ABS-CBN.() During the documentary special, it features different segments including the highlights of the best episodes in the series, commentaries from the artists, director and producers who contributed to the program and featured stories relayed in the program for 20 years. Segment hosts are Geronimo for dramatic episodes, Panganiban for romance & comedy episodes, Navarro for MMKs episode titles, Concepcion for celebrity potrayals, Pascual for love stories by the period of time, and Milby for out of the country episodes. The last part of the special is an interview with Vilma Santos with the programs main host Charo Santos.CelebrationSimilar to its 18th anniversary celebration, the shows 20th anniversary would be celebrated month-long with five special episodes. The episodes were taped in varying locations in the Philippines and abroad including Bukidnon, Palawan, Canada, and Spain.()():Palawan (October 1, 2011) Tungkod::*Aquino, Yul Servo::*The episode will feature Angel Aquino who will play the role of a mother who fought her way to stop mining in Palawan, but undergone series of devastating events like blindness and broken family. This episode is directed by 62nd Cannes Film Festival best director Mendoza.():Bukidnon (The Happy Feet Story) (October 8, 2011)::*Prats, Nash Aguas, Rivera::*The episode will features the life story of Ramon and Bambi, the tap-dancing brothers or also known in the Philippines as Happy Feet from Bukidnon, a runner-up at Pilipinas Got Talent Season 2 played by John Pratts & Nash Aguas. The episode is directed by Dado Lumibao.():Barcelona (October 15, 2011)::*Jake Cuenca, Ricky Davao::*The episode will feature the story of Louie, a cross-dresser who lives in Barcelona, Spain and his story on how he live his alternative life only trying to please his father in order to accept him portrayed by Jake Cuenca. The episode is directed by Dado Lumibao.():Aurora (October 22, 2011)::*A special episode to be aired on October 22, 2011.():Canada (October 29, 2011)::*A special episode to be aired on October 29, 2011.(All-Time MMK Actors/ActressesDuring the MMK 20: Maalaala Mo Kaya Dalawang Dekada documentary special, they listed the actors and actresses that appeared most in MMK episodes.FilmsMaalaala Mo Kaya: The Movie (1994)As part of the third anniversary of the program, a film version was created produced by Cinema and directed by Olivia Lamasan released on June 22, 1994.()() The plot of the film revolves around the story of Ana, a young girl who took the responsibility of being the mother of her cousin Marrisas son while the latter spent her life in Japan as an entertainer. It stars Aiko Melendez, Richard Gomez and Chin-Chin Gutierrez. Also the film compete as one of the entries for the 1994 Manila Film Festival and awarded Melendez as the Best Actress.()Maalaala Mo Kaya (20th Anniversary)In 2011, it was announced that the program will do another film version for its 20th anniversary. The film will star Alonzo, Zanjoe Marudo and Locsin to be directed by Laurenti Dyogi under Star Cinema.()()()Radio dramaIn March 2007, MMK started its radio counterpart Maalaala Mo Kaya sa DZMM as daily drama being broadcast on DZMM.() It is also hosted by Charo Santos-Concio and airs weekdays from 12:30 to 1:00 PM.() It was recently recognized as the Best Drama Program at the 32nd Catholic Mass Media Awards.() Other awards including Best Radio Drama Program at the 18th KBP Golden Dove Awards 2009(), Best Drama Program at the 31st Catholic Mass Media Awards (CMMA) 2009, Best Drama at the 29th Catholic Mass Media Awards (CMMA) 2007 and Best Drama Program at the 16th KBP Golden Dove Awards 2007.()Literary adaptationMaalaala Mo Kaya KomiksThe drama anthology also created a book adaptation under Bituin Komiks owned by Mango Comics and Sterling with its initial issue on March 27, 2008.() The first comic series was about the life story of Philippine comedian Chokoleit with art direction of Arnel Avetria, adapted by Jonas Diego from a teleplay by Maribel G. Ilag, illustrated by Mannie Abeleda and Jim Faustino, tones and letters by Sandy Gonzaga and edited by Lawrence Mijares.Maalaala Mo Kaya Romance PaperbackThe drama anthology also has a paperback (pocketbooks) novels under ABS-CBN Publishing.() Although the novels only features romantic stories.See also*of programs broadcast by ABS-CBNReferencesExternal links*Official website**Mo Kaya
2671054
Lenny_(short_story)
 Lenny is a fiction story by Asimov, originally published in the January 1958 issue of Infinity Science Fiction, and included in the collections Rest of the Robots (1964), Complete Robot (1982), and Visions (1990).Plot summaryRobots is planning the production of the LNE series of robots, which are designed for boron mining in the asteroid belt. After a technician neglects to lock a terminal, a tourist accidentally reprograms the prototype LNE, wiping clean the structure of the robots brain, and rendering it a baby in all effects.Robopsychologist Calvin experiments with it, in the process naming it Lenny (and developing maternal feelings for it), and after a month, has been able to teach it a few simple words and actions. She gets emotionally attached to Lenny and realizes that robots can be built that are able to learn, instead of being built for a fixed and specific purpose.Complications arise when Lenny, unaware of its own force, breaks the arm of a computing technician, which is about to cause widespread robots attacking humans panic. However, Susan Calvin manages to exploit the sense of danger to add a new thrill of robotic investigation, just as happens with space exploration or radiation physics.Harlan Ellisons screenplayThe Ellison screenplay I, Robot, based on Asimovs Robot stories, would greatly expand Lennys role and link Lenny to Evidence. The latter short story concerns Stephen Byerley, a politician who has been accused of being a robot and therefore ineligible for office. The original short story never explicitly states whether or not Byerley is a human. However, the screenplay reveals that Byerley is not just a robot, but Lenny in disguise.(nouvelle)(Asimov)(Asimov)
2673301
Spoil_tip
Spoil (disambiguation)Spoilthumb|right|Abandoned spoil tip in PennsylvaniaA spoil tip (also called a boney pile, gob pile, bing or pit heap) is a pile built of accumulated spoil - the overburden removed during coal and ore mining. These waste materials are generally composed of shale, as well as smaller quantities of carboniferous sandstone and various other residues. Spoil tips are not formed of slag, but in some areas they are referred to as slag heaps. Spoil is distinct from tailings, which is the processed material that remains after the valuable components have been extracted from ore.Spoil tips may be conical in shape, and can appear as conspicuous features of the landscape, or they may be much flatter and eroded, especially if vegetation has established itself. The highest in Europe is in Loos-en-Gohelle in the former mining area of Pas-de-Calais. It comprises a range of five cones, of which two reach , surpassing the highest peak in Flanders, Cassel.The oldest coal-based spoil tips may still contain enough coal to begin spontaneous slow combustion. This results in a form of vitrification of the shale, which then acquires sufficient mechanical strength to be of use in road construction. Some can therefore have a new life in being thus exploited; for example, the flattened pile of residue from the 11/19 site of Loos-en-Gohelle. Conversely, others are painstakingly preserved on account of their ecological wealth. With the passage of time, they become colonised with a variety of flora and fauna, sometimes foreign to the region. This diversity follows the mining exploitation. For example, because the miners threw their apple or pear cores into the wagons, the spoil tips became colonised with fruit trees. One can even observe the proliferation of buckler-leaved sorrel (French sorrel - Rumex scutatus), the seeds of which have been carried within the cracks in the pine timber used in the mines. Furthermore, on account of its dark colour, the South face of the spoil tip is significantly warmer than its surroundings, which contributes to the diverse ecology of the area. In this way, the spoil tip of Pinchonvalles, at Avion, hosts 200 different varieties of higher plants. Some thirty species of birds nest there.Some cultivate vines, as in the case of spoil tip No7 of the coal-mining region of Mariemont-Bascoup near Chapelle-lez-Herlaimont (province of Hainaut) which produces some 3,000 litres of wine each year.Image:Lievin France pano2005-08.jpg|thumb|600px|center|spoil tips on the site cople 11/19 in Loos-en-Gohelle (right). The town of Livin is on the left (Picture taken in 2005).Some spoil tips provide for various sporting activities. The slopes of the spoil tips of 11/19 at Loos-en-Gohelle, or again, at Nux-les-Mines, are used for sports, for example ski and luge, since the provision of a piste on the flank of the heap.In Belgium, a distance footpath along the spoil tips () (GR-412, Sentier des terrils) was opened in 2005. It leads from Bernissart in western Hainaut to Blegny in the province of Lige.  In the United States, mining companies have not been allowed to leave behind abandoned piles since the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act was passed in 1977.FutureThe question of re-utilisation of spoil tips is sometimes raised. *At Nux-les-Mines, an artificial ski slope has been provided on an old spoil tip, the building of which has provided it with a novel use.* Because they are inappropriate for building purposes, old spoil tips can be partially revegetated and provide valuable green spaces.  * Some spoil tips contain residual coal and evolving techniques allow renewed exploitation of this asset.* There has also been research into various recycling techniques, which result in spoil being removed from the site and potentially used for other commercial or construction purposes.Environmental effectsSpoil tips sometimes grew to millions of tons, and, having been abandoned, remain as huge piles today. They trap solar heat, making it difficult (although not impossible) for vegetation to take root; this encourages erosion and creates dangerous, unstable slopes. Existing techniques for regreening spoil tips include the use of geotextiles to control erosion as the site is resoiled and simple vegetation such as grass is seeded on the slope.The piles also create acid rock drainage, which pollutes streams and rivers.Subterranean combustionAs some spoil tips resulting from industries such as coal or oil shale production can contain a relatively high proportion of hydrocarbons, they can commence spontaneous subterranean combustion, which can be followed by surface fires.Such fires can follow slow combustion of residual hydrocarbons. Their extinction can require complete encasement, which can prove impossible for technical and financial reasons. Sprinkling is generally ineffective and injecting water under pressure counter-productive, because it carries oxygen, bringing the risk of explosion.The weak environmental and public health impact of these fires leads generally to waiting for their natural extinction, which can take a number of decades.LandslipWith spoil tips there is a danger of landslip. An example was the disaster in Wales 1966, in which a total 144 people were killed, 116 of whom were school children, mostly between the ages of 7 and 10. Five teachers also died in the accident.See alsoTailingsExternal links*Spoil heap 11/19 in Loos-en-Gohelle *chaine.des.terrils.free.fr/ *Turning coal waste into light, 8 October 2004*Photo of a typical coal breaker with culm bank*Breaker Boys and Bony Pickers, 28 November 2006cs:Vsypkade:Bergehaldeet:Aherainemgieo:utmontofr:Terrilkk:(mijn)ja:pcd:Terrilpl:Hadaru:uk:wa:Teri
2677746
Underground_coal_mining
#REDIRECT mining
2681360
List_of_Land_of_the_Lost_characters_and_species
Land of the Lost was a 19741976 TV series relating the adventures of the Marshall family (including Will and Holly and their father, later replaced by their uncle). The Marshalls become trapped in a universe populated by dinosaurs, ape-like creatures called Pakuni, and anthropomorphic reptilian creatures named Sleestak. This article concerns these characters, along with other human and alien visitors to the Land of the Lost.Travel to the Land of the Lost is almost always accidental, via time worm holes that appear to glow and/or billow mist. Time doorways sometimes appear to open and close spontaneously, but they can also be opened and controlled by Pylon crystal matrix tables and by a matrix table in the Lost City. Time doorways obey a form of temporal energy conservation law; whenever something enters the Land of the Lost via a time doorway, something else must then leave it, though not necessarily at exactly the same time.() This aspect was abandoned in the shows third and final season, after new producers took over and the shows mythology was substantially changed.At least one Pylon periodically travels to other universes, acting as a sort of interdimensional elevator, triggered by a conjunction of the Lands moons that occurs every three to four years. One of the universes it stops at along the way appears to be the Marshalls home Earth.Visitors to the LandThe MarshallsRick, Will, and Holly Marshall are the human characters on Land of the Lost.Rick Marshall, his son Will and his young daughter Holly, were rafting on the Colorado River in the Grand Canyon when they were caught in the greatest earthquake ever known. The river was diverted over a cliff, and as the Marshalls raft plunged over the resulting waterfall they struck a time doorway partway down. Trapped in the Land of the Lost with only the minimal camping equipment theyd had on the raft, they make their camp in a natural cave partway up the face of a cliff they call the High Bluff.The three of them are from California,() though Rick grew up on Ford Street in Indianapolis and attended Fillmore High there.() The Marshalls formerly lived in Indiana.() Mrs. Marshall died of unspecified causes when Will and Holly were very young, and neither of them remembers her very clearly. Rick describes her as being headstrong and beautiful, just like Holly, and apparently loved her deeply.() Will and Holly frequently suffer bouts of sibling rivalry, though they overcome such issues when the situation becomes difficult enough. Will is the most adventurous of the Marshalls, frequently taking shortcuts as an excuse to explore new territory and tampering with Pylons to determine their function. Holly suffers from a fear of heights.At the beginning of the third season, Rick Marshall unexpectedly returns home via a time doorway in a newly discovered pylon; Will and Hollys uncle Jack Marshall, who had been searching for them for six months by following the same river route along which theyd originally disappeared, experiences another earthquake and falls through a doorway into the Land. At the same time, another earthquake occurs in the Land itself that buries High Bluff along with the Marshalls equipment and provisions. Therefore, the Marshalls move into a temple near the Lost City instead (not the same as the Builders Temple).The series ends without showing the Marshalls ultimate fate, though there are some ambiguous suggestions of it. In Elsewhen, an adult version of Holly visits via a time doorway from the future, and in another episode a mysterious repairman confidently predicts that the Marshalls will someday escape the Land of the Lost.An alternate universe version of the Marshalls (who wear clothing that our Marshalls lost upon entry into the Land of the Lost, and who did not suffer the loss of their mother) appear in Split Personality.It is discovered in the last first-season episode( that the Marshalls were their own counterbalance; their death in the Land of the Lost in that episode is what causes the time doorway that drew them there in the first place to open. Circle was intended to serve as a final episode in the event that the show was not renewed, but since two more seasons were videotaped after this episode depicted their escape (including the seemingly incompatible substitution of Jack for Rick), much debate has ensued in the fan community over exactly what this paradox meant for the Marshalls.In the 2009 movie, the three characters are substantially different. Although given names are retained, they are no longer related to each other, and dysfunctional personality traits are added for comic effect.Jefferson Davis Collie IIIJefferson Davis Collie III is an old and somewhat deranged Confederate artillery man who has been in the Land of the Lost for many decades. He lives in the caves near where the river goes underground, obsessively mining the rich veins of light crystals there. His only companion is a cannon named Sarah with which he drives away the occasional group of Sleestak attackers using home-made gunpowder; he reports that Sleestak taste a whole lot like lobster. But then again, not like lobster, if you know what I mean. Otherwise, his diet seems to consist solely of fish and wild mushrooms. The Marshalls encounter him when they attempt to ride the river out of the Land in the episode Downstream, but he ultimately returns to his cave rather than face the dinosaurs in the jungle outside. Apparently, Collie is turned to stone by Medusa (see Native Inhabitants section below), appearing in her garden during the third-season episode Medusa.Collie was played by Edmiston, the same actor who later played Enik the Altrusian. The original script for Downstream called for him to have a rifle, but concerns over young viewers being inspired to play with firearms resulted in its substitution with a cannon.RaniRani (Erica Hagen) is actually an adult version of Holly from an unspecified point in the future. In Elsewhen she arrives through an open time doorway in Eniks cave to give aid to her younger self after Holly runs off and leaves her family in one of the lower caverns. She appears to be in her early to mid-20s, with shoulder-length blonde hair and wears a simple yet elegant gown made from a pale blue fabric. Around her neck, she wears a pendant with a large blue crystal set into it with smaller yellow crystals framing it. She offers three identical pendants to her younger self which work like walkie-talkies and will allow her to communicate with other wearers over long distance. She has a scar on the inside of her right arm which she received while helping her brother out of a difficult situation. She convinces Holly that her family sees her as the baby of the family and are therefore overprotective of her and that she needs to help them any way she can. She also confesses with great sadness that they wont always be there. Rani also tells her that in order to help them she must overcome her fear of heights by looking at the earth. Holly finally realizes who she is after she receives a fresh scar identical to Ranis while fighting the Sleestak god in order to buy time for her father to haul an injured Will up and out of the pit. She also claims that Rani was her secret name for herself that no one else knew about. Rani says that she is proof that her family can escape the Land one day and disappears through the open doorway.Peter Koenig and Harry PottsPeter Koenig was a private in General Washingtons Revolutionary Army who arrived in the Land of the Lost some time prior to the Marshalls.( Koenig and his companion Harry Potts explored the Land extensively in search of a way back to Earth.When the Marshalls first arrive, they discover a stone pillar in the jungle where Koenig had written Beware of Sleestak with chalk. The Marshalls only learn much later who had been responsible for this warning, when they discovered Koenigs journal. Koenig claims to have dubbed the Sleestak thus in honor of Major Joshua Sleestak. Koenig claims in his journal to have taught the Pakuni a few English words.Koenig met his death when he followed Potts path into the Lost City. Koenig went into the third entrance, where the pillars end, which eventually led through a narrow passageway into the Devils Cauldron. This was a lava chamber, with a narrow ledge, where he became trapped when the lava level rose, reviving the Sleestak. He preferred to await death in the lava chamber, rather than facing the Sleestak who had gathered outside the chamber to catch him. The Marshalls find Koenigs skeleton in the chamber and narrowly escape a similar fate.Beauregard JacksonBeauregard Jackson (Masak) of Fort Worth, Texas is a hypersonic glider pilot from 20 years in Earths future relative to when the Marshalls became trapped in the Land of the Lost. As shown in the episode Hurricane, he becomes briefly trapped in the Land of the Lost when Will, tinkering with the crystal matrix table in a Pylon located high on a mountain, causes a time doorway to open high above the ground. Jacksons glider was re-entering Earths atmosphere over Ecuador, returning from a routine transit between Phoenix Port and Space Station 5. His gliders tail is suddenly severed, and the next thing he knows he is hanging from a tree by his parachute. With the help of the Marshalls, Jackson soon manages to return via the same time doorway, but the Marshalls cannot follow since Earths end of the time doorway is 15 miles above the ground and there is only one parachute.However, in the original script Jackson makes an offhand remark about Texas being its own country prompting a suspicious Rick to compare the currency in his wallet with Jacksons. He discovers that not only is Jackson from the future but from an alternate timeline, where Texas was not part of the United States and oil (not gold) is the standard.The ZarnThe Zarn, (portrayed by Snowden and voiced by Marvin Miller), is introduced in the eponymous second-season episode.  The Zarn is a humanoid alien who is invisible except for white spots of light scattered over his surface; he doesnt even leave footprints when he walks on soft soil. His starship became trapped in the Land of the Lost while traveling through hyperspace. The Zarn has powerful psionic abilities, able to read minds at a great distance and telekinetically levitate objects. However, this powerful telepathy is also the Zarns greatest weakness; intense, angry emotions in people nearby cause the Zarn great pain, and the spots of light on his invisible body turn red in reaction.The Zarn is apparently a researcher of some kind whose mission involved the study of other intelligent species before he became trapped in the Land. Since the Zarn is very sensitive to others emotions, he creates android research assistants to interact with them, programming them from the memories of people he has scanned. The androids are totally convincing although their hands are cold to the touch. They have histories that incorporate great amounts of detail based on the knowledge of the scanned subject, to an eerie and suspicious degree. When the Marshalls first encounter the Zarn he creates an android named Sharon who is based on Rick Marshalls memories, such that she claims to have grown up in the same town as him, gone to the same school, and have the same interests. The excessive coincidences eventually give Sharon away, however, at which point the Zarn causes her to self-destruct.The Zarn also has a combat robot that he named Fred, a 10-foot-tall dinosaur-like armless biped robot with a tail, a long neck and beaked head with glowing eyes.() Fred is very strong, but fairly slow. Rick and Will destroy Fred by luring it to a mountain top during a lightning storm. The model for Fred was a metal armature used by special effects artist Chang to animate Junior the dinosaur, sans flesh.The Zarn is extremely overconfident, arrogant, and certain of his superior knowledge, even when it actually has holes. The Zarn is also quite petty, using telekinesis to play tricks on people he dislikes and to sow discord. He claims this behavior is research. He frequently mocks people by speaking telepathically in the voices of people they know, saying hurtful things dredged from their memories. At one point the Zarn claimed that the emotion of pity was the most painful one for him to be exposed to,( so perhaps some of this behavior is intended to prevent that. The Zarn also appears in The Babysitter, wherein he disparages various emotions he claims to have given up a thousand years before.The 2009 movie incarnation of the Zarn (voiced by Nimoy) is a red-skinned Altrusian who was murdered by Enik while relaying a future message for any unfortunate soul whom he tricks into aiding him. Though Enik uses the first part of the holographic message, Holly uncovers the full message by accident along with the Zarns skeleton.William BlandingsBlandings (Main) is a mysterious figure who appears to the Marshalls as a pudgy, balding man in his late 40s with a British accent. He claims to be a repairman for the sun (although probably just the Sun pylon) and carries an umbrella and a valise with him. Although apparently human, Blandings displays considerable - nearly clairvoyant - knowledge about both the Marshalls and the Land of the Lost and the implements he carries with him are anything but ordinary. His umbrella acts something like an air conditioner keeping himself and Uncle Jack cool during the sweltering heat of increasing solar flare activity. Much like the pylons, his valise appears extradimensional in nature and from it Blandings can produce anything he wants. He also carries an amulet which produces a forcefield which he uses to repel the Sleestak. Although a formidable being, Blandings offers hints that he was sent by and actually serves a higher power.MalakMalak (Kiel), the self-proclaimed God of the Cro-Magnon, is a bit of a cypher. For a Cro-Magnon, he is quite evolved and possesses knowledge more on a Bronze Age level as he carries a sword, knows what a ship is, and has the ability to divert an underground river into the Sleestak egg caves if they dont pay tribute. In addition, he speaks fluent English and fully understands the concept of time travel as he asks Jack what age and time he comes from. He also claims to be King of the Teutons. While his true origins and title (if any) remain unknown, what is clear is that Malak is an opportunistic barbarian who is not above lying, stealing, threatening, or bullying people to get what he wants. How and when he came to the Land of the Lost is never revealed.Native inhabitantsThe Land of the Losts megafauna consists primarily of dinosaurs; species noted included Coelophysis, Tyrannosaurus, Allosaurus, Triceratops, Apatosaurus (described in the series as Brontosaurus), and Pteranodon. There are also iguanas,() wild blue and red pigs,()() pink and blue chicken-like birds,() fish,( rhinoceros, skunk, goats, guenia pigs, large beetles (called Tula by Enik),(() bamboo, and giant varieties of modern berries and vegetables. It is unknown whether they were placed here by the Altrusians or if they came to the Land of the Lost accidentally. Rick suggests that the plants grow unusually large due to the nature of the soil.() There were also a number of species that did not appear closely related to known Earth life: the aforementioned Sleestak, a large venus-flytrap-like plant capable of consuming prey the size of a large rodent using a paralytic poison,( a two-headed Elasmosaurus-like creature (LuLu), and a fire-breathing Dimetrodon-like creature (Torchy).Several dinosaurs that the Marshalls encountered frequently were given names, for example, Spike, for at least two Triceratops; Spot, for many Coelophysis; and Dopey, the baby Brontosaurus that they sometimes used as a animal, along with his adopted mother, Emily (who, according to Gerrold, was named after Bronte).It should be noted that LuLu and Torchy both appear in the third season of the series, the former as a result of a earthquake that brought her to the surface. Both monsters came into the show as the result when the consistency and style of the series writing appeared to suffer a significant change; one episode in the third season also features the legendary Greek Medusa, for example. Another species that made an appearance in the third season was a Yeti-like creature called Tappa and a similar creature named Kona, as well as a unicorn-pony called a Toe-Ki that lives high in the mountains, prevented from descending into the jungle by a guardian statue left behind by the Altrusians.The 2009 movie incarnation included not only some of the dinosaurs in the original series, but also Velociraptors, Compsognathus and a giant crab.GrumpyA Tyrannosaurus, Grumpy was first of the Dinosaurs the Marshall family encountered, occasionally chasing them to High Bluff, being tall enough to look inside as the Marshalls ram a sharpened log they called the flyswatter into Grumpys open mouth and drive him away. Holly speculates that Grumpy continued to return due to the large quantities of a ground-hugging fern-like plant she dubs dinosaur nip that grows in the area.()The 2009 movie incarnation of Grumpy, like the other dinosaurs, makes a meal of any unfortunate human who ends up in the Land of the Lost. Grumpy seems to have a vendetta against Marshall due to him insulting his intelligence, and focuses all attention on him alone allowing Will, Holly, and Cha-ka to seek cover. In their final battle Grumpy ingests Rick who then passes through his intestinal tract dislodging a blockage calming Grumpy and endearing Rick to him to the point that Grumpy saves Will, Cha-ka, Holly, from swarming Sleestak allowing them to escape into the pylon in chase of Enik.Big AliceAn Allosaurus, Big Alice dwells around the Lost City and is referred to by the Sleestaks as Selima, meaning Protector in their language due to her role in keeping predators away from their eggs. She even tangled with Grumpy on occasion whenever he trespasses on her territory. She also had her own egg that hatched into her son Junior.The 2009 movie incarnation of Big Alice made a minor appearance, attacking Marshall at the desert before ingesting a tank of nitrogen that causes her to explode.PakuniPakuni (singular: Paku, though this usage is not consistently obeyed) are a species of small ape-like humanoids, possibly meant to be aliens, ground-dwelling and bipedal, but not fully upright in posture. They are primarily herbivores, though they do occasionally eat small animals (an iguana-like lizard in the episode Stone Soup, for example). They know how to create fire using flints,() and manufacture simple tools such as the sharpened sticks they use as defensive weapons. Pakuni display significant skill with representational art and have superstitious rituals that usually include chanting but they do not appear to understand music. They live in small family groups that construct strong bamboo enclosures as shelters. The family groups are territorial but they are quite capable of forming alliances and friendships with neighbors when resources are plentiful and they understand the concept of trade. Young Pakuni undergo a rite of adulthood in which they must steal the egg of a large predatory dinosaur to prove their worth.The 2009 movie incarnation of the Pakuni resemble their original series selves, yet live in greater numbers. The females of Cha-Kas tribe resemble scantily-clad human females, although Cha-Ka claimed that all the female Paku were ugly.The Paku language is relatively primitive. It was created for the show by the linguist Fromkin, and is similar to the languages of Africa. It has regular ante-penultimate stress, homorganic nasals, nasalization of vowels before nasals, and deletion of final vowels before vowel initial suffixes. The language eventually had about 200 words; Pakuni simply means people in this language.Cha-KaOne of Pakuni to appear in the series, Cha-Ka (Paley) is the most favorably disposed toward the Marshalls. In the first episode the Marshalls rescue him from Grumpy the Tyrannosaurus and splinted Cha-Kas broken leg. Subsequently, Cha-Ka forms a close friendship with the family and with Holly in particular, helping them whenever possible and occasionally visits the Marshalls in their cave in High Bluff. Much of Cha-Kas moments range from his attempt to undergo the rite of adulthood to facing a mysterious being who saw him worthy of advancing on a intellectual level, resulting with him gaining the ability to speak near perfect English, play an alto recorder-like wind-instrument, walk and run upright, and learn to make fire by Season 3. After being separated from Ta and Sa after the earthquake that marks the beginning of season three, Cha-Ka moves in with the Marshalls at the temple.The 2009 movie incarnation of Cha-Ka (or Chaka) is a Pakuni prince under a death sentence for immoral behavior, who is rescued by Marshall and company seconds before he would have been executed. Chaka follows them for the rest of the movie and even brings Will to his homeland at the end of the movie. Chakas accomplishments in the film include stealing Marshalls wallet, introducing Marshall, Holly and Will to an edible narcotic fruit, and helping them get the amplifier back from a nest full of hatching pterodactyls.Ta and SaThe two older Pakuni who look after Cha-Ka and boss him around. The exact familial relationship between these Pakuni is never explicitly stated (Gerrold deliberately left the relationship vague but describes Ta and Sa as being more akin to Cha-Kas elder siblings rather than parents). Ta (Giamalva in Season 1 and McKay in Season 2) is a domineering, egotistical and a treacherous Paku (Gerrold referred to Ta as a small, furry Hitler in his script)who never comes to trust the Marshalls. He can be bargained with, however, and although he usually attempts to cheat the Marshalls it is not particularly difficult to see through the trick. Sa (Baird) occasionally seems to be a moderating influence on Ta, but for the most part serves as a follower. Ta is sometimes considered to be the alpha Paku() or a witch doctor.( He has knowledge of some of the workings of the Land of the Lost, which he disguises with a clever use of herbs and phony chanting and dancing to make it appear that he controls them. For example, he understands that the Pylon Express only opens when the three moons are aligned and so times his own opening ritual to coincide with that, and he knows that the effects of the poison from the carnivorous plant( are only temporary and so hurries to sell the Marshalls a cure before it wears off on its own. Both Ta and Sa get separated from Cha-Ka during the earthquake that marks the beginning of season three and were not seen there after, though it was mentioned their tracks were seen ending at a dead-end cliff-face and disapearing by Will in Season 3, Episode 8.* Although never referenced within the series itself, the pilot script refers to the Pakunis full names as Cha-Ka-Ta and Cha-Ka-Sa but shortens them to Ta and Sa for the sake of brevity. The youngest Paku was just called Cha-Ka because he lacked identity with his tribe until such time as he earned his name. Originally, there was also a fourth Paku named Cha-Ka-Ra but Ra was dropped from the story during pre-production.SleestakSleestaks are devolved, green humanoids with both reptilian and insectoid features; they have scaly skin with frills around the neck, bulbous unblinking eyes, pincer-like hands, stubby tails, and a single blunt horn on top of the head, and bear a resemblance to the hypothetical Dinosauroid. Sleestaks often communicate with a hissing sound that rarely changes in characteristics. However, like their Altrusian ancestors, they possess some rudimentary form of telepathy as well. Sleestaks are more sophisticated than Pakuni and are able to manufacture crossbows, rope, nets, periscopes( and other relatively advanced technologies. Sleestak are typically equipped with a crossbow and a quiver full of metal bolts which hang from their waist. The Sleestak have a current population of about 7,000 according to the Library of Skulls,( but there were only three Sleestak costumes available for the shows production, which sometimes required creative editing to create the illusion that they were that numerous.Sleestaks live in the Lost City, an underground tunnel complex originally constructed by the Altrusians. They hate bright light and rarely venture out during the day. Sleestaks also have a hibernation season during which they cocoon themselves into rocky alcoves using some sort of webbing; cool air keeps them in hibernation, and the heat from lava in a pool that the character Peter Koenig (see below) dubbed Devils Cauldron inside the caverns of the Lost City revives them again on a regular schedule.( The Sleestaks are very defensive of the Lost City. They know that their ancestors built it, but do not know how or why. They have occasionally tried exploring beyond the chasm that separates the Lost City from the rest of the Land, but their expeditions generally do not return; they consider the City to be their only refuge. However, after the earthquake at the beginning of season 3 the Sleestaks are afraid and try to kick the Marshalls out of the temple. Fortunately, Jack gets the door shut and the Sleestaks are trapped outside.The Sleestaks have encountered many other humans who have become trapped in the Land of the Lost before the Marshalls arrive, and regard humans as a terrible threat; they attempt to capture and sacrifice humans to their god (an unseen beast who dwells in a smoky pit) at every opportunity.* According to Dave Gerrolds DVD commentary for The Sleestak God, the god was originally intended as a running gag with it being this loud, mysterious, hungry beast that no one ever sees ultimately revealing as something much smaller (but no less voracious) than it sounded. Had Gerrold remained on-staff as part of Season 2, viewers would have discovered that the god was actually the Sleestak Queen.Altrusian moths are considered sacred by the Sleestak and required for fertilization of their eggs. The Sleestak hunt them when they emerge during the night.( In Blackout, the Sleestaks scheme to cause perpetual night by disabling a second clock pylon, allowing them to capture the Altrusian moths. The Sleestak plan to devour large quantities of the moths so that in one thousand hours, a thousand new Sleestak will be born allowing them to resume control over the Land of the Lost. Unfortunately for the Sleestak (but fortunately for the Marshalls), the cold of the long night also begins killing the moths.(According to Wina Sturgeons original story for The Hole, the Sleestak ate bugs as a regular part of their diet and used a special drill attachment for their crossbow bolts to dig them out of trees)Sleestak eggs are gestated in a communal hatchery. The Sleestaks capture live animals and tie them up there, leaving them for the young to feed on when they hatch.( Occasionally, a Sleestak will be hatched that is a throwback to their Altrusian ancestors, being born with greater intelligence and with an innate knowledge of Altrusian history and technologythough not, for some reason, knowledge of the pylons or matrix operation. The other Sleestaks regard these throwbacks as a threat, and so they are also sacrificed to the Sleestak god when detected. One such throwback, named Slatch, is encountered by the Marshalls in the episode The Hole, but Slatch is never seen again thereafter.* Slatch was to have returned in an unproduced script called The Littlest Sleestak in which he comes to claim a juvenile Sleestak that the Marshalls had adopted after unknowingly taking home several of their eggs. However, the little one (now referred to as Speaks-To-Meat by the other Sleestak) is considered tainted by human contact and thus deemed unfit.The Sleestak are governed by both a Council and a Leader. The Sleestak Leader wears a distinctive pendant and Enik occasionally negotiates with him as in the episode Trade. The Council often consults the Library of Skulls where several skulls belonging to their ancient ancestors are somehow able to communicate with them and dispense advice. These skulls seem to be from the era when the Altrusians were devolving into the Sleestaks, as they are still quite intelligent and capable of speech, but are also very hostile and warlike (at least in the third season).The Pakuni word for Sleestak is Sarisataka.Ex-Detroit Piston and current WNBA coach Laimbeer played a Sleestak before attending Notre Dame.(http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0071005/epcast Episodes Cast for Land of the Lost) He was a Verdes High School student, and the show raided their basketball team for tall people to play Sleestaks.Though only three appear in the 1991 TV series, the Sleestaks are made to be more reptilian in nature and just as violent.The 2009 movie incarnation of the Sleestaks resemble their original series selves, yet can open their mouths wide to reveal two sets of teeth. Made to be more feral in nature and able to venture in daylight, the Sleestaks answer to either the Library of Skulls, what remained of the Altrusians, or Enik while he possessed the crystal to control them. The Sleestaks also have a high reproductive rate and sex drive and are able to lay a large number of eggs.AltrusiansThe ancestors and descendants of Modern Sleestak were the Altrusians. Their civilization fell, and will rise again in a continuous time-loop approximately 1,000 years earlier and later. The Sleestak sometimes use the term Altrusian to refer to themselves( and sometimes to refer only to the true Altrusians.( Physically, the Altrusians were similar to Sleestak, with the former marked by a shorter stature, an extra finger on each hand, and a golden yellow skin tone. Intellectually they were very different, however. The Altrusians possessed advanced psionic technologies based on light crystals and understood a great deal about the operation of the Land of the Lost. They strove for calm emotionlessness and as a result could be both cooperative and quite callous.One Altrusian, named Enik, is a recurring character in the series, introduced in the episode The Stranger. He travels to the current time accidentally via a time doorway. He initially believes himself to be in the distant past, but upon discovering the ruins of the Lost City, he theorizes that his people degenerated into modern Sleestak when they failed to control their hate and anger. Rick Marshall speculates that it was not the presence of hate that doomed the Altrusians, but rather the absence of compassion; Enik considers this to be a cogent argument and plans to return to his people to warn them of this flaw in their philosophy.Altrusians have a very strict  but self-serving  code of honor; they cannot allow others to show more self-control or make greater personal sacrifices than themselves. One can thus shame them into making sacrifices. In The Search, Will (unintentionally) convinces Enik to pass up a chance to return to his own time by first passing up an opportunity of his own to return to Earth. Enik also claims that Altrusians are incapable of lying although clearly they can bend the truth (or not give full disclosure of all facts) if its in their best interest to do so. In fact, it appears that Altrusians seldom do anything that does not benefit them in some way. While Enik told Jack Marshall that he grasped the concept of morality, he concluded that it was not logical. Also handed down from the Altrusians was the concept of Altrusian grace. This meant that someone (including a human) who helped a Sleestak would be allowed safe passage to and from the Library of Skulls to ask the Index Skull a single question.(The 2009 movie incarnation of the Altrusians resemble their original series selves, yet without their tunics (in the film, such a tunic is considered the mark of a criminal). All of the Altrusians are killed by Enik, producing the Library of Skulls.EnikEnik (Edmiston) introduced in the episode The Stranger, is one of the original Altrusian inhabitants from before their civilization fell, though he initially believes himself to be trapped in the Altrusians pre-civilized period. However, he too fell through a time doorway to become trapped in the current era of the Land of the Lost. He introduced himself as being one of the keepers of the time portals although its unclear if he is referring to a select number of Altrusians tasked with that responsibility or his entire race. As such, he is equipped with a piece of Altrusian technology called a Magetti, a large crystal suspended in a tetrahedral frame that Enik describes as a divining rod that can be used to locate and fix dimensional doorways, determining where and when they would open. The Magetti has a self-destruct mechanism that is triggered when its user experiences sufficiently-strong hostile emotions; this is a built-in safeguard to prevent it from falling into violent hands. Will Marshall inadvertently destroys it and forces Enik to rely on a different and less-suitable device (a companion piece to the Magetti that is worn around his neck as a pendant) to continue his efforts to return to his own time and warn his people of their fate.Enik is quite contemptuous of the current state of the Sleestaks since the fall of the Altrusian civilization, though he feels compelled to aid them because they are his future, albeit contemptible. The Sleestaks return the contempt, referring to him as the dwarf, and fear that he intends to seize power over them.() He is equipped with a bracelet of red crystals he can use to cause beings to be overcome by hallucinations of their greatest fear, so the Sleestaks generally give Enik a wide berth. He spends much of his time during the series in the Lost City, working with a matrix table there attempting to open a time doorway home.In addition to his shorter stature and different skin coloration, Enik is distinguished from the Sleestak in that he wears a distinctive red garment (Sleestak do not wear clothing). This garment was added to his costume when the wetsuit Eniks skin was crafted from shrank after rubber scales were glued to it, requiring slits to be cut across the front in order for Walker Edmiston to fit inside.A being resembling Enik, suggesting that his appearance is typical of Altrusians - or possibly Enik himself - was seen in what is presumably the Lost City from the time of the Altrusians.()Koenig, the scriptwriter of The Stranger, originally named this character Eneg, in honor of Roddenberry. As noted in an audio commentary on the DVD, the spelling was changed to Enik (reverse of the Greek root word for cinema) by David Gerrold, before the episode The Stranger was taped.Many episodes refer to or take place in Eniks cave, which contains a time doorway and lies near the Sleestak gods pit, and is accessible through the central of the three entrances into the Lost City. Enik also appears in other episodes, including The Search, Circle, Fair Trade and Blackout.The 2009 movie incarnation of Enik (John Boylan) is the principal villain, committing the genocide of his people before being imprisoned for ten millennia, donning the tunic which symbolizes his deceit. Possessing a crystal, Enik can control the Sleestaks and he intended to use them to invade other dimensions. With Marshalls unwitting assistance, he nearly succeeded in making the Earth the first of his targets. But in the end, Eniks plan is thwarted as he is last seen being chased off by the Sleestaks upon losing his means to control them.See also* Land of the Lost (1974 TV series), the original childrens television series created by and Marty Krofft** List of Land of the Lost episodes** Land of the Lost geography and technology* Land of the Lost (1991 TV series), the 1991 remake of the 1974 series* Land of the Lost (film), a 2009 film starring Ferrell based on the 1974 seriesReferences
2685914
Young_Jedi_Knights
Young Jedi Knights is a Wars series by fiction writer J. Anderson and his wife Moesta. The series covers the Jedi training of Jacen and Solo, the twin children of Solo and Leia Organa Solo. The series begins 23 years ABY, when the twins are fourteen years old.Originally intended to cover six novels, the series eventually stretched to fourteen volumes. It spanned three distinct plot arcs:#The first plot arc covers the young Jedi Knights fight against the dark Jedi Brakiss and his Academy, which eventually builds in strength enough to attack the academy on 4. This plot arc also introduces the twins, as well as other supporting characters.#The series became popular enough to support a second plot arc, consisting of the novels Shards of Alderaan to The Emperors Plague. This series deals with the young Jedi Knights fight against the Alliance, a group of non-humans seeking to take down the New Republic.#The final three-part series details the young Jedi Knights relationship with Anja Gallandro, the daughter of Gallandro, a gunslinger who died while fighting Solo a long time ago.Because it is geared towards younger readers, the Young Jedi Knights series tackles issues such as racism and drug abuse that are relevant in both the Star Wars universe and our present-day world. It is also notable for introducing a new generation of Jedi who are featured heavily in later series such as the Jedi Order, Nest, and of the Force.Dramatis personae; Solo: The teenage son of Han Solo and Leia Organa Solo. Jacen is adept at communicating through the Force with animals. He also has an affinity for telling bad jokes.; Solo: The teenage daughter of Han Solo and Leia Organa Solo. Like her father, Jaina is a talented pilot and mechanic.; Lowbacca: The Wookiee nephew of Chewbacca. He is known to his friends as Lowie, and enjoys tinkering with computers.; Teedee: Long form of M-TD, a miniature protocol droid that Lowbacca wears on his hip. Em Teedee also translates for Lowbacca. Since he is programed by C-3PO, Em Teedee has a tendency to be long-winded.; Ka: Is a young princess of Hapes, though she prefers to be known as a warrior of Dathomir.; Zekk: The childhood friend of Jaina and Jacen, Zekk is adept at finding hidden things.; Brakiss: A dark Jedi who creates the Shadow Academy, the dark Jedi analog to the Jedi academy; Gallandro: The daughter of the notorious gunslinger Gallandro, who was thought to have been killed by Han Solo in one of his earliest adventures.; Other characters: Skywalker, Solo, Leia Organa, Chewbacca, Thul, C-3POPlot summariesBook 1: Heirs of the ForceHeirs of the Force is about the adventures of Solo and Solos time at the Praxeum. After spending a month of training to become Jedi Knights at Luke Skywalkers Jedi Praxeum, Jacen and Jainas father Han Solo arrives on Yavin 4 with gifts for the twins and a new Jedi trainee  Chewbaccas nephew, Lowbacca. Along with Tenel Ka  a seemingly humorless warrior girl who befriended them during the past month  the twins and Lowie become fast friends. To help Lowie communicate with his fellow students, Chewbacca and Han give him a small translator droid named Em Teedee, whose mannerisms bear an uncanny resemblance to those of the droid C-3PO.After assembling the T-23 skyhopper that his uncle had given to him as a going-away present, Lowie takes it on a test flight. He spots a shiny object glimmering in the branches of a Massassi tree, and returns to the Praxeum, vowing to return as soon as possible. After missing evening meal, Lowie shares his discovery with Jacen, Jaina and Tenel Ka. The next day the four Jedi trainees set out in the skyhopper to investigate Lowies discovery.When they arrive at the site, Jacen, Jaina, Lowie, and Tenel Ka discover not just a TIE fighters wing (the shiny object), but the rest of the TIE fighter as well. Somewhat envious of Lowies skyhopper, and wanting to face the challenge, Jaina believes that the wrecked TIE fighter can be fixed. Scrounging up parts from the remains of the old Rebel base and the area surrounding the crash, the Jedi trainees go about the task of fixing the wrecked fighter. In addition to the repairs, Jaina decides to install an old hyperdrive unit (that she had received from her father) onto the fighter as well.Unbeknownst to the Jedi trainees, their work is being watched closely by Qorl, the pilot who had crashed the fighter during the Battle of Yavin. During the past 23 years he has been waiting the opportunity to return to the Empire and help obliterate the Rebellion.One day while searching for more parts for the TIE fighter, Jacen finds an Imperial insignia that had come off of Qorls uniform. He searches further, eventually discovering what has been Qorls home for the past 23 years. He rushes back to the site of the crash and warns Jaina, Tenel Ka, and Lowbacca of the pilots survival. Immediately thereafter Qorl appears, brandishing a blaster and telling the Jedi trainees that they are his prisoners.Lowbacca escapes with his skyhopper and attempts to utilize its bulk in attempting to scare Qorl away. Qorl is unfazed, however, and uses his blaster to great effect, critically damaging the skyhopper. Lowie flies away and lands the skyhopper. Grateful that it doesnt explode, he begins to make his way to the Praxeum. In the process of getting there, Em Teedee is detached from Lowbaccas belt and has an adventure with a pack of woolamanders.Lowbacca arrives at the Praxeum but no one can understand him because he lost Em Teedee. Frustrated, he recalls that Han and Chewbacca are still nearby, checking out Lando Calrissians new GemDiver Station. He heads to the Praxeums communications center and informs Han about the situation. Han tells Lowie that he will be back as soon as possible.Meanwhile, Tenel Ka flees into the jungle. She is then attacked by a number of the two-headed beasts that the disembodied spirit of Exar Kun had sent to destroy Luke Skywalkers body in 11 ABY. She eventually stumbles upon a pack of woolamanders, which provides an effective distraction to the beasts that were hunting her. In the commotion she hears the voice of Em Teedee crying for help. She rescues him and uses his directional sensors to make her way back to the Praxeum.At the crash site, Qorl marches Jacen and Jaina back to his home at gunpoint. Once there, he restrains them and gives them something to eat. Jaina and Jacen realize that Qorl has had absolutely no contact with the outside world and inform him of the current political situation in the Galaxy. The next day, Qorl marches the twins back to the crash site at gunpoint, ordering them to complete the repairs on the TIE fighter so that he may return to the Empire. The twins do so, and he blasts off, vowing to destroy the Praxeum before reporting back to the Empire.Han Solo and Chewbacca arrive at the Praxeum in the Millennium Falcon. Shortly before taking off with Lowbacca to save the twins, Han allows Tenel Ka and Em Teedee to board the Falcon. Once they are airborne, they notice a TIE fighter making a beeline for the Praxeum. Qorl tries to fire his laser cannons, but it turns out that the twins didnt restore them to good working order. The Falcon chases him as he flies out of the atmosphere and escapes, using the hyperdrive that Jaina had installed on the TIE fighter.Once the TIE fighter has made the jump to hyperspace, Han, Chewbacca, Lowie and Tenel Ka head for the crash site, finding that despite looking the worse for wear, Jacen and Jaina seem to be fine. A few days later the Falcon carries the damaged skyhopper back to the Praxeum. Lowie and Jaina immediately begin work on the airspeeder. The four Jedi trainees contemplate whether Qorl made it back to the Empire...Book 2: Shadow AcademyJacen and Jaina are kidnapped by Imperial commandos and whisked off to a hidden planet where they are imprisoned in the Shadow Academy by a Jedi.The book begins with Calrissian, Hans old buddy, inviting the young Jedi Knights to visit his GemDiver station, a mining facility orbiting the gas planet Yavin. All the Jedi agree to go to GemDiver station, except for Ka, who stays at the academy because her grandmother is coming to visit, and she does not want her friends to know that she is a princess on her homeworld of Hapes. Meanwhile at GemDiver, the twins go fishing for Corusca gems, indestructible jewels that can cut through the toughest armor. All are unsuccessful except for Jacen, who snags a small Corusca gem which he hides in his shoe. Suddenly, the GemDiver station is attacked by an unknown assailant, and Lowie and the twins are kidnapped. When they wake up, they learn they are on the cloaked space station called the Shadow Academy, a place for training Dark Jedi. They are soon introduced to the Dark Master Brakiss and his second in command, the beautiful Nightsister Tamith Kai of Dathomir. For the next few weeks they put the young Jedi through vigorous and sometimes deadly training exercises, breaking their spirits, morale, and bodies. They try and turn the Jedi to the dark side and serve the resurrected Emperor, but the young Jedi Knights resist the temptation. Meanwhile, Lando informs Luke of the twins kidnapping, so Luke and Tenel Ka begin to track down the whereabouts of their friends. Their search leads them to Tenel Kas home planet of Dathomir, where the Nightsisters and the Singing Mountain clan, old enemies and friends of Luke and Han, reside. There they learn that the Empire is recruiting the Force-talented inhabitants of Dathomir and sending them to the Shadow Academy. Luke and Tenel Ka cleverly get themselves recruited, and then wait as they head towards the secret location of the Shadow Academy. As Luke and Tenel Ka approach the now uncloaked space station, they take over the ship and fly it into the academy to rescue their friends. To escape, Jacen uses the Corusca gem that was hidden in his shoe to cut through his cell to the door controls, and then frees his twin sister and Lowie shortly afterwards. As they run towards the docking bay to leave, they are confronted by Tamith Kai and Brakiss. Luke and Brakiss exchange a few unpleasant words, while Tamith Kai and Tenel Ka thicken their rivalry with talk of doing battle. But in the end, the Jedi somehow escape without a fight, leaving Brakiss and Tamith Kai to explain their failure to the Emperor. As it turns out, they would not have escaped if it werent for the help of their old nemesis, the imperial pilot Qorl...Book 3: The Lost OnesDuring a break from their training at the Jedi Academy, Jacen and Jaina Solo are reunited with their friend Zekk, an orphan and junk collector who lives in the shadowy lower levels of Coruscant. However, because of his disadvantaged upbringing, he often felt ill at ease among his upper-class friends. Eventually, Zekk gets invited to a state banquet though the event ends in a social disaster. A miserable Zekk flees back into the lower levels of Coruscant only to get captured by the Nightsister Tamith Kai. Tamith Kai was serving the Shadow Academy, which had previously kidnapped Jacen, Jaina and Lowbacca and tried to brainwash them into Jedi. Eventually, Zekk is brainwashed by Brakiss, who ran the academy. He eventually turns against his former friends and becomes one of the Shadow Academys most powerful Dark Jedi.Book 4: LightsabersSkywalkers Academy is going to face the Jedi Knights. First, every member of the New Jedi Academy must make their own lightsabers.Tenel Ka, a friend of Jacen and Jaina Solo, crafts her handle out of a tooth, but she is in a hurry and doesnt concentrate on making her blade of good quality. Consequently while she is dueling with Jacen Solo, (the son of Solo and Leia) her blade shorts out, explodes and Jacens blade cuts off her arm.Tenel Ka then heads home to her grandmother. Jacen, Jaina, and Lowbacca go after her. She learns how to cope with one hand, rebuilds her lightsaber, and (against her grandmothers will) goes back to the Academy.Book 5: Darkest KnightJacen and Solo and their Wookiee companion Lowbacca travel to the Wookiee homeworld of Kashyyyk where Lowies younger sister Sirrakuk is about to undergo a Wookiee ritual. Since the ritual is dangerous, Lowie wants to assist his sister, Sirra.However, the Jedi Zekk has been assigned to lead a raid on the Wookiee city of Thikkiiana, a major exporter of computer technology. By executing this mission, he will fulfill his great potential and win the title of the Darkest Knight of the Second Imperium. However, he must face his former friends Jacen and Jaina Solo in the process.Book 6: Jedi Under SiegeThe final book in the Shadow Academy series explodes with non-stop action and the final confrontation between good and evil. The story begins with an Imperial scout trooper disabling the shield generator of the Jedi Academy, leaving a 4  moon open for a swift attack. Now fully trained Jedi with their own lightsabers, the young Jedi Knights quickly work together to stop the incoming threat. After Luke briefs all of his students for the battle to come, the twins disband to try and fix the generator and to call for help. While Jacen and Zekks good friend Peckhum blast into space to send out a call for help, they are chased by fighters flown by Zekks former friends. After sending out a distress signal, Jacen and Peckhum dive back into the atmosphere of Yavin 4, about to be obliterated by TIEs. But they are saved at the last second by a familiar face... Qorl, the imperial pilot. Meanwhile, Lowbacca and Ka attack the landing platform thats unloading Jedi into the jungles of Yavin 4. Eventually Tenel Ka tracks down her nemesis, Tamith Kai, and engages her in a fierce lightsaber battle. The platform explodes, killing Tamith Kai. Jaina, on a mission to repair the shield generator, is confronted by her former friend turned Dark Jedi Knight Zekk, who is assigned to destroy whats left of the Jedi. In the end, Zekk saves the Jedi by stopping them from returning to the Academy, which is destroyed by a bomb placed in the main audience chamber. Luke tries his best to turn his former student Brakiss back from the darkside, just before they engage in an epic lightsaber duel. Luke is soon victorious, and Brakiss flees back to the Shadow Academy. But as the Jedis re-enforcements arrive &mdash; in the form of Calrissian and his GemDiver Stationthe Emperor panics and engages the Shadow Academys self-destruct. The Dark Jedis base is instantly destroyed, with Brakiss on it. By the end of the story, all of the Jedi are battered, bruised, and barely alive. But the dark side has lost, Zekk has become the boy they once knew, and the Academy can be rebuilt. It is a day of victory.Book 7: Shards of AlderaanFollowing the defeat of the Second Imperium, Jacen and Jaina travel to the Alderaan system to retrieve a shard from the planets core. However, they are not alone as they are being watched by Ailyn Vel, disguised as her father Fett. In the past, Boba Fett had been an enemy of their father Solo and his daughter is continuing his legacy.Book 8: Diversity AllianceThe Diversity Alliance is a fictional movement in the Wars universe. It was an Aliens-First movement which sprung up during the Civil War.HistoryThe Twileks had a male-dominated political structure that left the women in slavery. Nolaa Tarkona, the sister of the Twilek slave girl Oola, freed herself from slavery and overthrew the old ways through a wave of bloodshed. She formed the Diversity Alliance as her key to freedom and power.LocationThe movement was based in the underground chambers on the Twilek homeworld of Ryloth. It spread to other worlds through negotiations and word-of-mouth.IdeologyThroughout Star Wars history, aliens were often mistreated by humans. The Empire was very obviously anti-alien. Aliens were never allowed into the service, and were often massacred. Such things happened outside of Imperial rule as well.The Diversity Alliance intended to unite all the downtrodden alien species that had suffered for so long under human rule. In their unity lay their strength against their oppressors.The movement had intentions to go so far as the exterminate all humans through a virus.Book 9: Delusions of GrandeurAs the young Jedi Knights continue their search for Raynar Thuls father, they turn for assistance to a dangerous resource, the reprogrammed assassin droid IG-88, a fearsome bounty hunter that the young Jedis may or may not have under controlBook 10: Jedi BountyHaving been convinced by his friend Raaba that Humans had never atoned for the atrocities committed against aliens under the Empire, the Wookiee Lowbacca goes to Ryloth to join the anti-Human Diversity Alliance.Meanwhile, at the Jedi Praxeum, his fellow Jedi trainees Jacen, Jaina, Thul and Ka travel to Ryloth to discover the Diversity Alliances true purpose. There, they discover that the Diversity Alliance is preparing to launch a war on the Human species. However, they are captured and are sent to work in the ryll mines. Lowbacca had never been told about their presence though when he found out, the Wookiee turned against the Diversity Alliance and helped them to escape the planet. But will they be able to convince the New Republic to take action against the Diversity Alliance? Or will they not?Book 11: The Emperors PlagueZekk and Raynar find and rescue Raynars father Bornan Thul. He is in the crossfire of two bounty hunters. Boba Fett slices into the Bornans navicomputer because Bornan had been to the Emperors Storehouse 5 days earlier. The other bounty hunter boards Bornans ship after he had esacaped in an escape pod. She is blown up when the ship self destructs. As Zekk and Raynar rescue Bornan and his secret, Boba Fett fires on Zekks ship, The Lightning Rod. Then Jaina, Jacen, Lowie, and Tenel Ka appear out of hyperspace and fire on Slave IV. As Boba already had the info he needed, he fled towards Ryloth to give Nolaa Tarkona the location of the Emperors Plague. Tenel Kas Hapan ship, Rock Dragon had followed Zekk despite his plea to Jaina not to follow. But he was grateful. They make it back to Coruscant to explain there adventures. Then they tell the Senate of the Diversity Alliance. Meanwhile on Ryloth, the evil Twilek Diversity Alliance leader, Nolaa Tarkona, had paid Boba Fett for the info he had sliced out of Bornans ship. The Senate is skeptical of the Young Jedi Knights stories. So, Leia organizes an investigation of the Diversity Alliance. Luke, Lowies sister Sirra, a Sentaur companion of the young Jedi Knights named Lusa, and some senators as well as Kur, an exiled Twilek rescued by the Jedi Knights on Ryloth were sent to investigate. Meanwhile, the young Jedi Knights had left with Bornan Thul to visit the Imperial Storehouse. While there they decide to destroy it. They send an encrypted message to Raynars mom requesting help. As the young Jedi plant explosives, the Diversity Alliance shows up with a small armada. The rest of them as well as a general of Nolaas had been left behind to handle Luke and his investigators. Then, General Solo shows up with a New Republic fleet and begins to battle the Diversity Alliance in space over the asteroid. Nolaa and guards are already on the asteroid while Lowies close friend and Diversity Alliance member Raaba leads the armada against the New Republic. The investigators find nothing unusual on Ryloth. But then Sirra exposes a food crate that stored blaster ammo. They engage in a battle until Kur calms them and takes over Ryloths government. The Diversity Alliance realizes they were wrong and join Kur. At the asteroid the Jedi have set explosives. Lowie battles and kills Corsk, the Trandoshan general that he had injured on Ryloth while attempting to flee. Then, Bornan attempts to kill Nolaa. Her guards shoot and miss releasing several other plagues targeting various species including Twileks as well as the human attacking plague. Bornan dies in the plague chamber, assuring a worried Raynar that he was proud of him. IG-88 appears having been reprogrammed to protect Bornan. He protects Raynar but unable to avoid programming turns toward Bornan but is destroyed. Zekk, Lowie, and Raynar attempt to flee in the Lighting Rod as their companions had already left in the Rock Dragon. But some of Nolaas guards stop them. Then Boba Fett appears. Having been paid by Raynars uncle Tyko Thul to save them. The Diversity Alliance soldiers cheer thinking that he is there to help them but he turns around and kills them. He leaves in Slave IV while the others make it out in the Lightning Rod. Raaba had taken her ship the Rising Star down to rescue Nolaa. They escape. The asteroid begins to explode but Nolaa got her samples. But she is sick and Raaba had caught the Wookie plague. They realize they have lost. Even though the Diversity Alliance attempted to charge General Solos ships, Aryn Dro Thul and Tyko Thul appeared out of hyperspace with the Bornaryn Fleet to aid the New Republic. Raaba flees to a barren planet. Nolaa dies. Raaba buries her and the plague. Raaba heals. She had sent Lowie a message saying that if she surrvived, she would find him. The Diversity Alliance is defeated and the young Jedi Knights return to Yavin 4 after healing on Coruscant for a celebration on the jungle moon. Raynar has constructed a pewter lightsaber. Lusa, having always been Force sensitive join Lukes Praxeum to study to become a Jedi. Zekk also join Lukes school. Tenel Ka kisses Jacen as the book ends with them all laughing and talking of the future.Book 12: Return to Ord MantellHan Solos past is about to catch up with him. When he and the twins take the Millennium Falcon to Ord Mantell for a high-speed race, they meet a battle-hungry young woman wielding a light saber. Her name is Anja Gallandro, and she knows more about Hans history than he likes. But Anja Gallandro guards an even more devastating secret, a secret that could mean disaster for the entire Solo family...Book 13: Trouble on Cloud CityJacen and Jaina believe they are simply off to enjoy a vacation at Calrissians Cloud City. Unfortunately, the friend they bring with, Anja, has plans that will cause much trouble for everyone.Book 14: Crisis at Crystal ReefAnja, furthering her plan to harm the Solo family, steals a star ship and races off toward Kessel. The young Jedi Knights follow, but are they following her into a trap they will not be able to escape?Jeunes Chevaliers JediJedi Knights
2689974
Kennedy_Mine
 refnum81000146()The Kennedy Gold Mine is a gold mine in California, one of the deepest mines in the world. It closed in 1942 and together with nearby Mine, is registered as Historical Landmark #786. It has since been re-opened as a tourist attraction.The mine is named for Andrew Kennedy, an Irish immigrant, who reportedly discovered a quartz outcropping in the late 1850s near what is now State Route 49. The Kennedy Mining Company was formed in 1860 when he and three partners began digging shafts near todays mine property entrance. The mine operated sporadically until it closed in 1878. In 1886 fifteen people invested $97,600 to reopen the mine under the corporate entity of the Kennedy Mining and Milling Company.   In 1898 the company began sinking a new shaft 1,950 feet (591 m) east of the original shafts. This East Shaft would eventually reach a vertical depth of 5,912 feet (1,792 m), the deepest vertical depth gold mine in America at the time. In 1928 a surface fire burned all the structures except two.  All other buildings and foundations were built after 1928. The company operated the mine until 1942 when the U.S. Government closed gold mines because of the war effort.On August 27, 1922, when forty-seven miners were trapped by fire in the nearby Argonaut Mine 4,650 feet (1,409 m) below ground, rescue efforts were launched from the Kennedy Mine to connect the tunnels of the two mines.  Unfortunately progress was slow and rescuers arrived too late to save the miners in the Argonaut.At the time of its closing, the mine had produced some $34.3 million (according to the California Department of Conservation) when gold was valued at $20.67 and $35.00 per ounce. The company paid its stockholders $5.8 million between 1886 and 1937. Over 95% of these dividends were paid at $20.67 per ounce.References*External links*Kennedy Gold Mine Image of Kennedy Mine Head Frame
2695377
Charles_F._Brush
footnotes          Charles Francis Brush (March 17, 1849 &ndash; June 15, 1929) was a U.S. inventor, entrepreneur and philanthropist.BiographyBorn in Euclid Township, Ohio, Brush was raised on a farm about 10 miles from downtown Cleveland. He had a great interest in science, particularly with Davys experiments with the light; he tinkered with and built simple electrical devices such as a static electricity machine at age 12, experimenting in a workshop on his parents farm.  Brush attended Central High School in Cleveland where he built his first arc light, and graduated there with honors in 1867.()  He received his college education from the of Michigan, where he studied mining engineering (there were no majorsas there are todayin electrical engineering).  At Michigan, Brush was a member of Kappa Epsilon fraternity (Omicron chapter).  In 1876 he secured the backing of the Wetting Supply Company in Cleveland to design his dynamo (an generator) for powering lights.  Brush began with the dynamo design of Gramme but his final design was a marked divergence, retaining the ring armature idea that originated with Pacinotti.  Brush remarked on his motivation for improving the generator in his : The best forms of magneto-electric apparatus at present before the public are unnecessarily bulky, heavy, and expensive, and are more or less wasteful of mechanical power.  After comparing it to the Gramme dynamo and other European entrants, the Institute of Philadelphia judged Brushs dynamo superior due to its simpler design and maintainability after completing tests in 1878.(Brush produced additional patents refining the design of his arc lights in the coming years and sold systems to several cities for public lighting, and even equipped Philadelphias Wanamakers Grand Depot with a system.()  His lights were easier to maintain, had automatic functions and burned twice as long as candles.  His generators were reliable and automatically increased voltage with greater load while keeping current constant.(  By 1881, New York, Boston, Philadelphia, Baltimore, Montreal, Buffalo, San Francisco, Cleveland and other cities had Brush arc light systems, producing public light well into the 20th century.()The San Francisco system was the first case of a utility selling electricity from a central plant to multiple customers via transmission lines.()  The California Electric Light Company (now PG&E)(Note legal title. Roe, born circa 1852, died December 10, 1894.)(In June 1879 Canadian broker Roe other investors incorporated the California Electric Light Co., he serving as secretary and manager. J. R. Hardenbergh was the first president.... In July 1880 PIERRE B. CORNWALL was elected vice president and treasurer. Next year he became president...) purchased two generators from Charles Brushs company in 1879 and soon opened a second plant with 4 additional generators.  Service charges for light from sundown to midnight was $10 per lamp per week.()  Brushs system was lighting Broadway 2 years before Edisons Street Station began lighting New York.(  By 1893 there were 1500 arc lights illuminating New York streets.()In 1879 Brush formed the Anglo-American Brush Electric Light Corporation in Lambeth, London, England. This company eventually moved to Loughborough England and became Brush Electrical Engineering Co. Ltd.In 1880, he established the Electric Company, and though successful, faced stiff competition from Thomson-Houston Electric Company, whose arc lights could be independently turned off, and by Edison, whose incandescent lights had a softer warm glow, didnt flicker and were less costly to maintain than arc lights.  In 1882 the Brush Electric Company supplied generating equipment for a hydroelectric power plant at Anthony Falls in Minneapolis, among the first to generate electricity from water power in the States.  Thomson-Houston bought out Brush in 1889 and eventually merged to become part of Electric in 1891.  After selling his interests in Brush Electric, Brush never returned to the electric industry.In 1884, Brush built a mansion on Euclid Avenue in Cleveland that showcased many of his inventions.  There he raised his family and lived the remainder of his life.  The basement housed Brushs private laboratory.()  In 1888, he powered the mansion with the worlds first automatically operated turbine generator which charged the homes 12 batteries. It was the first home in Cleveland to have electricity.( Over its 20 year life, the turbine never failed to keep the home continuously powered.( In 1926, Brush pioneered the first piezo-electric featherweight stylus.()Between 1910 and 1929 he wrote several papers on his version of a kinetic theory of gravitation, based on some sort of waves. He died on June 15, 1929.()Legacy*F. Brush High School in Lyndhurst, Ohio is named after Brush, whose sports teams and other groups are named the Arcs, after Brushs lamp.*Parks, Serving Summit Countys Furnace Run Metro Park in Richfield, Ohio, received a donation of land from the Family of Charles F. Brush.  The donated tract is known as Brushwood.*Brush (DD-745) 1943-1969 (then Taiwans Hsiang Yang until scrapped in 1993) was named after Brush, sponsored by his great-granddaughter.()Honors*Prize of the Academy of Arts and Sciences (1899).*French Legion of Honor (1881)*Edison Medal (1913)*Medal* Fellow of the British Academy of ArtsPatents* Generator:* Arc light (automatic control of spark gap) 1878 * Arc light (double-carbon lamp regulation system) 1879 * Arc light (Automatic shut off for Electric Lights or Motors) 1880 * Arc light (improved regulator for the carbon arc) 1885 References__NOTOC__Francis BrushFrancis BrushFrancis BrushF. BrushFrancis BrushF. BrushFrancis Brush
2700041
Carlton_Main_Frickley_Colliery_Band
The Carlton Main Frickley Colliery Band is a band based in West and close to Yorkshire.HistoryThe Elmsall Village Brass Band can be traced back to humble beginnings in 1884. In 1905, the band was adopted by the local Frickley Colliery, which in turn was to become owned by the Carlton Main Coal Company, and by 1923 the band became known by its present name. The reputation of the Band flourished and continued to build upon its reputation of being a first class outfit and one which not only rose to challenge the very best bands of the day, but become one of the best known and best regarded bands in the world.Despite this great heritage, by the mid 1990s times looked very bleak for the band, as it did for a great many other bands and working personnel in the mining industry, with the eventual closure of the pits in the UK and with Frickley Colliery in particular. It was at this time due to the closure and subsequent unemployment that the band was down to only six members, and close to extinction. However, due to the tenacity and the desire of those remaining members, the band was rebuilt and in a few short years by 1999, became Yorkshire Champions and represented Yorkshire at the National Finals at the Royal Albert Hall in London.ChampionshipsDuring the bands long and successful history, it has both competed and triumphed at many of the most prestigious competitions in the world. Most notably, the band has held the titles of European Champions (in the 1960s), National Champions, British Open Champions, Granada TV Band of the Year, BBC Best of Brass Champions, Spring Festival Grand Shield Champions & Yorkshire Area Champions. In addition, the Bands Quartet group have had the honour of being British Open Quartet Champions in 2003 and 2005.The bands most recent achievements include being awarded 6th place at the prestigious British Open Brass Band Contest where they were the second highest placed Yorkshire band on the day, beaten only by the eventual winners, the Dyke Band. BroadcastingThe band has appeared on TV and radio countless times, and many may remember their appearance on of the Pops in 1981 accompanying Capstick, with The Sheffield Grinder; Capstick comes home; a partnership which saw them rise to number three in the hit parade.PersonnelThe band count themselves fortunate to have many truly world class musicians in their ranks including the multi award winning Principal Cornet player, Kirsty Abbotts whose many awards have included Cornet Champion of Great Britain.Musical Directors include Russell Gray; one of the all time great cornet players and a conductor who holds National titles in Great Britain, Japan, France, Switzerland and Norway to name a few.Frickley Colliery Brass BandFrickley Colliery Brass Band is a brass band in Elmsall, in the of Wakefield district of Yorkshire, England.HistoryIt was formed in 1969 as the learner band to Main Frickley Colliery Band. Under the guidance of Robert Oughton, the aim was to train and supply future players for the Championship band. Having obtained an old set of instruments through the CISWO organisation for miners, the first competition was entered in 1970 and 3rd prize obtained. Soon the band had registered in the 4th section of The National Brass Band Registry and entered competitions run under national rules.With the involvement of parents and helpers the band became independent in 1976 and gained income by giving concerts at local venues such as Galas, Working Mens Clubs and Parks along with fund raising raffles, coffee mornings and sponsored events.The band gave free concerts for local charities and entertained the elderly, especially at Christmas. In 1980 it was granted a small levy paid by the NUM members of Frickley South Elmsall Colliery and this continued until the closure of the colliery in 1993.As the standard of playing improved the success achieved also brought its problems as the better players moved to higher section bands, (including Black Dyke, Brighouse and Grimethorpe), leaving the gaps to be filled with less experienced players. This is still the trend today, hence the band has never progressed to the top of the tree in brass banding.With the closure of the colliery in 1993 a depression set in on the village, which has never really been overcome despite the efforts made by different organisations. Community spirit was lost and people had no desire to try things other than work, thus very few took up the challenge of learning to play an instrument.  A shortage of young players has built up, affecting first the lower sections but now the middle sections.After a television programme in 1994 dealing with how mining communities were coping, and 21 appearances of the band on television in one year, including a trip to Germany, sponsorship from the local firm of Standard Fireworks was obtained, but after two years the recession in firework manufacture caused the closure of the factories and the end to the deal.With the need to renew the now very old instruments a successful application was made to the Foundation of Sports and Arts (organised by the Pools Promoters Association) allowing five new instruments to be bought. A year later another successful grant from the Arts Council of England (Lottery) and the local EEC Re-generation Grant, enabled the rest of the instruments to be renewed.With the release of the old instruments a new learners group has been formed and has been building steadily ever since, though interested youngsters are difficult to find.The futureAlong with many other bands in the area Frickley Colliery Brass Band is struggling for players of the standard required. Finance has always been a problem and venues for concerts are becoming less and less as cutbacks are made by councils and industry. Being self-supporting and not a charity the band has to run a tight budget. Insurance for instruments costs over 600 per year and coach costs can be huge.See also* Colliery Band - closely related to Carlton Main Colliery.External links* Carlton Main Frickley Colliery Band* Information at Barnsley Council Notes (
2706105
Wolf_Creek_(film)
 gross           $27,762,648Wolf Creek is a 2005 independent Australian horror film written, co-produced and directed by McLean. The story revolves around three backpackers (played by Nathan Phillips, Morassi and Magrath) who find themselves held captive by a serial killer (Jarratt) in the outback. The film was marketed as being based on true events.Wolf Creek premiered at the Film Festival in January 2005.() The Australian premiere was in March 2005 in Adelaide.( The film was later screened at the Film Festival the following May.( It was released in cinemas across the United Kingdom and the Republic of Ireland in September 2005.( In its home country of Australia, the film received a general release in November 2005, apart from the Territory, due to the trial surrounding the murder of British traveller Peter Falconio.()() It was released on 25 December 2005 in the United States. Although the film received moderately positive to mixed reviews, it was nominated for seven Film Institute awards, including Best Director. In 2010, the film was included in Magazines list of the 100 best films of the decade.()PlotSet in Australia in 1999, two British tourists, Liz Hunter (Magrath) and Kristy Earl (Morassi) are backpacking across the country with Ben Mitchell (Nathan Phillips), an Australian friend from Sydney. Currently in Western Australia, they constantly get drunk at wild, extravagant pool parties and sleep rough together on the beach. Ben buys a dilapidated XD Falcon to facilitate their road journey from Broome to Queensland via the Northern Highway.After stopping at Halls Creek for the night, the trio make another stop at Wolf Creek National Park, which contains a giant crater formed by a 50,000-ton meteorite. While exploring the crater, Ben and Liz kiss, after various hints from Kristy.Hours later, upon returning to their car, the group discovers their watches have all suddenly broken and the car wont start. Unable to discover the problem, they prepare themselves to sit out the night. After dark, a Crocodile Dundee-styled man named Mick Taylor (Jarratt) comes upon them and offers to tow them to his camp to repair the car. After initial hesitation, the group allows Mick to take them to his place, an abandoned mining site several hours south of Wolf Creek. Mick regales them with tall stories of his past while making a show of fixing the car. His manner unsettles Liz and Kristy, although Ben is less concerned. While they sit around a fire, Mick gives the tourists drugged water which he describes as rainwater from the top end. The water causes the tourists to eventually fall into unconsciousness.Liz awakens late the next afternoon to find herself tied up in a shed. She manages to break free as night falls, but before she can escape the mining site, she hears Mick torturing Kristy in a garage by shooting at her, sexually abusing her and tormenting her. Liz sets the now-dismantled Falcon on fire to cause a distraction and goes to help Kristy while Mick is busy trying to extinguish the blaze. She then manages to shoot Mick with one of his own rifles, blasting him in the neck and apparently killing him. The women attempt to flee the camp in Micks truck, but a wounded Mick stumbles out of the garage and blasts at them with a double-barreled shotgun, before giving chase in another truck. The girls evade Mick in the bush by rolling his truck off a cliff and hiding, before returning to the mining site to get another car. Liz leaves the hysterical Kristy outside the gates, telling her to escape on foot if she does not return in five minutes.Liz enters another garage and discovers Micks large stock of cars as well as an organised array of travellers possessions, including video cameras. She watches the playback on one of them and is horrified to see Mick rescuing other travellers stranded at Wolf Creek in almost identical circumstances to her own. She then picks up another camera which turns out to be Bens, through viewing some of Bens footage, the recording ends focusing on a scene with Micks truck in the background, indicating hed been following them long before they got to Wolf Creek. She gets into a car and attempts to start it, but Mick shows up in the back seat and stabs her through the drivers seat with a huge knife. After more bragging, he hacks three of Lizs fingers off in one swipe. He then severs her spinal cord with a knife, paralyzing her and rendering her a head on a stick. As Liz lies motionless on the garage floor, he interrogates her for Kristys whereabouts.By dawn, Kristy has reached a surfaced highway and is discovered by a passing motorist. He attempts to help Kristy, but is suddenly shot dead from far away by Mick, who has a sniper rifle. Mick then gives chase in a fast Holden HQ Statesman, prompting Kristy to take off in the dead mans car. She succeeds in ramming Mick off the road, but he coolly gets out of the car and snipers Kristys back tyre, causing the car to flip over into the bush. A disoriented, dazed Kristy climbs out of the wreckage and attempts to crawl away, but is coldly shot dead by Mick. He bundles both Kristy and Lizs bodies into the back of the wrecked car and torches it before calmly driving off.The action then cuts to Ben, whose fate until now has not been revealed. He awakens to find himself nailed to a mock crucifix in a mine shaft, with an aggressive, caged Rottweiler in front of him. He manages to painfully extract himself from the crucifix and enters the camp in early daylight. Ben escapes into the outback, but becomes hysterical and dehydrated, eventually passing out beside a dirt road. He is discovered by two shocked Swedish travellers who take him to Kalbarri, where he is airlifted to hospital.The ending reveals that no trace of Kristy and Liz were found despite several major police searches. Early investigations were disorganised and hampered by confusion, lack of physical evidence and the alleged credibility of Ben. After four months in police custody, Ben was cleared of all suspicion. The film then ends with the silhouette of Mick Taylor walking into the sunset, rifle in hand.Cast*Jarratt as Mick Taylor*Nathan Phillips as Ben Mitchell*Morassi as Kristy Earl*Magrath as Liz Hunter*ODonnell as Car Salesman*Revell as Gavin (petrol station attendant)*McPhee as Bazza (pervert in petrol station)*Sterns as Bazzas mate*Moody as Bazzas older mate*Poole as Old Man*Petersen as Swedish backpacker who helps Ben*Starvall as Swedish backpacker who helps Ben*McLean as Policeman (cameo)*Palmer as Pool Girl (uncredited)ProductionWolf Creek is set in a real location; however, the actual meteorite crater location is called Wolfe Creek, and is located in northern Western Australia. It is the second largest meteorite crater in the world from which meteorite fragments have been recovered. Wolf Creek was filmed almost entirely in Australia; however the aerial shots of the crater in the film show the genuine Wolfe Creek crater.Several strange occurrences happened during the production of the film; one particular location that was used during the shooting of the travellers drive to Wolf Creek had not seen rainfall in over six years  however, once the crew arrived and shooting proceeded, it rained for three continuous days, forcing the writer, director and actors to incorporate the highly unexpected rainfall into the script. According to Greg McLean, the fact that it was raining and gloomy in an otherwise dry, sunny desert area gave the sequences a feel of menace.( Star Kestie Morassi also mentioned several odd occurrences during an audio commentary for the film, which was the fact that there was a full moon on the first night of shooting the film and over a year later, when the film premiered at Sundance there was also a full moon.The rock quarry where Micks mining site is located was the site of a real-life murder, which stirred up controversy from the local residents who mistook the film as being based on that crime.( According to director McLean and others, John Jarratt went to extremes in preparing for his role as Mick, in a bid to emulate, as close as possible, the real-life serial killer Ivan Milat: he spent significant time alone in the isolated outback and went for weeks without showering.()The sign on the front gate of Micks mining site reads Navithalim Mining Co. Navi & thalim spelt backwards reads: Ivan Milaht, evidently referencing Ivan Milat.Since the film had a relatively low-budget, many of the action scenes involved the real actors; for example, after running through the outback when her character escapes, star Kestie Morassi ended up with hundreds of thorns and nettles in her feet.( During the shooting of Morassis torture scene in the shed, her non-stop screams and crying began to discomfort and unsettle the crew; executive producer Matt Hearn said that the female members of the shooting crew were brought to tears by it, as if someone were actually being tortured.(The film was shot digitally on the HDCAM format and was mostly handheld (aside from a few static composite shots).Basis in realityWolf Creek was marketed as being based on true events.The abduction of British tourist Falconio and the assault of his girlfriend Lees in July 2001 by John Murdoch in the Territory are cited as influences.() Murdochs trial was still under way at the time of the films initial release in Australia, and for this reason the Northern Territory court placed an injunction on the films release there in the belief that it could influence the outcome of the proceedings. Many are misled into thinking that the entire movie is based on a true story, when it has just got many influences from other murders around Australia, like the Ivan Milat backpacker murders and the Peter Falconio murder case.ReceptionWolf Creek opened on 151 cinemas in Australia on 3 November 2005 (the film had previously been shown at a number of film festivals) and took A$1.225 million in its first weekend, making it the number one film for the weekend. In the United Kingdom, the film was given a modest release on 16 September 2005, and grossed 1,500,000. The film opened on  Christmas Day 2005 in the United States and grossed $16,188,180 on American screens, while also garnering an extra $11,574,468 overseas, bringing the total gross to US$27,762,648.()Despite the films commercial success, it has received a mixed reception from critics. Some critics were deeply offended by the films brutality, while others praised it for its unorthodoxy and daring. Critic Ebert gave it a rare zero stars rating, saying, It is a film with one clear purpose: To establish the commercial credentials of its director by showing his skill at depicting the brutal tracking, torture and mutilation of screaming young women ... I wanted to walk out of the theatre and keep on walking.() Times film critic Moira Macdonald said that Wolf Creek was the first film she ever walked out on. She called watching the film punishment and wondered how someones real death inspired this entertainment. Nevertheless, it received some very positive reviews in the British press, with Independent praising its departure from the generic rules of the film genre.() Guardian film critic Bradshaw awarded it 4/5 stars.() Time Out said by making us feel the pain, Greg McLeans ferocious, taboo-breaking film tells us so much more about how and why we watch horror movies.()  They admitted, however, that the film was not for everyone. The film magazines Empire and Film gave the film 4/5 stars, with Empire calling it a grimy gut-chiller that unsettles as much as it thrills, violently shunting you to the edge of your seat before clamping onto your memory like a rusty mantrap.() Fangoria called it the scariest film of the year.At Tomatoes, Wolf Creek has a 52% rotten rating based on 108 reviews.Alternative versionsThe original cut of Wolf Creek ran 104 minutes, approximately 5 minutes longer than the 99 minute cut that was released in cinemas. The extra footage in this cut included an additional scene at the beginning of the film after the party scene, in which Kristy awakens in bed next to Ben at a beach cottage the following morning; this created a romantic subplot between the characters, and was cut from the film for complicating matters unnecessarily.()The other additional footage took place when Liz returns to the mining site after leaving Kristy behind; rather than immediately entering the car garage, as she does in the theatrical cut, she finds a revolver and fills it with cartridges, and then explores an abandoned mine shaft in order to search for Ben. She subsequently drops her pistol into the shaft, and climbs down inside to find dozens of decomposing bodies. This explains why, in the theatrical cut, the revolver disappears after she enters the car garage. According to director Greg McLean, this scene was cut from the film after screenings because it was simply too much, along with all of the other gruesome events that had taken place prior.( The scene in which Lizs spine is severed by Mick was also slightly longer, including more close-ups and shots.When the film premiered in the United States on DVD, both an R-rated cut (which is identical to the theatrical release), and an Unrated cut (which incorporates the aforementioned scenes) were released.SequelOn 30 September 2010 writer/director Greg McLean confirmed a sequel is in the works. Production is expected to commence sometime in 2011. The film will be set in the Outback, Australia and will once again feature the character of Mick Taylor. Like the previous film, the story will have some elements based on true events. John Jarratt is also set to reprise the role of Mick Taylor.(John Jarratt To Return To Wolf Creek (30 September 2010). Herald Sun)See also* Australian Film Corporation* of major crimes in Australia* of Australia* in filmReferences*Wolf Creeks killer weekend (7 November 2005). Sydney Morning Herald.*Wolf Creek banned in NT*Greg McLean On Wolf Creek 2 (29 September 2010). FangoriaExternal links* * * * * * Urban Cinefile article, November 2005* John Jarrett InterviewCreek (Film)CreekCreek (film)CreekCreek (film)Creek ()Creek
2709689
Sough
A sough is an underground channel for draining water out of a mine.  Its ability to drain a mine depends on the bottom of the mine being higher than a neighbouring valley.  If the mine sump is lower, water must be pumped up to the sough.Derbyshire lead miningThe term is closely associated with the lead mining areas of Derbyshire (see lead mining history).Early Derbyshire lead mines were fairly shallow, since methods to remove water were inefficient and miners had to stop when they reached the water table. The digging of soughs was found to be an effective way of lowering the water table and allowing mines to be worked deeper.Soughs were typically dug from their open end near a stream or river back into the hillside beneath the mine to be drained. One sough would often drain more than one mine, since these were often very close, working the same vein of lead. This also helped spread the cost of digging the sough. Some soughs include branches to facilitate further drainage.Many soughs were dug throughout the 17th and 18th centuries, until the falling price of lead brought the decline of the Derbyshire lead mining industry towards the end of the 19th century.Some soughs were very extensive. sough is over four miles in length. Digging such long tunnels took a long time. sough, named after the Dutch engineer Cornelius Vermuyden who planned it, took twenty years to dig. The Cromford sough that Richard Arkwright subsequently used to power his mill at Cromford took thirty years to dig, and was still being extended a century after it was begun.Some soughs are still in use. According to the Geological Survey, the Meerbrook sough, started in 1772, still provides 3.75 million litres a day for the public water supply.ElsewhereSoughs were also extensively used in the mining industry until the mines became too deep to be drained by this means.  With the advent of the engine, soughs became less necessary for unwatering mines than they had previously.(J. Hatcher, History of the British Coal Industry:  i before 1700:  towards the age of coal (Oxford 1993), .)  See also*AditReferences(External links*British Geological Survey - Meerbrook SoughFurther reading*Rieuwerts, J. H. History and gazetteer of the lead mine soughs of Derbyshire. Author, 1987
2715977
ChadCameroon_Petroleum_Development_and_Pipeline_Project
The ChadCameroon Petroleum Development and Pipeline Project is a controversial project to develop the production capacity of oilfields near Doba in southern Chad, and to create a 1,070 km pipeline to transport the oil to facilities on the coast of Cameroon. The project was launched on October 18, 2000. It is operated by ExxonMobil (40%), and also sponsored by Petronas Malaysia (35%) and  Chevron (25%). The governments of Chad and Cameroon also have a combined 3% stake in the project.()It was largely funded by multilateral and bilateral credit financing provided by Western governments. Debt based financing came from the Finance Corporation in the amount of US$100 million, the private sector arm of the Bank Group and the French export credit agency, COFACE, and the Bank which will each provided US$200 million. IFC-coordinated private lenders offered a further US$100 million.()BackgroundThe original consortium of oil companies involved in the pipeline project were Exxon, Dutch Shell and Aquitaine. Negotiations started in 1988, with Chad and a consortium of oil companies signing a 30 year oil concession in the southern Chad region of Doba.(www12.georgetown.edu/sfs/publications/journal/.../delescluselocked.pdf, Delescluse, Aude Chad-Cameroon: A Model Pipeline? 2004.) In 1999, Royal Dutch Shell and Elf Aquitaine dropped the project due to controversies surrounding the project and volatile oil prices. As a result, Exxon opened the project up for bid to a select few corporations and in April 2000, Petronas of Malaysia and Chevron acquired stakes in the project.( Exxon then enlisted the support of the Bank to raise support within the international community. The World Bank agreed on the condition that certain environmental and social standards were enforced both in Chad and Cameroon, and that the revenues be put towards improving social and economic conditions.(ParticipantsChadSince 1990, President Deby has been the head of government in Chad. Democratic presidential elections are held every five years. Chads economy is dependent mainly on agriculture and livestock. It heavily relies on foreign assistance and foreign capital, as well as international investment projects. Because of Chads landlocked borders, its economy struggles from a lack of resources and instability between rebel groups. The country also serves as a host to thousands of refugees from neighboring Sudan and African Republic, as well as many victims of trafficking. Oil exploitation is estimated at a potential 1.5 million barrels, and Chinese companies are currently developing an oil refinery and another pipeline in the country.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/cd.html CIA World Factbook: Chad)CameroonThe Republic of Cameroon has been ruled by President Biya since November 6, 1982. A relatively peaceful and stable nation, Cameroon is a republic with a multiparty presidential regime. Although there are presidential elections every seven years, there exists no term limits. A climate of intense corruption has created an unequal distribution of wealth and poor conditions for domestic and international investments.(https://www.cia.gov/library/publications/the-world-factbook/geos/cm.html CIA World Factbook: Cameroon)Cameroon Oil Transportation Company (COTCO)The portion of the pipeline owned by Cameroon is managed by COTCO. This company is incorporated in Cameroon, and is a joint-venture between the governments of Cameroon and Chad, and the Upstream Consortium, an independent monitoring institution.(Chad-Cameroon Oil Pipeline: A Case Study from New Era, Center for Energy Economics, University of Texas at Austin)Tchad Oil Transportation Company (TOTCO)TOTCO manages the pipeline within Chad that is owned by the country. TOTCO is incorporated in Tchad, and is a joint-venture between Chad and the Upstream Consortium.(World BankThe World Banks support was very important for the Consortium of oil companies, as they believed they needed the support of a humanitarian agency with international interests in order for the project to succeed. While the projects private sponsors, the Upstream Consortium, provided about 95% ($2.2 billion USD) of the financing for the pipeline, the World Bank also contributed through debt financing. The International Finance Corporation (IFC) provided a loan of about $100 million USD. $85.8 million of this went to COTCO and $14.2 million went to TOTCO, Cameroon and Chads respective oil management companies. The IFC also aided in securing an additional US $300 million in private commercial lending for COTCO and TOTCO. The International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (IBRD) provided US $92.9 million to Chad ($39.5 million) and Cameroon ($53.4 million) to finance the countries joint-venture pipeline companies. Last of the World Bank-provided financing was given through the European Investment Bank (EIB) which provided US $46.6 million to finance Cameroon and Chads equity in COTCO and TOTCO.(Included in plans for the project was a revenue management law developed by the World Bank. This separated the oil revenues given to Chad into four required areas: a Future Generations Fund, health, education and other development projects, a fund to compensate the Doba region of Chad from where the oil was extracted and government reserves. The revenue management law also created the Petroleum Revenue Oversight Committee. The committee was established to oversee the spending of the oil revenues, and would include members of both the Chadian government and civil society.()(http://www.publishwhatyoupay.org/en/resources/catholic-relief-services-statement-chad-cameroon-oil-pipeline CATHOLIC RELIEF SERVICES STATEMENT ON THE LAUNCH OF CHAD-CAMEROON OIL PIPELINE PROJECT, October 2009)ControversyThe pipeline project has been affected by persistent charges and fears about corruption and the diversion of revenues  ostensibly intended for poverty reduction  towards arms purchases, particularly by the regime of President Dby. Opposition leader and parliamentarian Yorongar of the of Action Forces for the Republic (FAR) accused National Assembly President Abdelkader Kamougue of taking a bribe from Elf, then a partner in the project, in 1997. Yorongar was stripped of his parliamentary immunity and detained for nine months.(IRIN-West Africa Update 221, 3 June 1998) In November 2000, the World Bank announced that $4 million of a $25 million signing bonus from the oil companies was spent by the Chadian government on weapons. The World Bank required tight restrictions on oil revenues as a condition of its loans. In January 2006, Chad moved to unilaterally increase the portion of oil revenues going to its general fund from 15 to 30 percent.(Emad Mekey, Chad Dilutes Oil-For-Development Pledge, 2 January 2006)On 28 August 2006, President Dby ordered Chevron and Petronas to quit the country.(Chad oil company deadline expires, BBC News, 28 August 2006)Environmental ImpactsIn Chad and especially Cameroon, through which the pipeline stretches 890 km of the total 1070 km, there have been claims of adverse effects of the construction and maintenance of the pipeline on the indigenous communities and environment. One of the largest areas affected is in the coastal Cameroonian town of Kribi. Located eleven miles off the coast of Kribi is the export terminal facility. There has been much controversy regarding the alleged degradation the coastal reefs during construction. This has not only impacted the underwater habitat, but also the livelihoods of the local people who depend on fishing as their main source of income.(Shombong, Nkushi Francis. CHAD-CAMEROON PETROLEUM DEVELOPMENT AND PIPELINE PROJECT: Impact Assessment of the Project to the Local Community: Case Study of the Ocean Division of Cameroon, p 2.)Since completion of the pipeline in 2007, there have been two known oil leaks at the transfer site eleven miles off the shore of Cameroon. The first occurred on January 15, 2007. Representatives for COTCO claimed that the leak was contained within a few hours and that the amount of spilled was not sufficient to cause any harm, though local fishermen did claim to have seen traces of the oil ashore.() The second oil spill was on April 22, 2010 at the same site. COTCO stated that the leaked oil amounted to less than five barrels. Cameroonian NGOs Relufa and Centre pour lEnvironnement et le Developpement have brought to light the inefficiencies of the oil-spill preparedness plan, as well as the lack of communication between COTCO and the surrounding communities.()International InvolvementNon-governmental institutionsorganizations have played a large role in mediating the concerns of the international community with the needs of the indigenous communities of Chad and Cameroon. Even before construction commenced on the pipeline project in 2000, international and local NGOs were monitoring the situation and meeting with representatives from the World Bank and the Consortium of gasoline companies. After the completion of the project, NGOs were also very involved with documentation of any problems and worked in conjunction with external independent monitoring agencies.  In 2005, under the direction of the Banks International Advisory Group, a group of stakeholders including COTCO, the CPSP and multiple NGOs created a platform under which complaints registered with the World Bank by organizations and individuals could be resolved. According to FOCARFE (Fondation Camerounaise dActions Rationalisees et de Formation sur lEnvironnement), more than 300 civil society complaints existed by the close of construction in 2003.(FOCARFE, Minutes of the Information Day on the Social Statement on the Chad-Cameroon Pipeline Project, 2009) In November 2006, the stakeholders involved in the project came together to discuss their views, main issues and concerns for a Forum of Information on the Chad-Cameroon Pipeline Project. The stakeholders involved were the Cameroon Oil Transportation Company (COTCO), the Comite de Pilotage et de Suivi des Pipelines (the Pipelines Steering and Monitoring Committee) and a group of four Cameroonian NGOs: CED (Centre pour lEnvironnement et le Developpement), RELUFA (Reseau de Lutte contra le Faim), CARFAD (African Center for Applied Forestry Research and Development) and FOCARFE (Fondation Camerounaise dActions Rationalisees et de Formation sur lEnvironnement). The meeting was held to discuss a wide array of topics, including the monitoring of the pipeline activities, environmental and social compensation plans, CAPECEs capacity building objectives and the involvement of NGOs.()*Defense*of the Earthof the Earth is an transnational grassroots environmental network. The organization brings together and mobilizes social and environmental advocacy groups from all over the world to rally behind certain issues.() While FOE has been involved in documentation and monitoring of pipeline project since its construction, the organization more recently developed a report in 2008 condemning a Bank initiative for New Climate Funds. Along with four other advocacy organizations, FOE stated that the World Bank had repeatedly engaged in projects, such as the Chad-Cameroon pipeline, that actually negatively effected the environment and only added to pollution.()*Centre pour LEnvironnement et le DeveloppementThe Center for Environment and Development is a Cameroon-based NGO founded and run by native lawyer Nguiffo. The CEDs main purpose is to advocate and campaign against the liquidation of the regions forests for short-term profit. Certain exploitations within the Cameroon region include logging, hunting for bushmeat, mining for natural resources and the construction of the Chad-Cameroon pipeline. The CED works to inform local communities about their rights to land and community forest concessions, as well as constant documentation and publications to educate the international community.()*RELUFA: The Reseau de Lutte contre la Faim*CARFAD (African Center for Applied Forestry Research and Development)*FOCARFE (Fondation Camerounaise dActions Rationalisees et de Formation sur lEnvironnement)*Relief ServicesRelief Services, an international nonprofit humanitarian organization, has been one of they key watchdogs in the pipeline project, even before construction was completed. In a statement made in October or 2003, they stated their concerns for the people and environment of both Chad and Cameroon, and anticipated negative effects of the pipeline for the future. One of their main concerns for the project was the potential mismanagement of profit funds by Chad and Cameroon, as well as the ineffectiveness of policies mandated by the World Bank.(CATHOLIC RELIEF SERVICES STATEMENT ON THE LAUNCH OF CHAD-CAMEROON OIL PIPELINE PROJECT, October 2003)The Cameroon Chad Pipeline Monitoring Project is an initiative created by CRS that supports the efforts of Cameroonian NGOs as they advocate for proper use of profits from the pipeline, as well as the communities and environment surrounding the pipeline. One of the main efforts of the Catholic Relief Services has been to review and correct compensation packages received by those located along the pipeline, as well as advocating for fair salaries for local workers contracted by the oil companies.(http://www.catholicrelief.org/cameroon/pipeline/ Cameroon Chad Pipeline Monitoring Project) See also * of Chad* of CameroonReferences External links * worldbank.org overview (last updated October, 2004)ja:
2720211
Jenny_Lind,_California
footnotes               Jenny Lind is an unincorporated community in Calaveras County, California. It lies at an elevation of 253 feet (77 m) and is located at . The community is in code 95252 and code 209.Located on the north bank of the River, Jenny Lind was a mining town as early as 1849. Most of the placer mining was done along the hillsides above the river; later the river was mined with dredgers. In 1864 the population was said to be 400, half of them Chinese. Being on the main road from Stockton, it was also an important freighting center for the area.The town is named after the Swedish singer Lind, although there are several tales as to why this is so. One story has it that it was really named for Dr. John Y. Lind. Another says that the braying of pack mules prompted the miners to use the singers name in sarcastic humor. Most likely, it was named in the singers honor, although she never came to California.The town today is registered as Historical Landmark #266.A post office operated at Jenny Lind from 1857 to 1944 and again from 1947 to 1951.()PoliticsIn the state legislature Jenny Lind is located in the 1st Senate District, represented by Republican Cox, and in the 25th Assembly District, represented by Republican Olsen. Federally, Jenny Lind is located in 3rd congressional district, which has a Cook PVI of R +7() and is represented by Republican Lungren.References(*Lind
2724567
Bone_crusher
thumb|250px|Water wheel - powered bone crusherA bone crusher was a device for crushing animal bones.  Bones obtained during slaughter were cleaned, boiled in water and dried for several months.  After that, they were suitable for crushing with the special machine into a relatively dry gritty powder which was used as fertilizer.The machine, shown in the picture, is wheel powered.  It contains eight S-shaped pairs of cams that raise the crushers alternately and let them fall into material to be crushed.  The simple transmission increases the rotation speed of the crusher wheel to 21 rpm from the water wheel speed of about 7 rpm.meal was used since about 1790 as a welcome supplement to the ordinary farmyard manure.  From about 1880 it was supplanted by chemical fertilizers.Similar machinesA similar machine (the mill) is used to crush ore in mining situations.de:Knochenmhlesv:Benstamp
2727823
The_Solar_Project
The Solar Project consists of the Solar One, Solar Two and Solar Tres solar thermal power plants based in the Desert, USA and Andaluca, Spain.The central tower of Solar One and Solar Two was demolished in 2009 in preparation for a larger solar-thermal project.() Solar One Solar One was a pilot solar-thermal project built in the Desert just east of Barstow, CA, USA. It was the first test of a large-scale thermal power tower plant. Solar One was designed by the Department of Energy (DOE), Southern California Edison, LA Dept of Water and Power, and California Energy Commission. It was located in Daggett, CA, about  east of Barstow.Solar Ones method of collecting energy was based on concentrating the suns energy onto a common focal point to produce heat to run a steam turbine generator. It had hundreds of large mirror assemblies, or heliostats, that track the sun, reflecting the solar energy onto a tower where a black receiver absorbed the heat. High-temperature heat transfer fluid was used to carry the energy to a boiler on the ground where the steam was used to spin a series of turbines, much like a traditional power plant.In the late 1970s, a competition was held by DoE to obtain the best heliostat design for the project. Several promising designs were selected and prototypes were built and shipped to the area for testing. Trade-offs involved simplicity of construction to minimize costs for high-volume manufacturing versus the need for a reliable, bi-directional tracking system that could maintain focus on the tower. Rigidity of the structure was a major concern in terms of wind load resistance and durability, but shading of the mirrors by support structures was to be avoided.The project produced 10 MW of electricity using 1,818 mirrors, each 40 m (430 ft) with a total area of 72,650 m (782,000 ft). Solar One was completed in 1981 and was operational from 1982 to 1986. Later redesigned and renamed Solar Two, it can be seen from 40 where it covers a 51 hectare (126 acre) site, not including the administration building or rail yard facilities shared with a neighboring plant. Solar One/Two and other nearby solar projects are plainly visible via satellite imaging software at .During times of high winds, blowing dust is sometimes illuminated by the reflected sunbeams to create an unusual atmospheric phenomenon in the vicinity of the power tower. These beams of light were depicted in several scenes, and a painting, in the 1987 movie Cafe, which was filmed nearby.Solar One shares a similar name to Solar One, however it is quite different. It uses a solar thermal parabolic trough system and generates 64 MW. Solar Two File:Solar Two Heliostat.jpg|thumb|right|One of Solar Twos heliostats is shown in 2003 with the power tower in the backgroundIn 1995 Solar One was converted into Solar Two, by adding a second ring of 108 larger 95 m (1,000 ft) heliostats around the existing Solar One, totaling 1926 heliostats with a total area of 82,750 m (891,000 ft). This gave Solar Two the ability to produce 10 megawatts. Solar Two used molten salt, a combination of 60% sodium nitrate and 40% potassium nitrate, as an energy storage medium instead of oil or water as with Solar One. This helped in energy storage during brief interruptions in sunlight due to clouds. The molten salt also allowed the energy to be stored in large tanks for future use such as night time - Solar Two had sufficient capacity to continue running for up to three hours after the sun had set.  Solar Two was decommissioned in 1999, and was converted by the University of California, Davis, into an Air Cherenkov Telescope in 2001, measuring rays hitting the atmosphere. Its name is now C.A.C.T.U.S..()Solar Twos 3 primary participants were Southern California Edison (SCE), the Los Angeles Department of Water and Power (LADWP), and the U.S. Department of Energy (DOE).: Were proud of Solar Twos success as it marks a significant milestone in the development of large-scale solar energy projects, said then U.S. Energy Secretary Richardson.: This technology has been successfully demonstrated and is ready for commercialization. From 1994 to 1999, the Solar Two project demonstrated the ability of solar molten salt technology to provide long-term, cost effective thermal energy storage for electricity generation., BoeingOn November 25, 2009 the Solar Two tower was demolished(http://www.desertdispatch.com/news/bang-7374-daggett-going.html)  The mothballed site was  levelled and returned to vacant land by Southern California Edison. All heliostats and other hardware were removed. Solar Tres Due to the success of Solar Two, a commercial power plant, called Tres Power Tower, is being built in Spain by Energy using Solar One and Solar Twos technology for commercial electrical production of 15 MW.(BBC News Power station harnesses Suns rays)  Solar Tres will be three times larger than Solar Two with 2,493 heliostats, each with a reflective surface of 96 m. The total reflective area will be 240,000 m (2.6 million ft). They will be made of a highly reflective glass with metal back to cut costs by about 45%. A larger molten nitrate salt storage tank will be used giving the plant the ability to store 600 MWh, allowing the plant to run 24x7 during the summer. Land use Solar thermal power plants are big and use a lot of land, but when looking at electricity output versus total size, they use less land than hydroelectric dams (including the size of the lake behind the dam) or coal plants (including the amount of land required for mining and excavation of the coal).(Ten facts about solar thermal power) See also * of solar thermal power stations* power* power in Spain* power plants in the Mojave Desert* 1 Notes References* www.nrel.gov/news/press/2005/3505_nrel_supports_development.html (dead)* http://www.keepmedia.com/ShowItemDetails.do?itemID1057454&extID10030* http://thefraserdomain.typepad.com/energy/2005/09/about_parabolic.html* www.solarpaces.org/SolarThermal_Thematic_Review.pdf (dead)* http://www.sandia.gov/media/solarll.htm* http://www.nexant.com/services/AdvancedTech/renew/solar.html (dead)* www.solarpaces.org/SOLARTRES.HTM (dead)External links* A very detailed explanation of all parts of Solar One, with diagrams* Technical and economic descriptions of various Solar Thermal Power generation techniques* Updated description of Solar Tres* Aerial photoProject
2732323
Cave_City,_California
footnotes               Cave City is an unincorporated community in Calaveras County, California. It lies at an elevation of  and is located at . The community is in code 95222 and code 209.Like most communities in Calaveras County, Cave City began as a mining town. However, its only claim to fame today is that it is the location of the Caverns, the most extensive system of caverns and passageways in the area.PoliticsIn the state legislature Cave City is located in the 1st Senate District, represented by Republican Cox, and in the 25th Assembly District, represented by Republican Olsen. Federally, Cave City is located in 3rd congressional district, which has a Cook PVI of R +7() and is represented by Republican Lungren.References(*City (California)
2738284
The_Traveler_(novel)
The Traveler (The Traveller in the UK) is a 2005 novel by Twelve Hawks, which impressed critics and became an international bestseller, in part due to the reclusive behaviour of its author. The Dark River, book two of Fourth Realm Trilogy, was published in July 2007. The final part in the trilogy, The Golden City, was released September 8, 2009.TravelerThe book is set in the new future and lays out a world where the real power lies not with people or governments, but in the hands of a secret organisation who call themselves the Brethren but who their enemies refer to as the Tabula.  The Tabula are a centuries old secret society who believe in the importance of control and stability, making them in essence advocates of a kind of extreme Utilitarianism.  Influenced by the ideas of the philosopher Bentham the Tabula wish to enforce a Virtual Panopticon: a society where all individuals become so accustomed to being watched and monitored that they act at all times as if they were being observed and are as such completely controllable.This Virtual Panopticon is made possible through the use of surveillance cameras, centralized databases, RFID-like tags for each citizen, and assorted spy gear (heat sensors, cameras, X-rays, etc...).  The Tabula are a relatively small group, operate largely in secret, but they have great power across the planet, in part by manipulating politicians and other powerful individuals/organisation, and in part because of their great wealth and advanced technology, which is in some cases far beyond the technology available to other groups and even governments. The underlying premise for the realms in which this book is set greatly resembles the cosmology of Tibetan Buddhism (and other eastern cosmologies).  Most notably, the second realm is explicitly labelled the realm of the Hungry Ghosts, but each realm in the enumerated hierarchy is associated with a given human shortcoming, much like in Hinduism and Buddhism.  The world we inhabit is the fourth realm, and different Travellers can visit one or more of the other realms. Although the basic plot is not new, the author provides a setting for discussion of larger issues, such as will, the rapid increase in public surveillance and information gathering, the of fear, etc. While the motivations of the Tabula are explored in the book, this is kept at a rather superficial and crude level. Individual members are generally portrayed as either power hungry, psychopathic or deeply prejudiced, and the Tabula are set up as villains set to enslave humanity rather than misguided humanitarians.The author has written a post-script at the end of the book in which he talks about his reasons for writing the novel and discusses, among other things, the development in western countries regarding surveillance (such as CCTV), data-mining, RFID and GPS, the Awareness Office, etc.  He claims that all of the technology referred to in the book is either already being used or in the advanced stage of development.Travelers, Pathfinders and HarlequinsThe Travelers are individuals with a special gift, often but not always inherited, which allows them to detach from their bodies and journey through elemental barriers (water, fire etc) to other realms.  They do this by detaching their light (internal energy seemingly analogous to the soul but found by the Tabula to be empirically measurable) from their body.  Travelers experiences and gifts (they can view the world around them with greater speed and clarity than normal people) can lend them great charisma, wisdom and vision.  Many Travelers become religious prophets, or opponents of the Tabula, and the random element they add to societies makes them enemies of the Tabula who have hunted them almost to extinction.The idea that all people possess the light within and can travel through other states of consciousness or realms is also a basic tenet of Gnosticism.The Pathfinders are individuals capable of teaching potential Travelers how to break the light free from their body.  Pathfinders can be priests and holy men, agnostics or atheists  different Pathfinders will use different teaching methods and have different beliefs, but all can help Travelers to utilize their gifts.  Pathfinders are also hunted by the Tabula.The AuthorThe only information one can get on John Twelve Hawks is that he is living off the grid. This means that he is invisible to the network of surveillance and authority. He has no fixed home, no bank account or internet connection, and John Twelve Hawks is not his real name.Plot summaryIn the shadows of modern society an epic battle is fought. One woman is standing between those who try to control mankind and those who will risk their lives for the freedom of us all.On one side the Brethren, using high-end surveillance technology for control, supported by officials and politicians. On the other side the Travelers, the gifted ones, who are able to leave our realm and cross over into other realities. Because of their knowledge they are a great threat to the Brethren. The Travelers are supported by the Harlequins, a group only trained to defend the Travelers and to save them from the Brethren. Harlequins are trained since birth by their parents and other Harlequins. They are able to use all kinds of weapons, but their favored arm is a unique Harlequin sword they carry with them all the time.Maya, a pretty young woman, is trying to live the life of a normal citizen. Her background, on the other hand, is anything but normal. She is the daughter of a famous German Harlequin named Thorn, who had been badly injured in an ambush by the Brethren. On a mission she killed two men of the Yakuza, the Japanese mafia. As a consequence Maya had tried to hide and leave her Harlequin past behind until one day her handicapped father calls for her. When visiting him in Prague, she finds him slaughtered by his enemies.Fulfilling her fathers last wish, Maya takes a flight to the States supporting Shepherd, the last American Harlequin. She is determined to help him defend the last two Travelers alive. However, Shepherd has become a member of the Brethren. Working for the other side now, he tries to kill Maya. With the help of a young woman named Vikki she is lucky to get away. Vikki is a member of the I. T. Jones Church, a church of followers of the Traveler Isaac T. Jones, who was killed by the Brethren in 1889 with Lion of the temple (known as Zachary Goldman) a harlequin. Together they are able to find an ally, Hollis, a Capoeira trainer from Los Angeles and a former member of the Isaac T. Jones Community.The three of them are able to find the last living Travelers, Michael and Gabriel Corrigan. Before they are able to give them protection, Michael is captured by the Brethren. Instead of killing him immediately they try to convince him to help them. The Brethren recently started a new Program. They were in contact with a technologically advanced civilization dwelling in another realm. Aiming to travel through the realities, they need the help of a guide, someone who is able to travel without technology - like a Traveler.For achieving help, they offer the Brethren high technology, weapons and plans for a quantum computer. The Brethren want to use a real Traveler that can find this other civilization and guide it to the Earth.  By offering Michael power, money and everything else he wants, the Brethren convince him to work for them. With a new drug called 3B3, Michael is able to leave his realm without any usual way a Pathfinder would offer. A Pathfinder is a person that helps a Traveler to cross over. He or she is a teacher, but never a Traveler himself.While Michael gains his first experiences with other realms, Maya tries to find a Pathfinder for Gabriel. She herself knows little of other realms and the process of crossing over. At all time they must be careful and live off the grid, because the Brethren use all their power to get hold of them.Hollis stays in Los Angeles to place a false track. Within little time the Brethren show up at his house and try to kill him with a new weapon called Splicer, some kind of genetically engineered animal designed to search and destroy. But, Hollis defeats them.In the meantime Maya and Gabriel find a Pathfinder in the desert in Arizona: an old woman researching king snakes in an abandoned missile silo. While teaching Gabriel how to cross over, she tells him everything she knows about the Travelers and the six realms. There is the first realm of a town like hell, the second realm of a city full of hungry ghosts, the third is inhabited by animals ignorant of all others, the fourth realm is our own reality, where the sin is desire, the fifth realm is the reality of the half gods, where the sin is jealousy, and the sixth realm of the gods themselves, where the sin is pride. The gods and half-gods of the fifth and sixth realm are not meant like God as the creator of all life, but like the Tibetans describe them: human beings from parallel worlds.The realms are separated each by four barriers: one barrier of fire, one of water, one of earth and one of air. A Traveler that is capable of passing these four barriers is then able to enter one of the five other realms. If his body on earth dies, his soul, called the light, is condemned to stay forever in the realm it visits at that time.Crossing over into other realities, a Traveler can only carry special objects, called talismans, with him. Such an object is the sword Gabriels father gave him. Equipped with this sword, he meets his brother in the realm of the hungry ghosts.His brother tries to convince him to join the Brethren. Gabriel resists the temptation, but he tells his brother where he left his body. As a consequence Gabriel is imprisoned by the Brethren within hours and brought to the research centre where Michael is kept.Maya realizes that an immediate counterstrike is necessary. After an exciting battle in the Brethrens research facility, they free Gabriel but have to realize that they can not convince Michael to leave the Brethren.Maya and her allies are able to find refuge in a house on a beach in Cape Cod - but only to recover. At this point the first book of the fourth realm has a cliffhanger ending.Literary significance and receptionDavid Pitt in his review for Booklist said that John Twelve Hawks is a gifted storyteller, makes this surreal and vaguely supernatural good-versus-evil story entirely believable.  About the novel he says that the pace is fast, the characters intriguing and memorable, the evil dark and palpable, and the genre-bending between fantasy and thriller seamless.()  Diane Andrews Henningfeld in a review for Book Reviews had a slightly different view of The Traveler.  She said that the author was trying to tap into the popularity of Da Vinci Code and that while the characters are generally flat and the prose pitched to perhaps a seventh-grade reading level, many readers will find the intricate plot riveting.()Film adaptationIn February 2010, Century Fox acquired film rights to the Fourth Realm Trilogy.  The studio hired Tse to write the screenplay for the seriess first book, The Traveler.()References(External links* The Traveler official book site* The Traveler, by John Twelve Hawks *  Interview with John Twelve Hawks about The Traveler* The Fourth Realm Site Semi-fictional and semi-official forum, established by John Twelve Hawksde:Travelerviajero
2746852
Taylor_Range
The Taylor Range or Herbert Taylor Range is a range on the western edge of Brisbane, Queensland, Australia.() It was first named The Glenmorrison Range by Oxley during his exploration of the area in January 1824.()The range is an eastern spur at the southern end of the Range.( Most of the range is covered by two protected areas, Mount Coot-tha Reserve and the most southern section of Forest Park. Sir Samuel Griffith Drive is the only road over the range. East Ithaca Creek and West Ithaca Creek, two tributaries of Creek drain the eastern slopes. On the western side is Gap Creek, a tributary of Moggill Creek and the suburb of Chapel Hill.Ithaca Creek was unsuccessfully mined for gold between 1894 and the 1950s. Remnants of the mining operations can be found within Brisbane Forest Park.PeaksMount Coot-tha (on which there is a lookout, botanical gardens, a planetarium and television towers) is part of the Taylor Range.Another summit just to the north of Mount Coot-tha is Constitution Hill that rises to 258 m.thumb|Enoggera Hill, seen from The GapFurther east along the range is Hill. The range becomes a series of hills through the Brisbane suburbs of Red Hill, Spring Hill to Wickham Terrance in the central business district.( Protected areasMuch of the range has been protected in recreation reserves. Early attempts to purchase the land in the 1860s where not permitted by the Surveyor-General on the basis that the heights would be needed for trigonometrical purposes and for Brisbane residents to visit on account of the views and fresh air.(The public park at the summit of Mount Coot-tha was one of Brisbanes first public parks.( It was officially gazetted in 1880 and two years later was visited by Prince George who later become King George V.(See also*of mountains in AustraliaReferencesTaylor
2751162
RAG
RAG may refer to:*Academia:**(student society)Student-run charitable fundraising organisations that are widespread in the United Kingdom (and elsewhere)**Academia Galega**Academicum Germanicum*Military:**artillery group**Replacement Air Group, an outdated term for a Naval Aviation squadron that trains replacement pilots in fleet aircraft and tactics.  See Replacement Squadron**Antitank Grenade*Companies and businesses:**Aktiengesellschaft (former Ruhrkohle AG), an international coal mining group based in Herne, Germany (energy, chemical and real estate divisions were spun off to Evonik Industries)** Aktiengesellschaft (RAG), an Austrian oil and gas company*Other:**RAG Rating for issues or status reports, based on the Red Amber Green colors in traffic lights**allocation graph**RAG-1 or RAG-2, two subunits of the Recombination Activating Gene, which is involved in V(D)J recombination**AG, a German hip hop group**Recruiting Advance GroupSee also*(disambiguation), for meanings of the word ragde:RAGfr:RAGit:RAG
2756378
Deeside
For Strathdee in Scotland see Dee, AberdeenshireDeeside(  (Welsh: Glannau Dyfrdwy) is the name given to the predominantly industrial conurbation of towns and villages that lie on, or near the River Dee in Chester.((  These include, Quay, Mancot, Pentre, Shotton, Queensferry, Sealand, Broughton, Hawarden, Ewloe, Sandycroft and parts of Saltney. The population is around 32,000, with the majority (16,526) living in Connahs Quay.Deeside is known for its industry, providing jobs for the people of Cheshire, Merseyside & North Wales. The biggest employment area in Deeside is Deeside Industrial Park which has both historical and contemporary significance,( and provides Deeside and the surrounding area with jobs in many different industries from construction to food production. Deeside is also home to steel manufacturer Corus and aircraft manufacturer Airbus. The Airbus factory is in Broughton, where wings are produced for the Airbus A330 and the A380. The motto of the factory in Broughton is Without us, its just a bus meaning that the parts that make Airbus aircraft fly, rather than just run along the ground, are made in Deeside. Toyotas highly advanced engine manufacturing plant is located here.HistoryAncient historyThe industrial estate still contains visible relics of Deesides ancient history, such as the remnants of a human-made henge on a roundabout on a motorway roundabout in the Deeside Industrial Area.( Shottons history dates back around 1000 years to Saxon times.((Recent historyUntil industrialisation in the nineteenth century, Shotton remained a cluster of hamlets: a settlement comprising Shotton, Nine Houses and Shotton Hall, which itself dates back to 1637.((( Coal mining developed in the eighteenth century, then in 1889 the opening of the Hawarden Railway Bridge over the River Dee improved access to the reclaimed Dee Marshes.( Following this, in 1895, the Summers family purchased  of Dee marshland,( on which they established Shotton Steelworks.((In September 1896, Shotton Steelworks began producing sheet steel. The development of this steelworks on the banks of the River Dee changed an area that was once mainly marshland, with Shotton - just across the Dee - previously little more than a hamlet. Shotton Steelworks led to the development of whole communities to house the influx of workers, estimated up to 13,000 at the height of the industry,( with Shotton and Connahs Quay Jetty hubs of activity serving the steelworks.( There were also brickworks and other industries in and around Shotton, and Connahs Quay developed as a town on the banks of the Estuary, becoming known for its shipbuilding industry.(EducationPrimary schools in the area include: Taliesin Junior School, Bryn Deva Primary, Wepre Primary, Dee Road Infants, Custom House Lane, Golftyn Primary, Venerable Edward Morgan, Shotton Infants, Sealand County Primary, Sandycroft County Primary and St Ethelwolds Primary School.Secondary schools in the area include: Connahs Quay High School (Connahs Quay), John Summers High School (Queensferry) and St Davids High School (Saltney).Further EducationCollege is a large and popular college in Connahs Quay. It offers a range of full and part-time courses as well as apprenticeships. In an inspection in 2007 the college gained the highest possible grade 1 inspection ratings for its Work Based Learning provision.TransportBus travel in Deeside is mainly provided by North West who offer services to Chester Bus Exchange from a starting point in Connahs Quay. Arriva also provide a service to Rhyl in North Wales from Chester which passes through parts of Deeside.Arriva provide Train services in the Deeside area. The main services are to Liverpool and Manchester and to Wrexham and Rhyl. There are also services to London and Cardiff which call at DeesideThe Deeside Shuttle BusThe Deeside Shuttle Bus is a service which enables people to travel to and from work at a time convenient to them. The Deeside Shuttle Bus allows local residents to book a seat on the bus at a time and place specified by them, which will take them to work on Deeside Industrial Park. It has proved very popular and has now grown to serve other local areas.LandmarksThe most striking landmark in Deeside is the fixed cable-stayed bridge, which was opened by Elizabeth II in 1998. The bridge is known as the Bridge but is commonly referred to by locals as the New Bridge.Local mediaTelevisionThe Deeside area is mainly covered by the Winter Hill signal. This provides North West and ITV Granada.RadioThe local radio station in Deeside is Chesters 106.3 which broadcasts from its studio just off Sealand Road in Chester. The station is well known by locals and is regularly seen at public events, for example firework displays. Other local radio stations include Radio Merseyside and City 96.7.NewspapersThere are three main newspapers for Deeside: these are The Evening Leader and The Chronicle. There is also a free weekly paper called the Evening Standard.Notable people from DeesideIt is notable that a significant amount of the people on this list are or were footballers. This reflects the fact that football is a common pastime in the region. Several generations of the Gladstone-Glynne family were also born in Deeside.*Ewart Gladstone, 19th century Minister of the United Kingdom who spent his last years in the area.*Keen, MP for Brentford and Isleworth, born in Hawarden.*Lawton, Left winger currently playing for Alliance League side Town F.C., formerly of United.*Angus McLean, former manager of United F.C..*Millington, City F.C. player.*Owen, England and United F.C. footballer.*Speed, former footballer for United FC and FC.*Weale, Cross recipient who fought in the World War.External links***man-made henge at Deeside*images of ShotwickReferencesrefs()()()()()()()()()()()DyfrdwyDyfrdwy
2763886
IceTowers
IceTowers is a turnless strategy game designed by Looney and published by Labs. The game is played with a set of Icehouse pieces, with each player assigned a specific color. RulesThe pieces are initially scattered on the playing surface, and placed upright. Play then consists of forming and modifying towers made from the pyramids, with the goal being to control towers by having ones pieces on top. The three types of moves are capping, mining, and splitting.CappingYou may place one of your pieces on top of a tower, provided the top piece on that tower is not of your color, and is no smaller than the piece being used to cap.MiningYou may remove one of your pieces from a tower you dont control, provided you have two or more pieces in it.SplittingIf a tower contains two pieces of another players color next to each other, you may split the tower between them, creating two new towers.ScoringOnce the players agree that they have no more moves they wish to (or CAN) make, points are scored based on the total pieces in the towers players control. Large pieces are worth 3 points, medium pieces are worth 2, and small pieces are worth 1.External links*Wunderland games IceTowers homepage**IceTowers at IcehouseGames Wiki
2769764
Carl_Roman_Abt
thumb|Carl Roman Abtthumb|Abt rack systemCarl Roman Abt (1850  1933(Herring, Peter (2000).)) was a Swiss mechanical engineer, inventor and entrepreneur. He made groundbreaking innovations in rack-and-pinion railways, giving his name to one of the most widely-used systems developed for mountain railways, the Abt rack system.( Biography Abt was born on 16 July 1850 in Bnzen. In 1882, while working in Paris, he designed and patented his rack-railway system that enabled at least one tooth of the rack to be permanently engaged. It was first used on the Blankenburg to Tanne narrow-gauge railway in the Mountains of Germany.( Abt also developed the self-regulating Abt Switch for funicular railways and led the construction of 72 railways worldwide including the Visp-Zermatt, Gornergrat, Furka-Oberalp and Ferrovia Monte Generoso railways. The most famous railway built with the Abt system is the Arica to La Paz line in Bolivia.(In 1903, as president of the Gotthardbahn company, Abt led buy-back negotiations with the Confederation during the nationalisation of private railway companies. He received many honours, including an honorary doctorate (Doctor honoris causa) from the Technical University of Hannover and the John Scott Medal in 1882. He was also a patron and connoisseur of the arts, a member of the Swiss Federal Art Commission from 1904-1907 and the President of the Swiss Art Association from 1905-1911.Image:West Coast Wilderness Railway steam locomotive.jpg|thumb|Lyell Mining and Railway Company No. 5, an Abt type locomotivePastimesAbt was a keen collector of hammered gold artwork; he would not let go of any coin or medal whose special beauty aroused his artistic interest. His coin and art collection was auctioned off after his death on 1 May 1933 in Luzern, aged 82.(References Sources *Herring, Peter (2000). Ultimate Train, Dorling Kindersley Limited, London, 2000, p. 144. ISBN 0-7513-0698-3*Wgli, Hans G. (2005). Carl Roman Abt. In: Sieben Bergbahnpioniere. Zrich 2005. S. 23--34. Schweizer Pioniere der Wirtschaft und Technik. Bd. 81.*External links**Works about Carl Roman Abt in the catalogue of the National Library*World Rack RailwaysRoman AbtRoman AbtAbtAbt
2776226
Pennington_Flash_Country_Park
thumb|right|Feeding time at Pennington Flashthumb|right|Sunset at Pennington FlashPennington Flash Country Park is a  country park located between Lowton and Pennington, Leigh in Manchester, England.The flash is a  lake created at the turn of the 20th century by mining subsidence and flooding,() mainly from Colliery. Now an extensive reserve with several bird hides and a network of tracks and footpaths, Pennington Flash Country Park is nationally renowned for its birdlife and is a classic example of natural regeneration. A variety of well-maintained paths cater for walkers, cyclists and horse riders. Ideal for disabled persons, the Flashs hides have ramps for wheelchair access.()One of the premier birdwatching sites in West England, over 230 bird species have been recorded on site including: Bunting, Nightingale, Harrier, Spoonbill and Storm-petrel. Additionally, a wide variety of butterflies, dragonflies and damselflies can be spotted in the area.()  Facilities include a small information centre, a nine-hole municipal golf course, a and display car park, a childrens play area, picnic and recreation areas, bird watching facilities, fishing on certain shores, sailing, windsurfing and rowing through Leigh and Lowton Sailing Club,() a mobile caf and toilets.ReferencesExternal links*Flash @ RSPB Liverpool*Leigh and Lowton Sailing Club
2780585
Quantico_Creek
thumb|250px|right|Quantico Falls in Prince William Forest ParkQuantico Creek is a (U.S. Geological Survey. National Hydrography Dataset high-resolution flowline data. The National Map, accessed August 15, 2011) tidal tributary of the River in eastern Prince William County, Virginia. Quantico Creek rises southeast of Independent Hill, flows through William Forest Park and Dumfries and empties into the Potomac at Point. History thumb|250px|left|Quantico Creek in Prince William Forest ParkJohn Smith in 1608 reported the existence of a Doeg Indian community Pamacocack on the banks of this creek, as well as on the directly opposite (Maryland) side of the Potomac. This is thought to be a likely candidate for the place Henry Spelman was found living among the natives, which he reported was named Nacottawtanke, but by our english cald sic Camocacocke.  Early land patents spell the name of the creek variously as Quancico (1654), Quanticotte (1654, 1658), Quantecot (1657), Quanticoke (1664), Quonticutt (1665), and Quanticutt (1665).(Nugent, Cavaliers and Pioneers: Abstracts of Virginia Land Patents.)In 1690, settler Richard Gibson erected a gristmill on Quantico Creek near what is now the town of Dumfries. Scottish settlers then established a settlement and port on the estuary of Quantico Creek downstream after the bars to Virginias profitable tobacco trade were lifted by the Navigation Law of 1707. West of that port, the land was quickly cleared of its timber and was planted with crops such as cotton and tobacco. These crops were harvested and shipped out through the port of Dumfries at the head of the Quantico harbor. A customhouse and warehouse followed in 1731, and many others cropped up along the estuary by 1732. The growth of tobacco caused the area around the creek to erode, and the creek was filled with silt.The mid-19th century saw the development of some mining operations along the creek, consisting of the Gold Mine, located at the headwaters of the North Branch near Independent Hill, and the Cabin Branch Pyrite Mine, located about 1 mile west of Dumfries and now within the Park.  Both mines were significant sources of pollution on the creek.  The pyrite mine was a source of acid, formed from the natural breakdown of pyrite, while mercury was used extensively in the gold extraction process.  At one point, the water in the creek was nearly as acidic as vinegar.  Both mines have since undergone significant reclamation to restore the creek and its surroundings to an acceptable state of health, especially within the park.Today, the creek is not navigable because of silting in. Most of its watershed lies in William Forest Park and the town of Dumfries. The mines are no longer in operation. A plant on Point uses the water from the creek to cool itself. Communities Several communities, some extinct, lie near Quantico Creek. Communities are listed from the Quanticos source to its mouth on the Potomac.*Independent Hill*Hickory Ridge (extinct)*Batestown (extinct)*Triangle*Dumfries*Quantico, site of the Corps Base QuanticoWatershed organizations*Prince William Conservation AllianceSee also*of rivers of VirginiaReferences*A Ground Electromagnetic Survey Used to Map Sulfides and Acid Sulfate Ground Waters at the Abandoned Cabin Branch Mine, Prince William Forest Park, Northern Virginia Gold-Pyrite Belt by Jeff Wynn, U.S. Geological Survey, Reston, VA 20192, retrieved April 7, 2006
2787519
Use-case_analysis
A use case analysis is the most common  technique used to identify the requirements of a system (normally associated with software/process design) and the information used to both define processes used and classes (which are a collection of actors and processes) which will be used both in the case diagram and the overall case in the development or redesign of a software system or program.  The use case analysis is the foundation upon which the system will be built.(Taylor, Art. Analysis, Design, and Development Techniques with J2EE. InformIT. 6 June 2003. 22 Mar. 2008 )BackgroundA use case analysis is the primary form for gathering usage requirements for a new software program or task to be completed.  The primary goals of a use case analysis are: designing a system from the users perspective, communicating system behavior in the users terms, and specifying all externally visible behaviors. Another set of goals for a use case analysis is to clearly communicate: system requirements, how the system is to be used, the roles the user plays in the system, what the system does in response to the user stimulus, what the user receives from the system, and what value the customer or user will receive from the system.(Shacklette, Mark. 22 Mar. 2008 )WalkthroughThis walkthrough will set out one example of how to go about a use case analysis.  There are many variations of how to develop a use case analysis, and finding the right method can take time.( Getting From Use Cases to Code, Part 1: Use-Case Analysis by Gary Evans, IBM, 2004)RealizationA Use-case realization describes how a particular case is realized within the design model, in terms of collaborating objects(Performing use-case realizations by Ezequiel Cuellar).The Realization step sets up the framework within which an emerging system is analysed.  This is where the first, most general, outline of what is required by the system is documented.  This entails rough breakdown of the processes, actors, and data required for the system.  These are what comprise the classes of the analysis.(DescriptionOnce the general outline is completed, the next step is to describe the behavior of the system visible to the potential user of the system.  While internal behaviors can be described as well, this is more related to designing a system rather than gathering requirements for it.  The benefit of briefly describing internal behaviors would be to clarify with potential users that the system is not missing a vital component externally due to it being completed internally.  The overall goal of this step is to provide just enough detail to understand what classes are required for the system.  Too much detail can make it difficult to change the system later on.(Analysis ClassesThis step narrows down the class list into those classes that are capable of performing the behaviour needed to make the system function successfully.  If no classes yet exist for a system, they must be created before this step can be completed.  Classes can be created in many ways from many sources.  A few examples are: previousbut similarsystems, enterprise models, and data mining.  Once classes are created and narrowed down, relationships must be developed between classes, now called analysis classes, which model the task of the system.(ResponsibilitiesFor each analysis class identified in the previous step, the responsibilities of the class must be detailed clearly.  This will ensure that an individual class has a task to complete for which no other class in the system will also perform.  The responsibilities of the different classes should not overlap.(AssociationsAfter detailing the responsibilities of each analysis class, the relationships between the classes must be clarified next.  There are four parts of this step: 1. Identify the classes to be used. 2. Identify possible relationships between classes. 3. For those with relationships, describe the nature of the relationship. 4. If applicable, identify the multiplicity of the relationship, meaning determine how    many of the first class correspond to one object in the second class of the relationship.(View figure 1 for an example of associations between classes:center|Use Cases Analysis Relationships using Video Store exampleIn this diagram, each box is a class and the lines linking them show which ones have relationships between them.BehaviourOnce the relationships between classes is understood, the next process is to detail the behavior the classes will exhibit and how they will interact in order to complete the system.  This entails determining how the classes communicate and send messages along the timeline of the system process being developed.  This is derived from the responsibilities of the classes previously identified.  Determining what class the message goes to follows the associations set up in the previous step.(Describe AttributesThroughout the use case analysis so far, attributes of the classes and objects may have been discovered that are necessary for the classes to complete their tasks.  These could be in the form of data variables or functions.  Some of these attributes can be derived from the previous steps, while others are general assumptions from common knowledge (e.g. all operational modern-day computers have an operating system, a processor, and input/output devices).(View figure 2 for an example on described attributes following the figure 1 diagram:center|Use Case Analysis Description of Video Store exampleThe attributes described in the diagram at this point are generally the items that become the data needed for the system/process to function properly.MechanismsThe final step is to identify components that provide a solution to the problem domain.  This would include databases to hold the data, security, exception handling, and communication between processes or programs.(References
2793209
Marino,_South_Australia
 location1 Marino is a suburb in the south of Adelaide, Australia. It sits on coastal hills overlooking St Vincent, within the of Marion Local Government Area.  It neighbours Seacliff, Hallett Cove and Kingston Park.The suburb features the Marino Rocks beach which has a steep cliff face and then a low and flat rocky beach, leading out to a reef on the southern end of Seacliff.   Fishing and snorkelling are common recreation activities.At the northern end of the beach, the public artwork Contemplation can be viewed, by artist Marijana Tadic.  Launched in 2006, the artwork takes the form of a rocked boat.Also as of 2006, at the access point to the beach, there is mosaic artwork on the outer walls of the toilet facility. These were designed and constructed by South Australian artist Michael Tye.  Michael worked with local artists and community members in the design and construction of the mosaic artwork along the nearby retaining wall.The Noarlunga Railway Line passes through the suburb, and there are two railway stations: Marino and Marino Rocks.   The line has had an active history, first being built In 1913 to Marino and extending to Willunga in 1915.  The section from Hallett Cove to Willunga was closed in 1969.  In the 1970s the line was extended south from Hallett Cove, reaching Christie Downs in 1976 and Noarlunga Centre in 1978.A number of walking trails are available through Marino including the Coastal Walk and the Coast to Vines rail trail. A signposted suburban bikeway from Glenelg to Marino travels along secondary roads in the area.Marino is home to the Rocks Lighthouse and the Conservation Park.HistoryA team, under the leadership of J.W. McLaren, completed the survey of the coastal strip of Brighton in December 1838.    Land grants for sections 206 (now Somerton) and 234 - 246 (now Brighton - Marino) were allotted in March and April 1839.  Section 244 was known as Marino, and granted to George S. Kingston.  This is now mostly Kingston Park.  Sections 245 and 246 were originally known as the New Brighton Country Lands and were granted to Matthew Smith.Smith divided the New Brighton Country Lands into 40 blocks of  each.  It was considered poor pastoral land, due to the exposed salt air and strong winds.   By August 1842 Smith had sold only 15 blocks, mainly to notable business people who had little intention of living in the New Brighton Country Lands, but bought properties as a speculative proposition for future sales to fishing families or workers in the nearby quarry.  Henry Hickling purchased 6 blocks. In 1884 John Roberts bought some of the remaining unsold blocks and 20 or so years later sold this land to George S. Kingston.Local government in the area was formed in 1853, the 18th District Council constituted in South Australia.  Its name was the District Council of Brighton (as distinct from the Corporation of Brighton which formed some 5 years later, mainly as a result of the determination of local residents to improve roads in the area).  The first chairman of this new district was Thomas OHalloran.  The first meetings were held in the Thatched House Tavern, which, if still standing, would be on the corner of Brighton and Sturt roads.  According to the 1876 Census, the District Council of Brighton totalled 328 schoolchildren of which 192 were able to read and write.  In 1886 the council, less the now small coastal Corporation of Brighton, was re-named the District Council of Marion.In 1875 a proposal was put forward to build an outer harbour at Marino.  The proposal was furthered in 1880 in a report by Captain H.S. Stanley, R.N.  In 1901 a Marino Outer Harbour League was formed.  However the construction of the Outer Harbour near Adelaide, in 1908, finally laid these plans to rest.In 1883 the Glenelg, Brighton and Marino Tramway Company began a horse-drawn tram service.  The tram made its last run along Brighton Road to Glenelg in February 1914.The shore from Holdfast Bay to Marino, was generally well visited by townspeople, who would take the hours ride from Adelaide to enjoy the beach and fresh sea breeze.  Sundays in particular were popular, especially in fine weather.  In Easter, holiday-makers could buy cool drinks, hot water and fruit from a tent set up on the beach, the proprietor paying a guinea fee to the Council to conduct business.  In the 1920s an old railway carriage found its way onto the foreshore of Marino Rocks, still a popular holiday destination.  In the 1930s, reports from council stated no renovations or building of shacks should disturb the Sunday peace of Marino residents.Marino, also known as Folkstone for a while, was further subdivided in 1912, along with Morphettville Park, Woodlands Park and Hallett Cove Model Estate.NameAlthough in the Kuarna language marra is hand and marrana is the plural - hands - it is generally believed that Marino is named after two landmarks known to Charles Kingston, who bought property in the area in 1849.Charles Kingston, an Irishman who came out to South Australia on board the Cygnet, was born in Bandon, County Cork,  from a prominent point called Marino Point.  In addition, in the Dublin suburb of Marino stood a remarkable pavilion, the Casino, built in 1771.  As a civil engineer and aspiring architect, Kingston would have been aware of this building.IndustryEarly in the history of European settlement of South Australia, limestone, sand, quartzite and gypsum have been quarried in the Marino area.The South Australian Company quarried building and paving stone.  A pier was built at Marino Rocks beach in 1840 to transport this stone to building sites in Port Adelaide and Adelaide.  The ridges of the pier, extending out to a marker buoy, are still visible today, at low tide.In 1882, a limestone quarry supported the first cement manufactured in South Australia.  This early industry, after a tumultuous start, is the forerunner of Brighton Cement.Horses played a significant part in the Brighton Cement Works especially on the steep and difficult climb from Marino to the quarries further south, on what was then, and still is, known as Cement Hill.The Brighton Cement works moved to Angaston in the 1950s.  Brighton Cement merged with Adelaide to become Adelaide Brighton Cement in the 1970s.Linwood Quarries bought into the area in 1933 and further expanded into the previous Brighton Cement Works when they moved out in 1952.  In 1973, rehabilitation of the site was being discussed and in 1979 the Marion Golf Park was opened on former quarry land.  The cost of the rehabilitation was shared between Quarry Industries, City of Marion and various state and federal government departments.  The project marked the first council to avail themselves of funds available through the Extractive Areas Rehabilitation Fund, a 10% state government levy on each ton of extractive minerals sold.Boral have been operating a small asphalt  plant, under a federal mining licence, in Marino, at the Lindwood Quarry since the 1980s.Walking and Cycling TrailsThe 7.2km coastal boardwalk starts at the Marino Esplanade and finishes at the Hallett Cove Headland Reserve.  A part of the Adelaide Coast Park, the walk is unique in the metropolitan area with its rugged cliffs, small coves and rocky coast.  The cliffs at Hallett Cove feature significant geological formations with evidence of glacial movements 600 million years ago.  The coastline features prominently in the Tjilbruke legend of the Kaurna people.  Coastal and marine interpretive signage has been installed along the coastal walking trail and consists of 33 large art signs in the shape of dolphins, fish, crabs and traditional Kaurna shields.  Community artist, Barbary OBrien worked with local schools, resident groups and members of the Kaurna Aboriginal community to develop the signs.The 34km Coast to Vines rail trail is a mostly sealed walking and cycling trail starting at Marino and travelling south through Adelaides southern suburbs along the old railway line.  It travels through the McLaren Vale wine district, finishing in the country town of Willunga.A popular bike path along secondary roads is also available for cyclists to ride north from Marino to Glenelg, and even further to Semaphore and Outer Harbour.See also*of Adelaide suburbsReferencesExternal links*RailTrails Australia website http://www.railtrails.org.au*Marion City Council website http://www.marion.sa.gov.au*The History of Marion on the Sturt, by Alison Dolling*The Vanishing Sands, by Averil G. Holt*The Romance of Place Names of South Australia, by Geoffrey H. Manning
2798954
Kuznetsk_Depression
Kuznetsk Depression () is located among mountains of Southern Siberia: Alatau to the Northeast, Ridge to the Southwest, and Shoria to the South. Elevation up to 500 m, area: 70,000 km, length: 400 km, width: 120 km.It is split by a network of river valleys. Major rivers are River, River and other tributaries of River.The central part has several mesozoic basalt mountain ridges of height 600740 m. (Taradanovs Ridge, Saltymakovs Ridge, Karakan Mountains).The depression contains the famous coal-mining Basin. Main cities are Kemerovo, Novokuznetsk, Prokopyevsk.See also* of South-Central Siberia* Depression* Depressionnl:Koeznetsk-depressienn:Kuznetsksenkinga
2804415
Copper_Kings
The Copper Kings, industrialists Andrews Clark, Daly, and Augustus Heinze, were collectively known for the epic battles they fought in Montana and the surrounding region during the Age over the control of the local copper mining industry, a fight which had ramifications for not only Montana, but the States as a whole. The battles between Clark, Daly and Heinze, and later between just Heinze and industrialist financiers Rockefeller and H. Rogers are a large chapter in Montana history. Eventually, a company known as Copper emerged as a monopoly, expanding into the fourth largest company in the world by the late 1920s.HistoryWhile the cost of smelting the complex copper-bearing ore was high, after the Civil War, investors like Andrews Clark and Andrew Jackson Davis began to develop Buttes mines and erect mills to extract the silver and gold. The riches in the hills made Davis Montanas first millionaire.By 1876, Butte had become a prosperous silver camp with over 1,000 inhabitants. Daly arrived that year representing the Walker brothers, entrepreneurs from Lake City. His mission was to inspect the Alice Mine for possible purchase by the brothers. Daly purchased the mine and successfully managed it for the Walkers. The town of Walkerville, which still overlooks the city of Butte, sprang up around the mine and other mines in the area. In 1880, Daly sold his interest in the Walkers properties and bought the Anaconda Mine. He did so with investment money from several Francisco capitalists, including Hearst, the father of media mogul Randolph Hearst. Clark and Davis also attracted investors from Denver and points east. It wasnt long before capitalists from York and Boston bought into the huge potential of the area. During the 1880s, copper mining came into the forefront and Butte became the worlds greatest copper producer. The Pacific Railroad came to the area in 1881 allowing developers to build and equip smelters. The Butte smelters quickly became the best in the world at extracting the metal from the ore.Those who controlled the copper mines stood to make millions of dollars, the prize sought by the three men who fought for Buttes mineral wealth with greed and generosity, cruelty and compassion, cowardice and courage. They used their fabulous wealth to buy courts, newspapers, politicians, banks, police, and anything and anyone that could help them or hinder their opponents. To get what they wanted, their money flowed like snowmelt throughout the mile-high city and eventually reached the nations capital. All the while the miners toiled thousands of feet below ground in tunnels dug with blasting powder, picks, and shovels. And sometimes, backed by rival copper kings, they also battled, with fists and dynamite, either on the streets of Butte or far below the surface.It wasnt long before Butte began to pay a price for the riches. The air filled with toxic sulfurous smoke. Daly responded by building a giant smelter in Anaconda, just 30 miles west of Butte. To this day, the giant smokestack remains a landmark. Shortly after Daly built the smelter, the Boston and Montana Co., with holdings only second to Dalys, built one in Great Falls. Trains carried the ore from Buttes mines to both smelters.Clark also yearned to be a statesman and used his newspaper, the Butte Miner, to push his political ambitions. He became a hero in Helena, Montana, by campaigning for its election as the state capital instead of Anaconda. Clarks long-standing dream of becoming a States Senator resulted in scandal in 1899 when it was revealed that he bribed members of the Montana State Legislature in return for their votes. At the time, U.S. Senators were chosen by their respective state legislators. The U.S. Senate refused to seat Clark because of the 1899 bribery scheme, but a later Senate campaign was successful, and he served a single, undistinguished term from 1901 until 1907.In 1899, Daly teamed up with two principals of D. Rockefellers Oil, William Rockefeller and Henry H. Rogers to create the giant Copper Mining Co., one of the largest trusts of the early Twentieth Century. (Neither Standard Oil or John D. Rockefeller were directly involved). To stir the mix, another Copper King, Augustus Heinze, fought the dominance of Amalgamated, providing excitement to an already interesting chapter in Montanas legal history. Marcus Daly died in 1900. John D. Ryan, a local banker, became close to Margaret Daly after her husbands death, and finally convinced Heinze to sell out, creating the monopoly Amalgamated sought. By 1910, it had changed its name to the Copper Mining Company swallowing several smaller mining companies along the way. The Company dominated Butte for the next 70 years.  References *The Battle for Butte, by Michael P. Malone.  2006 ed.  Seattle: University of Washington Press, 2006. ISBN 0-295-98607-7*The Wealthy 100:  From Benjamin Franklin to Bill Gates- A Ranking of the Richest Americans, Past and Present, by Michael Klepper and Robert Gunther.  Secaucus, N.J. : Carol Pub. Group, 1996.  ISBN 0-8065-1800-6*The War of the Copper Kings, by C.B. Glasscock.  Helena, MT:  Riverbend Publications, 2002.  ISBN 1-931832-21-8External links*The Copper King Mansion*War of the Copper Kings*Butte
2809975
esk_Lpa
esk Lpa a district seat and the largest city of the district bearing the same name. esk Lpa can be reached easily from the north via Dresden, Bautzen, and the border crossing at Seifhennersdorf / Varnsdorf. Together with Liberec, being a higher administrative region, its a part of Nisa Euroregion. Theres Plounice River flowing through the city with its nearby fount in the east side of the district. Ceska Lipa comprises about ten neighborhoods and 14 municipal parts populated by forty thousand permanent residents. The district is a favorite destination of tourists especially from Germany, Holland and other countries as well as domestic travellers. They often like to visit the towns of Doksy and Star Splavy and the famous and recently renovated castle of Bezdz. Inhabitants of Ceska Lipa mostly work in the industrial zone and other companies in the city and its surroundings. Unemployment level resembles other parts of the Czech Republic, not the best and not the worst, simply some average. Majority of people live in residential neighborhoods surrounding the old style inner town. There are quite good shopping chances in the city and conditions for living are nice. Education is offered by several local high schools for students but no significant university has been established. Several sports facilities for entertainment was recently built and others renovated by the city. Free time can also be used to go to cinema, theater, disco, concert or a club but gorgeous amusement business has to be searched somewhere else. All points of interest and need are reachable by municipal transit buses out of which all are disabled accessible. In only 10 miles south from esk Lpa, there lies a great lake Mchovo jezero (Mchas lake). This is a popular summer resort, providing water sports, including surfing and yachting. In one easy word, Ceska Lipa city is average and it reflects all that can be expected. Description esk Lpa ( ) is a city in the district of esk Lpa in Liberec Region. Its located in the Bohemia and has Plounice River flowing through and the historic core at its north bank. In the area of 24 sq mi the city of esk Lpa comprises 14 parts with population of 38 181 permanent inhabitants. Its old town has been built by the Water Castle near a ford via the Plounice River where a Slavonic colony existed from the 10th century. The ancestry of Ronovci and Jindich z Lip in particular contributed to the founding of the city() in 1305 to 1319 and the stem of Berkov z Dub promoted its development. A hundred years later the city was occupited by Hussite army of Jan Roh z Dub and affected with devastating fires. Founding a monastery and school Alberf of Valdtejn, and later Kaunitzs, contributed to another boom of the city. After the founding of Czechoslovakia (The Czech Republic today), when a meeting of 25 000 Nazis took place downtown in 1934, the city became a center of nationality unrest. Modern urban looks and development has been influenced by industrial production in the city and uraniun mining in the region. Residential neighborhoods consisting of prefab housing in large were built on the outskirts while the city center was preserved and enunciated as an urban heritage zone.() Genesis The territory of the city nowadays wasnt inhabited permanently until the 13th century. The first written reference of settlement comes from year 1263 and is included in the Doksany Priors purchase roll. The history of the city is associated with Ronovci(Bezdz 2002, str. 7) ancestrys name of Chvala ze itavy, who founded the Lip Castle, and mainly his grandson Jindich z Lip (1270-1329), a significant royal aristocrat. As rolls havent been preserved its not sure who exactly of the ancestry founded the castle and settlement around. Thus the Lip Castle became their another fortificated seat in the North Bohemia on the route of trade ways that time. As mentioned above, there were a Slavonic colony of that name near the castle, later renamed to Star Lpa (a part of the city today).(). Theres a reference of Arnold, said to come from Star Lpa, who used to be a burgess in Kravae (a small town today). Historians derive from the reference of Star Lpa that the Lip Castle and the colony were established around.() Jindich z Lip moved to Moravia in 1319 after he had sold the castle with its surroundings to his cousin Hynek Berka. According to other news, in 1327 the mentioned Hynek Berka z Dob, also a member of the ancestry of Ronovci and rich Prague burgrave, was the lord of Lip and wide surroundings. When he died in 1348, his son of the same name took the grip and after his death the second of sons Jinich catched on. Then his nephew Hynek Berka z Dub reigned the area. The eldest city charter, which he issued on March 23, 1381, documents that discretions were granted to the city of Lip and that it was him who contributed the most to the boom of the city and the castle bearing the same name.City walls were constructed in the beginning of the 14th century as well as a perish church of St. Paul and Peter, which was destroyed when fires affected the city in 1787. it was canonized by Peter of Aspelt, the Mayence archbishop, in 1312 in the presence of Lucembursk, the Czech king. Deans Office of Dn was delegated to him in 1341.(Bezdz 2002, str. 10)In the second half of the 14th century the family of Weitmile was concerned significantly in the develompment of the city even behind its walls. Members of this family used to hold positions of reeve and parsons. Petr z Weitmile was assigned as a witness on the granting of the urban discretions document by Hynek Berka z Dub in 1381.(Bezdz 2002, str. 6) Development of the city and a larger part of Bohemia was paused by a great plague epidemic in 1389. In the end of the 14th century the castle was controlled by other members of lords of Lip family, of which a powerful and significant Hynek Hlav was often referred, until the beginning of Hussite wars when in May 1426 it was carried by Hussites lead by Jan Roh z Dub() and became their considerable stronghold until 1436. In years 1502 to 1553 a larger part of the city and its surroundings belonged to Vartenberks. Later, the lords of Dub / Lip gained the castle again and kept it over 100 years. Albrecht of Valdtejn reunited the city in 1622 to 1623 being disintegrated by Berkas.() The city was destroyed in large part in 1787 and 1820. Emblem and Flag of the city The emblem of the city originates in the urban seal from 1389. Above the city wall theres a coat of arms of the lords of Lip with crossed fighting rods. The flag was designed by the Heraldic Committee, the State District Archives of esk Lpa, in 1992 and adjusted according to a historical artwork from 1937. The emblem proposal was discussed in the city government in June 1992, reviewed by Subcommittee for Heraldics of the House of Commons in December and 15th of July, 1993 the Speaker of the House of Commons granted the emblem to the city.()  Monuments thumb|Marry the Virgins Birth Church Ecclesiastical Monuments * Augustinian Monastery, founded by founded by Albrecht of Valdtejn in 1627, it took 150 years to complete. There used to be a school and printhouse. Today, beside others, the Homeland Museum and Gallery of the city of Ceska Lipa works here. Location: Nmst Osvobozen (Liberation Square), city center.** Loretan Chapel, built in 1698 in the monastery cloisters** All Saints Church, subsequent construction of the monastery, completed in 1710* Marry the Virgins Birth Church, originally a gothic church of 14th century, reconstructed to baroque style in 1706 to 1710 by Josef Abondius. Location: Palackho Square, upper downtown.thumb|left|Saint Maria Magdalene Church* St. Maria Magdalene Church was built in gothic style in the middle of the 13th century but later damaged by Hussite and Luice armys. Berka, brother-in-law of Ji z Podbrad the king, had it repaired and reconstructed around 1460() and 30 years later it became a part of the provost seat. It was reconstructed to the nowadays Late Gothic style in the 16th century. Location: Corner of Nbe B. Smetany a Hrnsk Street, downtown** Cistorian Provost, today Deanery - Rome Catholis Parish, is adjacent to the church and comes from 1756, Location: 721 Hrnsk Street* St. Cross Promotion Church, built in the second half of 14th century, later reconstructed to Late Gothic style and even later in 1897 adjusted to neo-Gothic style by Mocker. Location: Hrnsk Street, downtown* Evangelic Church was built in 1927 and 1928 by local protestants and taken over by Czechoslovak Hussite Church in 1945, Location: Rohe z Dub Streetthumb|100px|Morov sloup na nmst* Plague Maria the Virgin and Holy Trinity Column at T. G. Masaryk Square. Part by part built in 1683 after the plague pandemic which hit the city and surroundings in 1680.* The place where a synagogue had stood until destroyed in 1938 by Nazis is marked with the historical memorial stone installed ceremonially in 2008 ().thumb|left|Jewish Cemetery by Stelnice* Nearby the Stelnice train stop and Stelnice bar and disco area theres an enclosed Jewsish Cemetery. Other Monuments * Lip Water Castle (also Lip, Lip) was built in 13th century by members of the ancestry of Ronovci who later called themselves the Lords of Lip. In the beginning the construction was made of wood and was built by Plounice river. The rivers flow was later deflected. A guard tower of stone was built in the 14th century. It was captured by Hussites and Swedes and ceased in time. There were a sugar refinery inside in the 19th and beginning of the 20th century and the castle was finally blasted out after 1945. After 1990 the city began with its gradual reconstruction and organizes cultural events in its grounds. A contributory organization Lip, esk Lpa has been established by the city for the castles management and a neighboring recently renovated historical exhibition of Centrum textilnho tisku (textile print center) was given in its charge in February 2011.()thumb|Red House* Red House is in vicinity with the Lip Castle and was built as a hunters chateau by Ji Berka z Dub in 1583(esk Lpa z r. 1976, str. 162). This building of Italian renaissance style is fine decorated outside with sgrafitto and had been used for many purposes, such as a dye-house, a tavern, and a city museum branch in 1933. Its unused nowadays. Location: U vodnho hradu St.* Neo-Renaissance City Hall from 1823 was reconstructed in 1884 and is in use for its purpose at T. G. Masaryk Square downtown. Basements are built in Gothic style as the city hall had been standing here even in past times before several devastating fires. The building had partially served as a saving house, a court and by 1900 also as a museum branch.* Fountain (Empire, with dolphins) at T. G. Masaryk Square from 1837, fully functional in Summertime down to this day.thumb|left|pik Hill with Transmitter* pik Outlook Tower - The Hill of pik at the north edge of the city has elevation of 150 ft above sea level, the highest point far and wide. The outlook tower of 45 ft in height was built there in 1885 for a price of 5000 guilders and mere two years later partially burnt down. However, it was soon renovated and in 1906 only there were 2500 tourists written in its memorial book. It was used for anti-aircraft patrols in the Second World War and then began to cease. In 1997 it was renovated and adjusted to radio and cellular phone networks transmitter, unavailable for ordinary public. A blue hiking trail leads here from the downtown.(eskolipsko do kapsy, str. 178) Nature Protection Therere several monumental trees and one conservation in the city - Okeice Meadows. Education As proved, there was a parochial school in 1391 in tie city, then records mention a doom of the school in 1515 during a big fire. The Latin school established in 1627 together with the Augustinian Monastery had been canceled by Maria Theresa the Empress. The facility was restored in 1806 as their high school. Education had its boom in 19th century. In 1824 an evening school for working children was established, then a trade apprentice school was opened in 1838, a business school in 1868, a practice school by the Monastery in 1869, a trade continuation school in 1879 and in October 19 the same year a high school of agriculture was opened. In 1882 the State High School was established and in 1895 girls and 1900 a boys burgress school.There was 42 schools and kindergartens in 2003 in the city.Read more about local schools in the article: v esk Lp Culture  Main Centers Therere several culture centers in esk Lpa. Its mainly the Crystal Culture House, then the Jirsek Theater, the Art School with its halls, the Homeland Museum and Gallery with their branches and the Municipal Library with its branches.thumb|Crystal Culture House Crystal Culture House The building comprises a cinema, halls and a restaurant. A contributory organization was established by the city after 1990 bearing the name of Crystal Culture House as its manager and this helps organizing Summer events in the Lip Castle. The city governemnt concluded that the mentioned group would be renamed to Ceska Lipa Culture effective by the 1st of January 2011 and herewith a new organization esk Lpa would be established. This one was given the castle in charge of as well as( )) the recently created historic Textile Print Center in the castle vicinity opened in February 16, 2011.()Before the Municipal Information Center was moved to the City Hall it had been a part of Crystal Cultural House as well. Art School This facility was established in the building called the White House which formerly served to the Communist Party District Coommittee until 1990..() Therere several sections and their schoolrooms in this multilevel building while the groundfloor with its large hall serves as a seat of the Rainbow Dancing School. Theres enough space for plastics exhibitions and the smaller hall is made for production of music files as well as the school activities. Its also used by other non-school music groups.* (More about this Art School and Dancing School see: v esk Lp) Museum and Gallery thumb|Augustinian Monastery GardenHomelad Museum and Gallery of the city of esk Lpa is located in the grounds of the former Augustinian Monastery. A big Animal World exhibition permenently takes place here. A Loretan courtyard grants place to short-time exhibitions. Theres a religious building of Loreta in the middle and other places are occupied with artwork collections. The chapel is also part of the grounds and is used for concerts. This museum has a regional character and holds many object of the Ceska Lipa District area. Its as well the manager of Village Magistrate in a the town of Kravae, Karel Hynek Mcha Memorial in the town of Doksy including the Fisher and Pond Culture of Ceska Lipa exhibition. Its also in chrge of Breda Summerhouse in the grounds of Lemberk Chateau.() Municipal Library The main three-level building is downtown at the 170 T. G. Masaryk Square. Theres an entertaintment literature department on the 1st floor; educational literature, public internet access and reading and lecture rooms on the 2nd floor and children department on the 3rd floor.The library offers consultancy to smaller libraries of the district and has its three branches in the city:* Branch for pik neighborhood, ervenho Ke St.,* Branch for Lada neighborhood, 2989 Komenskho St.,* Branch for Holy vrch neighborhood, 1814 Jin St. Cultural Events  Municipal Summer Festival The city organizes the Municipal Summer Festival in the grounds of Lip Castle every year at the beginning of Summer. This event was founded in 2000 when it took place in the city park, then celebrating 125 years from its founding. The next year it took place at the T. G. Masaryk Square. When Lip Castle was renovated in 2003 the festival moved to its grounds. This event contains an antique fair, concerts, fireworks, theater performances and City Awards are granted.().  Lpa Musica Festival The first annual International Lpa Music Festival was held in 2000, primarily featuring classical music.  By 2008 there were 10 places in the Ustecky and Liberecky regions organizing concerts. In the city of esk Lpa the opening and closing events of the festival are held in the All Saints Basilica, part of the Augustinian Monastery.The Lipa Musica Festival has a significant position among cultural events in Libereck Region, being the leading musical event of the autumn season. This is not just a regional matter, especially since 2007, when its itinery changed, it presents top quality concerts which attract listeners from further afield including Prague. The aim of the management is to make this festival one of the biggest in Czechia. Reggae Ethnic Session For fans of reggae, ska and world music styles the Ethnic Session music festival was established in 2000 in znkov, peripheral neighborhood of the city, and this one has become the biggest of its kind in Bohemia. Since guest number had skyrocketed and the place in znkov ceased to be enough large any more, the session has moved to nearby meadows of Hemaiky neighborhood. Press and Media  Press After year 1850 the Leipaer Zeitung was released in German language for esk Lpa readers and competitive Deutsche Leipaer Zeitung from 1884, both twice a week.). The following periodical press titles are nowadays main information sources: eskolipsk denk (Ceska Lipa Daily) now part of Vltaba Labe Press Holding, established in 1993 and Mstsk noviny (Municipal Journal) issued by the city hall. Lpa magazine, new eskolipsk otek and Zpravodaj OSBD esk Lpa bring information as well as advertising. Advertising press Retail chains of Interspar, Kaufland, OBI, Penny Market, Lidl, Albert Hypermarket (formerly Hypernova) and local OD Andy feed merely advertising press deliverd to post boxex. Theres also a longer history of eskolipsk kapky (esk Lpa Drops) advetising magazine. Other media Theres no commercial or municipal TV station in esk Lipa but the Hitradio FM Crystal broadcasts here both for Ceska Lipa and Decin districts (formerly for Ceska Lipa only). The city has an official site on the net, theres also an independent i-noviny district web based newspaper and tens of other blogs, sites of private to rag style. Almost all institutions, organizations, Public Administration, sport and culture clubs have their sites. Sports thumb|Winter Stadium and neighboring Swimming Pool  Sports facilities Sport esk Lpa, a contributory organization, established by the city has the following facilities in charge:* Municipal Stadium - 3178 Boeny Nmcov St., open soccer pitch, tennis hall, outdoor tennis courts, hothouse and solarium.* Sports Hall (Lokomotiva)  1439 Hrnsk St.* Sports Complex by Kaufland, reconstructed winter stadium and indoor pool with water slide* Sever Swimmimg Pool  2520 koln St.* Skatepark, in the vicinity of the Sports Complexthumb|left|Pata School GymAnother Facilities* OLYMPIA Relax Center, squash, bowling, hothouse, * Bowling, three places in town* School gyms and pitches* TJ Lokomotiva grounds incl. a soccer pitch near the train station* Lada Airdrome - an air club and sightseeing flights* Sosnov Motor-racing Circuit - tens of contests incl. National Championship* PMultifunction Sports Hall near Kaufland Hypermarket for basketball, volleyball, handball, floorball and indoor soccer. The consgtruction in price of 45 ml. CZK was started in Summertime of 2010 and completed a year later.() Tourism * Theres the Municipal Information Center at the T. G. Masaryk Square.* Boating Plounice, used for canoes and kayaks from the town of Str pod Ralskem, municipal washtub funny rally from time to time. Hiking Trails and Background Therere three cycling paths leading throught the city, built paritally on subsoil of canceled railroads.* Cycling Path 3053 - leads from south from Provodin and Sosnov. Farther from Ceska Lipa it leads northwards via Psen as Psen Cycling Path, then to towns of Nov Bor and Cvikov in Lusation Mountains* Cycling Path 3054 - from Provodin as well, via Vl dl (here Vl dl Cycling Path). From Ceska Lipa it leads northwards in direction of Skalice township and Nov Bor town.* Varhany Cycling Path - its construction still in progress, a part of the path 3054. It should be 10.5 mi long in price of 17 mil. CZK. Its first part from eskokamenick Street to Libchava township in length of 3.3 mi was opened ceremonially on June 23, 2008.      * Theres a network of hiking trails in the city as well as its surroundings and a guide-post crossing at Bulharsk St. leading to the train station. The nearest rambler destination is the Peklo (hell), a part of E10 international route getting northsouthwards through the city. Blue trail leads from Bulharsk St., as mentioned above, e.g. 1634 Trail to Mchas Lake or yellow 6960 to Holany Ponds.* Theres a Klub eskch turist (Czech Tourist Club) with a sign before the train station and the seat in Adela Villa and TOM (Youths Tourist Troop).thumb|Plounice pobl nemocnice Sports Organizations District Committee of Czech Union of Physical Education used to be an original administrative association which now is esk Lpa District Sports Union, 1580 Mnesova St. the most significant Physical Education Organizations are as follows:* Predators esk Lpa, hockey* Arsenal esk Lpa, soccer* esk Lpa, soccer, volleyball, table-tenniss, handball, judo* club esk Lpa, athletics* esk Lpa, floorball club with several units* Klub Sport Relax Znamenek, karate Largest Companies Soubor:Dubice Johnson.jpg|thumb|Gate of ControlsTheres a number of large automotive companies in the southwest part of the city, mainly in Dubice neighborhood and industrial zone where about 5000 workers are employed. Those are branches of international holding corporations such as Controls, Varta, Delphi Packard Electric, Autobaterie, Fehrer Bohemia and Bombardier. Banks Most of the following are downtown:* spoitelna Hrnsk St.* banka Hrnsk St.* SOB, Barvsk St.* Money Bank, T. G. Masaryk Sq.* stavebn spoitelna,T. G. Masaryka Sq.* Bank Czech Republic, Jindicha z Lip St. Transportation thumb|left|Canceled Downtown Station Railways Theres a junction of several important railroads in the city, namely: esk Lpa hlavn ndra|esk Lpa Central Station, and train stops Lpa stelnice and Lpa-Hol vrch. The first one is on the railway Bakov nad Jizerou - Jedlov and the second one to Dn. Downtown Station (Lpa msto) was canceled in 1979 and a railway connecting it with the central staion in length of three quartesrs of a mile aint in use any more. Now train stop (with a misguiding name today) Vl dl - Dobranov belongs to the city as this peripheral area has become a neighboorhood of esk Lpa. Railroads and stations have been built by various companies. The first railway was built in 1867 leading to the town of nad Jizrou and in opposite direction leading from the Central Station built in 1867 via train stop of Lpa stelnice built in 1869 to the town of Rumburk. Another railway was opened in 1872 to the town of nad Plounic and later prolonged to the city of Dn. Another company then built the downtown station out of which the first train went to the town of Litomice and in 1903 the railway leading from esk Lpa to etenice u Teplic and in opposite direction leading via the town of Zkupy to the city of Liberec. The railway from esk Lpa stelnice to the town of esk Kamenice was completed and opened in 1903 and large railway workshops was constructed in the vicinity of the central station. National corporation of OS (Railway Repair and Engineering Workshops) had its seat here until 1980. The railway leading to Kamenice was canceled over time, in 1979 to be precise, and its subsoil was used for building of a part of the Varhany Cycling Path. Railways in the city and peripherals are connected. The downtown station built in 1898 is out of service now and Czech Railways offer it for sale nowadays. The railway from this station leading to the neighborhood of Vl dl has been canceled and its subsoil used for construction of the cyclying path no. 3054. Three short sidings unused and blocked lead from the central station to several former factory and industrial buildings in Svrov neighborhood.thumb|Main railway stationTherere four directions to which trains are dispatched from the central station.* 080 Bakov  esk Lpa  Rumburk, leads northwards* 081 esk Lpa  Dn, leads westwards* 086 esk Lpa  Liberec, leads southeastwards then northeeastwards* 087 esk Lpa  Lovosice, leads southwardsRailways 081 and 086 are joined by many trains. Ordinary passenger trains use them for routes from Liberec to Dn and express ones from Liberec to nad Labem. Bus Transportation thumb|left|Bus Station Hallregional and intercity transportation, mainly esk Lpa Co., using its bus station from 1986,() provides connection in directions to towns of Mimo, Bor, Praha and connecting the city with surrounding towns and villages. Small transportations companies  (such as Mirobus for instance) provide transport for commuters of local large companies or offer an alternative transportation for Czech Railways in case of lockouts etc. Nevertheless, Municipal transit company of BusLine Co. has taken over most of such services. Municipal Transit Municipal Transit is provided with city buses exclusively (no ligh rail or trolley bus transit). Regional corporation of SAD with its seat in st nad Labem and depot in esk Lpa provided the municipal transit until 1993. Then from 1993 to 2008 the transit was provided by Vett Co. (with a month break in 2007). Another company, Semily Co. became the carrier by February 2008 and city routes was legalized with licenses in April 2008. Several legal actions and complaints were engaged in the legal dispute betweeh the city and Vett Co.() To comply with reginal integrated transport regulations, routes of Ceska Lipa Municipal Transit was renumbered by March 1, 2008 and the transit operation optimized with regular intervals and service interlacing on main routes. After fusion of SAD Semily and SAD Jablonec nad Nisou companies in December 2010 a new company BusLine Co. was established and this one became the new transit carrier in esk Lpa.(BUSportal o znace BusLine).There exists the (esk Lpa Transportation Club), an oranizational constituent of Lpa 2 civic association, which monitors the transit development, negotiates with the city, other authorities as well as carriers, and brings complete information in its website. Road Transportation thumb|Viaduct above Plounice River and the cityThe most important of this kind is a straight superlevel I/9 Road leading south to north from Praha to Bor from 1987.() From west to east theres a II/262 Road from Dn to Zkupy. Therere junctions and pedestrian crossing with streetlights and several roundabouts in the city. Store Network thumb|left|Kaufland HypermarketWhile small shops remained dominant downtown only in the historic core around the main square, branches of international store chains was build in north part of the city (mainly pik neighborhood) such as Interspar, Albert, Penny Market, Lidl, Mountfield. When both market places had been canceled downtown by the city, many stores and shops in the center have been taken over by former stall owners (usually Vietnamese). Kaufland Hypermarket lies near the south bank of Plounice River and Parada Shopping Center in Holy Vrch neighborhood by the II/262 Road in direction to Dn. Two department stores, Andy and Banco are right in the center.thumb|Andy Department Store     Hypermarkets All large stores have their parking lots, some of them under ground level.* Hypernova, luknovsk St., near the road to Bor, renamed to Albert Hypermarket by ervna 2009.* Interspar, Borsk St., the same area* OBI, Borsk St., the same area, together with Interspar* Kaufland, Mimosk St., south bank of Plounice river* Shopping, Dnsk Rd., shopping center Department Stores * Andy, 2906 Erbenova St., independent proprietor* Banco, Dr. E. Bene Sq, opposite to Andy, downtown as wellthumb|left|Penny Market Supermarkets * Spar, Bardjovsk St.* Spar, Dnsk Rd.* Market, itavsk St., pik neighborhood* Mountfield, itavsk St., by Penny Market* Lidl, Purkyova St., near Penny Market Significant Natives and Citizens thumb|110px|J. B. Mikana memorial stone, Prokopa Holho St.* Bohumr Mikan (17431814), physician and professor of botanics and chemistry at Charles Universiti in Prague* Konopeus (1596-1636), monastery school director* Horn (18091891), photography pioneer pulisher of the first magazine about photos* Kutzer (18801965), painter, graphic designer, author and illustrator* Duschek (1884 - 1959), painter and illustrator * Winkler (* 1890), Austrian politicianthumb|110px|Pavel Konopeus memorial stone by the bus station* Panek (1908-1992), chronicler, historian, athletics chairman, teacher* de la Vigne (19202004), German soccer player * Jrschik (* 1935), chief editor, then art director of DEFA * Jursitzka (* 1938), German journalist and writer* Klskov (* 1970), Czech performer of Irish ballads* Kellner (*1964), conterporary billionaire Territorial division of the city thumb|esk Lpa Cadastre DivisionThe city is devided into 14 cadastral territories and 14 parts:* astolovice u esk Lpy, st astolovice, pipojeno 1. ledna 1969, v 90. letech krtce samostatn obec* esk Lpa * Dobranov * Libchava, joined on July 14, 1964 * Dubice u esk Lpy, part Dubice, joined on July 30, 1960; There was also Robe part until 2007, which was canceled administratively.* Hemaniky u Dobranova, part Hemaniky* Lada, joined on June 30, 1960 * Manuice * Okeice u esk Lpy, part Okeice, joined on November 27, 1971 * Psen u Dobranova, part Psen * Lpa, joined on June 30, 1960()* Vtkov u Dobranova, part Vtkov * Dl* iznkov Neighborhoods The inner town of the city is devided into the following neighborhoods as seen in the city map.* Sever* Lada* pik* Svrov* Doln Libchava* Slovanka* Dubice* Star Lpa* Kopeek Administrative Territory thumb|esk Lpa is a district city as well as a municipality with extended poweers and the local authority. esk Lpa District comprises 57 municipalities, esk Lpa Municipality with extended powers consists of 47 municipalities. Sister cities *  Aleksandrov, Russia*  Bardejov, Republic*  Boleslawiec, Poland*  Mittweida, Germany*  Molde, Norway*  Uhorod, Ukraine References  Special reference note Except for one photo and the introductory paragraph this page has been translated from the Wikipedia page of esk Lpa in Czech language. Any copyright is as stated by the author of the original article in Czech language. When referring to Czech language sources, a reader should opt for Czech language as well. References  Literature * * Z minulosti Dnska a eskolipska IV., kolektiv autor, vydalo Severoesk nakl. V st n.L r.1985* *  External Links * Regionln zpravodajsk server zamen na eskolipsko- I noviny* Historie msta- eskolipsk promny v obrzcch* Hudebn Festival Reggae Ethnic Session* Municipal Transit by Transportation ClubLpaLpaLpaLpaLpaLpaLpaLpaLpaLpaLipaLparu:-LpaLpa
2812758
Julia_Creek,_Queensland
Julia Creek is a town in mid northern Queensland, located on the Way, the main road between Isa and Townsville.  It is  west of Townsville, and is located 123 m above sea level.(SMH Travel Guide - Julia Creek, retrieved 9 March 2007)  At the 2006 census, Julia Creek had a population of 368.()HistoryThe town was named after the niece of Donald McIntyre, the first white settler in the area.(Towns - Julia Creek, Cook University, retrieved 9 March 2007)  McIntyre took up a property called Dalgonally about 70 km north of the present site of the town in 1864, only a few years after the ill-fated and Wills expedition passed through the area.  The township began life as a temporary terminus in 1907 when the railway was extended from Richmond to service the copper mines at Cloncurry.A school was established in 1911 with nine students, and was expanded in 1932 and again in 1934.  A separate high school was constructed in 1963.(  A sixteen-bed hospital was established in 1972.(Queensland Health Facility Profile - Julia Creek Hospital, retrieved 9 March 2007.) The town did not receive an electricity supply until 1952.EconomyThe towns main industries are farming, (especially the beef and wool industries), and mining, which is mainly centred around the Billiton mine at nearby Cannington.  The town is a major centre for cattle sales and stock trucking, with a large saleyard and associated facilities.  Prior to the expansion of the railway to the larger towns of Cloncurry and Mount Isa, the town was also a major transport hub for freight and passengers.See also*Creek AirportReferencesExternal links* University of Queensland: Queensland Places: Julia Creek*Fairfax Digital Travel Guide*Bureau of Meteorology Weather Conditions*Tanksinker  The Story of Max Burns and the Township of Julia Creek
2817861
Tin_bounds
Tin bounds were an ancient legal arrangement used in the counties of Devon and Cornwall in South West England to encourage the exploitation of land for the extraction of tin.Tin bounds were created by the miner (or bounder) pitching stones or turves at the four corners of the land he intended to work. The bounder was required to declare his bounds to the Court and to renew them annually by re-pitching the stones or turves. During the early history of mining, the bounder was also required to actually work the land for tin in order for the bounds to remain valid, although this requirement was diluted over time.Tin bounds did not confer any rights of ownership over the land, only protection against others mining for tin in the same plot of land. The arrangement applied only to tin, not to other metals or minerals.The bounder was required to pay the freeholder of the land a portion of the tin extracted. This portion was known as tin.Although tin bounding has never been abolished, the use of tin bounds as the mechanism for permitting and regulating the right to work for tin was later superseded by the use of setts.See alsotin-mining
2821660
Sumpter_Valley_Railway
 originalopen     1890The Sumpter Valley Railway is a heritage railroad located in Baker County, in the state of Oregon. Built on a right-of-way used by the original railway of the same name, it carries excursion trains on a roughly  route between McEwen and Sumpter.() The railroad has two locomotives and several other pieces of rolling stock.( Passenger excursion trains operate on weekends and holidays from Memorial Day through the end of September.()HistoryIncorporated in 1890, the narrow gauge railways initial purpose was to haul logs to a sawmill in South Baker City. The builders of the railway owned the Ronde Lumber Company in Oregon, and the railway was financed by Mormons in Utah.()By 1891, the line had reached McEwen,  west of Baker City, and the railroad began offering passenger and freight service. To reach uncut forests further west, the company extended the line in stages. It reached Sumpter in 1896 and continued southwestward to Whitney, Tipton, Austin and Bates. By 1910, it arrived in Prairie City, a ranching and mining community along the Day River in Grant County.()Ten years later, the railway began losing business to automobiles and trucks, and in 1933 the  of track between Prairie City and Bates were abandoned. Scheduled passenger service on the remaining line ended in 1937. In 1947, the railroad ceased all operations except for  of track in the Lumber Company yard in South Baker City. This last section was abandoned and removed in 1961.(Heritage operationIn 1971, a group of volunteers set out to rebuild the Sumpter Valley Railway. Locomotive No. 3, a 1915 Heisler-type locomotive, was restored to operation in 1976, and the new railway opened for business on July 4, 1976, over a track of less than .( The Sumpter Valley Railroad Restoration Inc. was created and 6 miles of track were reinstalled by hand over the next 15 years, to connect the McEwen, Oregon station with Sumpter, Oregon. SVR No. 19, a type 2-8-2 steam locomotive built in 1920, was restored to operating condition in 1996.(Brown, Greg (July 1996). Excursion, Rail Festival Mark Portlands Union Station Centennial. RailNews, p. 10.)In 2007, the railway opened its reproduction of the original Sumpter Depot, within sight of the Sumpter Valley Dredge State Heritage Area operated by the Parks and Recreation Department. The railway operates a number of historic Sumpter Valley Railroad and adjoining narrow gauge logging railroad steam locomotives and equipment on the line every summer.(In Prairie City at the western end of the original line, the Sumpter Valley Depot Restoration Committee renovated the Valley Railway Passenger Station in the 1970s. The City of Prairie City has used it to house the DeWitt Museum since 1984. Its collections include lanterns, lights, and other railway artifacts, and photographs of train wrecks and of life along the rail line.()GalleryImage:Sumpter Valley Railway railcar - Sumpter Oregon.jpg|Railcar of the Sumpter Valley LineImage:DeWittMuseum.jpg|DeWitt Museum in Prairie City, Oregon, a former SVR passenger stationSee also*of heritage railroads in the United States*of defunct Oregon railroadsReferencesExternal links*Sumpter Valley Railway*Sumpter Valley Railway from Abandoned and Active Historical Railroads of the Pacific Northwest
2829310
Tarcoola_railway_station
Tarcoola is a station on the Railway. It serves the former mining town of Tarcoola in Australia. Since the Australia Railway was rebuilt as gauge in 1980, it has been the site of the junction of the line to Alice Springs and later to Darwin as the railway.The station has two triangles, one for turning locomotives, and a larger one that gives direct access from the Darwin line to the Perth line. References  External links * Photo: Station building ca.1926-1940* Photo: Station building ca.1912
2834003
Boscaswell
Boscaswell is a village in the extreme west of Cornwall in the Kingdom.It lies towards the cliffs looking west from Pendeen. It is a village consisting mostly of granite terraced cottages with a council house estate. Some of the cottages used to house tin mining families who would be working down the Tin Mine. The Ocean is just beyond the cliffs.External linkspl:Boscaswell
2840086
Ted_Ouimet
 career_end  1975Edward John Teddy Ouimet (born July 6, 1947) is a retired Canadian  professional hockey goaltender who played in one Hockey League game for the Louis Blues during the NHL season.Ouimet was a fine junior and minor pro player during a career that lasted over a decade.Born in the Quebec mining town of Rouyn-Noranda, Ouimet played three years with the Junior Canadiens, where he led the Hockey League in shutouts (3) and GAA (2,75) before joining the London Nationals in 1967-68. In June, 1968 he was traded to the St. Louis Blues in a cash deal by the Montreal Canadiens, who had a surplus of talented netminders in their system at the time.Ouimet played one game for the Blues during his rookie season in the pros but spent most of his time with Kansas City of the Hockey League (19631984). He continued to toil in the minors until 1975 and also played one game for the New England Whalers of the Hockey Association. Before retiring after the 1974-75 season, Ouimets best year was in 1973-74 when he recorded a 2.97 goals against average for the Syracuse Blazers and was named to the North American league First All-Star Team.Ted has three sons: Terry Ouimet, Ouimet and Jesse Ouimet.See also*of players who played only one game in the NHLExternal links***
2845924
Black_Elk_Wilderness
The Black Elk Wilderness is located in the state of Dakota. The wilderness was designated by an act of Congress in 1980. Managed by the Forest Service, Black Elk Wilderness is part of Hills National Forest. This 13,426 acre (54 km) region is considered sacred to Native Americans, especially the Sioux and is named after Elk, an Oglala Sioux holy man. Rushmore National Memorial is immediately to the north and much of the rest of the wilderness is bordered by other protected land under the jurisdiction of state and federal agencies.Peak, which at 7,242 feet (2,207 m) is the tallest mountain in South Dakota, is located in the wilderness, and one can see into four different states from the summit. Craggy peaks and rocky slopes mixed with pine, spruce and fir trees make for a varied ecosystem. goats and sheep inhabit the more rugged mountain slopes, while deer, elk and pronghorn are more common in the forested valleys. A sizeable population of hawks and falcons also inhabit the wilderness.Wilderness Areas do not allow motorized or mechanized vehicles, including bicycles. Although camping and fishing are allowed with proper permit, no roads or buildings are constructed and there is also no logging or mining, in compliance with the 1964 Wilderness Act. Wilderness areas within National Forests and of Land Management areas also allow hunting in season.See also* of U.S. Wilderness Areas* ActExternal links* * * 
2850606
Hoist_controller
A hoist controller is the controller for a hoist.  The term is used primarily in the context of electrically operated hoists, but it is apparent that the control systems of many 20th century steam hoists also incorporated controllers of significant complexity.  Consider the system of the Mine No. 2 Hoist.(Quincy No. 2 Mine Hoist (1920) National Historic Engineering Landmark brochure, The American Society of Mechanical Engineers, 1984.) This control system included interlocks to close the throttle valve at the end of trip and to prevent opening the throttle again until the engine was reversed.  The control system also incorporated a governor to control the speed of the hoist and indicator wheels to show the hoist operator the positions of the skips in the shaft.The hoist controllers for modern electric mining hoists have long included such features as automatic starting of the hoist when the weight of coal or ore in the skip reaches a set point, automatic acceleration of the hoist to full speed and automatic deceleration at the end of travel.(H.K. Burch and M.A. Witting, Automatic Operation of Mine Hoists, in Trans. Amer. Inst. of Mining Engineers, Vol. LV, 1016, page 10.)Hoist controllers need both velocity and absolute position references taken, typically taken from the winding drum of the hoist.(A.R. Lilly, Hoist Controller, U.S. Patent 3,110,199 granted Aug. 30, 1960.)  Modern hoist controllers replace many of the mechanical analog mechanisms of earlier controllers with digital control systems. See also * hooklift hoist References 
2855831
Fannie_Ward
thumb|Fannie Ward, 1925Fannie Ward (February 22, 1872  January 27, 1952) was an American actress of stage and screen, known for comedic roles as well as Cheat, a sexuallycharged 1915 silent film directed by B. DeMille. Wards curiously ageless appearance, however, is what drove her celebrity. An obituary described her as an actress who never quite reached the top in her professional ... who tirelessly devoted herself to appearing perpetually youthful, an act that made her famous.(Fannie Ward Dies; Perennial Flapper, The New York Times, 28 January 1952)BackgroundWard was born as Fannie Buchanan in Louis, Missouri, the only daughter of John Buchanan, a dry goods merchant, and his wife, Eliza. She had one sibling, a brother, Benton.(As seen on ancestry.com, the 1880 U. S. Federal Census lists her as Fannie Buchanan, age 7, in the household of Eliza and John Buchanan. Her brother, Benton Buchanan, is also listed.)CareerIn 1890, Ward made her stage debut as Cupid in Pippino with Eddie Foy. She went on to become a successful stage star in New York City. In 1894 she sailed for London and appeared in The Shop Girl, which led critics to compare Ward favorably to actress Adams. In 1898, however, she married a wealthy diamond merchant and retired from the stage. Ward returned to her career in 1905, after her husband suffered business reversals that left him, a news account reported, practically penniless.(Joseph Lewis Left $20,000, The New York Times (9 December 1928)) In 1915, around the time Wards stage career was on the wane, American movie producer and director B. DeMille convinced her to appear in Cheat, a film melodrama which co-starred Japanese actor Hayakawa. The film was a sensation, thanks to its mingling of racial and sexual themes. Ward portrayed a society woman who embezzles money and turns to an Asian ivory dealer (Hayakawa) for help, with brutal consequences.(Kathryn Shattuck, Whats On Today, The New York Times (14 November 2008)) The movie launched the careers of both DeMille and Hayakawa, who became Hollywoods first Asian star.(Sessue Hayakawa Is Dead at 83, The New York Times (25 November 1973))In addition to starring in The Hardest Way (1921), Ward appeared in a Phonofilm film singing Father Time (1924), a second Phonofilm as The Perennial Flapper (1924), and in a Vitaphone short Fannie Ward in The Miracle Woman (1929).In 1926, trading on her ever-youthful public image, Ward opened a Paris beauty shop, The Fountain of Youth.MarriagesFannie Ward was married twice:*Joseph Lewis (died 1928), a British money lender; they married in 1898 and divorced 14 January 1913.*John Wooster Dean (n John H. Donovan, 18741950), an actor who frequently co-starred with Ward on stage and in films. They married in 1914.Wards only child, Doroth Mabel Lewis (19001938), was the result of a liaison between Ward and Vane-Tempest-Stewart, 7th Marquess of Londonderry. Her first husband was Capt. Jack Barnato (18941918), a pilot and nephew of mining magnate Barnato; he died of pneumonia in 1918, shortly after their marriage. Her second husband, married in 1922, was Terence Conyngham Plunket, 6th Baron Plunket (18991938), and they were the parents of Plunket, 7th Baron Plunket, Rathmore Plunket, 8th Baron Plunket, and present presumptive, Hon. Plunket. After Lord and Lady Plunket were killed in an airplane crash in California on February 24, 1938, Wards grandsons were raised by their fathers sister Helen Rhodes.DeathOn January 25, 1952, Ward was found unconscious in her Park Avenue apartment following a stroke. She never regained consciousness and died two days later. She was 79 years old.Filmography* Fannie Ward in The Miracle Woman (1929) Ward stars in a Vitaphone short film* Fannie Ward as The Perennial Flapper (1924) Ward performs comedy sketch as the perennial flapper in a DeForest Phonofilm film* Fannie Ward Sings Father Time (1924) in a Phonofilm short film* La Rafale (1920) * Le Secret du Lone Star (1920) * Our Better Selves (1919) .... Loyette Merval * The Profiteers (1919) .... Beverly Randall * The Cry of the Weak (1919) .... Mary Dexter * Common Clay (1919) .... Ellen Neal * The Only Way (1919) * The Narrow Path (1918) .... Marion Clark * A Japanese Nightingale (1918) .... Yuki * The Yellow Ticket (1918) .... Anna Mirrel * Innocent (1918) .... Innocent * On the Level (1917) .... Merlin Warner, aka Mexicali May * The Crystal Gazer (1917) .... Rose Jorgensen/Rose Keith/Norma Dugan * Her Strange Wedding (1917) .... Coralie Grayson * Unconquered (1917) .... Mrs. Jackson * A School for Husbands (1917) .... Lady Betty Manners * The Winning of Sally Temple (1917) .... Sally Temple * Betty to the Rescue (1917) * The Years of the Locust (1916) .... Lorraine Roth * Witchcraft (1916) .... Suzette * Each Pearl a Tear (1916) .... Diane Winston, aka Each Hour a Pearl (USA: alternative title), Every Pearl a Tear * A Gutter Magdalene (1916) .... Maida Carrington * For the Defense (1916) .... Fidele Roget * Tennessees Pardner (1916) .... Tennessee * Cheat (1915) .... Edith Hardy * The Marriage of Kitty (1915) .... Katherine Kitty SilvertonReferences(External links* Fannie Ward at Silents Are Golden* Fannie Ward at Internet Movie Database* Fannie Ward at Silent Ladies & Gents* Fannie Ward her stage years portrait gallery at NY Public Library Billy Rose collection*rare  portrait of Fannie Ward Ward
2860171
Freeman_Junction,_California
Freeman Junction, a town in County, California, USA, was first homesteaded in the 1920s by Clare C. Miley, who was born in 1900. By the 1930s a restaurant, gas station and mining activities dominated the site.Image:Freeman_junction.jpg |thumb|Overlooking the area where Freeman Junction once stood. The town of CA is visible in the background.By June 1976 the town had died and the remains of the town have been removed by passersby.thumb|Jet circling near Freeman JunctionIn 1834 explorer R. Walker passed this junction of Indian trails after discovering nearby Pass. Valley 49er parties here diverged west and south after their escape from Death Valley en route to the California gold fields. Later this became a junction point where the bandit Vasquez preyed on stages and freighters traveling between the River mines and Angeles and the mines of Bodie and the Panamints.Historical Landmark #766See also* of California Historical Landmarks* of ghost towns in CaliforniaExternal links*California Ghost Towns
2861703
Kazakhmys
 footnotes   Kazakhmys Plc (, , ) is a UK-registered copper mining company whose main assets are located in Kazakhstan. Its headquarters are in London, United Kingdom.  The headquarters of its main subsidiary, Kazakhmys Corporation, are located in the city of Karaganda, Kazakhstan. It is listed on the Stock Exchange and is a constituent of the 100 Index, also it is secondarily listed in Kong in June 2011.()Image:Cardinalplace.jpg|thumb|left|250px|100 Victoria Street, Place. Kazakhmys Headquarters in London, UKHistoryThe companys origins date back to 1930 when operations began at the Balkhash copper smelting complex in Kazakhstan. The company operates 16 open pit and underground mines along with two smelting and refining plants in the Republic of Kazakhstan.(Kazakhmys History)(Kazakhmys profile and review) The Company was first listed on the Stock Exchange in October 2005 with an opening capitalisation of 2.6 billion, making a billionaire of its main shareholder, Kim.( In 2008 the Company increased its holding in Natural Resources Corporation to 22%.(Kazakhmys not planning takeover of Eurasian International Business Times, June 2008)Image:Jezkazgan_05.JPG|thumb|left|250px|Kazakhmys Headquarters in Zhezkazgan, KazakhstanOperationsThe main operations are in Kazakhstan but the Company has a German subsidiary called Mansfelder Kupfer & Messing (MKM), a semi-product producer of long standing.(Troubled Company Reporter)Senior managementReferencesExternal links*Official site*MKMs official sitede:Kazakhmysfr:Kazakhmyskk:ru:uk:zh:
2866949
Panamint_City,_California
frame|right|Panamint Cityof Panamint (official name) or Panamint City and Panamint Springsfootnotes               Panamint City is a town in the Range, near Valley, in County, California, USA.  It is also known by the official Board of Geographic Names identity, Panamint. (Panamint, California, 7.5-minute quadrangle, US Geological Survey, 1988 and National Geographic Names Database, US Geological Survey.)  Panamint was a boom town founded after silver and copper were found there in 1872.() By 1874, the town had a population of about 2,000.( Its main street was one mile (1.6 km) long.( Panamint had its own newspaper, the Panamint News. Silver was the principal product mined in the area. The town is located about three miles northwest of Peak.  According to the National Geographic Names Database, NAD27 latitude and longitude for the locale are  and the feature ID number is 1661185. The elevation of this location is identified as being 6,280 feet AMSL. The similar-sounding Springs, California, is located about 25.8 miles at 306.4 degrees off true north near Panamint Junction. (Panamint Springs, California, 7.5-minute quadrangle, US Geological Survey, (1986), Panamint, California, 7.5-minute quadrangle, US Geological Survey, (1988) and National Geographic Names Database, US Geological Survey, March, 1998.)HistoryPanamint City is the site of the largest and most elaborate group of Painted Style pictographs. The presence of these pictographs indicates that Canyon was inhabited by Shoshone and/or Kawaiisu not long before the town was founded. ()Silver was discovered by William L. Kennedy, Robert L. Stewart, and Richard C. Jacobs, bandits who were using Surprise Canyon as a hideout. E. P. Raines, an early investor in Panamint mining, convinced a group of Los Angeles businessmen to build a wagon road and then moved on to San Francisco, where he met Nevada Senator P. Jones. Jones and the other Nevada Senator, M. Stewart, created the Mining Company and bought up the larger mines. The two were quite famous for their heavy involvement in silver mining in Nevada, and their interest in Panamint started the boom.Founded in 1873-74, the town grew to include many mills, saloons, stores, a red light district, a cemetery&mdash;all built along the uppermost end of Surprise Canyon. Panamint City was regarded as a bad and wicked town, with Death Valley at one end of town and the Panamint Range at the other end. Because of Panamint Citys lawless reputation, Wells Fargo refused to open an office there. The senators solved the question of how to transport the silver bullion from the mines by casting it into 450-pound cannonballs, which were hauled to Los Angeles in an unguarded wagon.() On July 24, 1876, a flash flood roared down the canyon and washed out most of the town. The County of Inyo maintained a graded road to Panamint City until about 1983, when a terrific series of cloudbursts completely washed the canyon out to bedrock.()  This road permitted large vehicles such as house trailers and trucks with mining equipment to access Panamint City (some of these vehicles are abandoned there).  A post office operated at Panamint from 1874 to 1877, from 1882 to 1883, and from 1887 to 1895.(Panamint City and much of Surprise Canyon were added to Valley National Park in 1994.  Today, Panamint City is accessible only by a 7.5 mile hike, strenuous for even experienced hikers.Nearby features* Sentinel Peak is plotted on the 1988, Panamint, California topographic map at NAD83 latitude and longitude .* Thompson Camp is plotted near NAD83 latitude and longitude  on the 1988, Panamint, California topographic map.* Hemlock Mine is plotted on the 1988, Panamint, California topographic map at NAD83 latitude and longitude . (Panamint, California, 7.5-minute quadrangle, US Geological Survey, 1988)See also* of ghost towns in CaliforniaNotes(External links*National Park Service*Panamint City/Surprise Canyon/Sentinel Peak Information at blackturtle.us*Panamint City site by Death Valley explorer Steve Hall*GhostTowns.com*Historical Society of the Upper Mojave Desert newsletter containing excerpts from the Panamint NewsCity (Californie)City
2872362
Grayson_Murphy
Colonel Grayson M.-P. Murphy (Grayson Mallet-Prevost Murphy) (1878-1937) was an American private banker and a  director of Anaconda Copper Mining Company, Guaranty Trust Company, New York Trust Company, Steel, Tire & Rubber, York Railways, Fifth Avenue Coach Co., and  Chicago Motor Coach Co.  Mr. Murphy was very active in the Against the Prohibition Amendment and voiced his opposition to the 18th Amendment at a Congressional hearing. His efforts contributed to the of prohibition in the United States.He had previously attended College and was a volunteer in the War.  He also attended the States Military Academy and was a lieutenant in the War. At various other times he was a Senior Vice-President of Guaranty Trust Company,  Chief Commissioner of the Red Cross in Europe, and  Lieutenant-Colonel in charge of operations, 42nd Division. He was also Founder and Head of G.M.-P. Murphy & Co., Treasurer of the Liberty League and a recipient of the Distinguished Service Medal, as authorized by Congress on July 9, 1918.ReferencesPrimary sources
2876140
Brian_Menell
Brian Menell (born August, 1965) is a African businessman with interests in mining, oil, gas, metals, diamonds, infrastructure and wine.(African Rainbow Minerals: Significant New Investment In Anglovaal Mining Limited)Early lifeBrian Menells grandfather, Slip Menell, was the co-founder in 1932 of the Anglovaal Group, one of South Africas largest diversified mining and industrial groups of companies.(New York Times: Clive S. Menell, 65, Mining Executive In South Africa)Brian is the son of the noted philanthropist and businessman, Clive Menell, who died in 1996. Brian Menell and his brother Rick retained control of Anglovaal Mining until its sale in 2001 to create the largest South African empowerment controlled company, Rainbow Minerals.(AVI Ltd. History)Business careerBrian Menell serves as a Director of Kemet Global Ltd., Shore Gold Inc., Glendirk Estate, PTY Ltd., Armstrong Financial Inc. and TINCO Ltd.He was previously a partner in control and Director of Anglovaal Mining (Pty) Ltd., a Director of Anglovaal Holdings (Pty) Ltd. and of Anglovaal Industries (Pty) Ltd., with extensive metal, metal, metal and diamond interests across Africa. Prior to joining his family controlled Anglovaal Group, he worked for the Beers Group in London, Antwerp and Windhoek. He is also a former Chairman of Energem Resources Inc. and a former Chairman of First Africa Oil Plc.(Financial Times: Business Profile)AnglovaalThe Anglovaal Group was a diversified South African Mining House. Interests were held through Anglovaal Industries Pty Ltd. (cement, construction, steel, processing, car tyres, electronics and services), and through Anglovaal Mining Pty Ltd (gold, platinum, copper, manganese, iron ore, nickel and diamonds). The Group was listed in Johannesburg and London but controlled by the founding families. At its peak the Group employed some 85,000 people and had a market capital of +/- $2.5bn.(Business Week: Business Profile)In 1999 the industrial interests were unbundled (as AVI and AVENG) with Brian and Rick Menell retaining control of the mining interests (AVMIN) with the subsequent sale of their controlling interest in 2001 to Anglo American Plc.(http://www.angloamerican.com/aal/media/releases/2002pr/2002-03-12/)As an Director of AVMIN, Brian Menell managed the sale to DeBeers of Anglovaals 50% interest in the Venetia mine (South Africas largest diamond mine) for $600m. This remains DeBeers biggest ever corporate acquisition. Brian also lead the hostile bid for ISCOR (the former South African State Steel, Iron Ore and Coal company) in partnership with the parastatal investment company, IDC. This lead in 2006 to the break-up of ISCOR and to the creation of Kumba, Exxaro and Mital Iscor Steel.(http://www.kumba.co.za/au_history.php)A1 Grand PrixIn 2004, Brian Menell was involved in the initial set up of the Grand Prix auto racing series, which was billed as the world cup of sports. He discontinued all direct involvement with A1 Grand Prix in 2007.(South Africa: A1 Grand Prix: SA Sar Unveiled)Grand Prix (A1GP) was a single make open-wheel auto racing series. It was unique in its field in that competitors solely represented their nation as opposed to themselves or a team, the usual format in most formula racing series. As such, it was often promoted as the World Cup of Motorsport.The series was ratified by the Internationale de lAutomobile (FIA) and races were held in the traditional One off-season, the northern hemisphere winter.(A1 GP: About)The nation-based A1GP concept was founded by Maktoum Hasher Maktoum Al Maktoum of Dubai, initially in 2003.(A1GP: History)After a successful first season of A1GP, it was announced on 29 September 2006 that Maktoum was to sell his position as Chairman & Director of A1GP.(A1GP: News)The transfer of his share in the organisation of Grand Prix to RAB Capital was finalised in December 2006. The series completed four seasons and attracted large audiences, particularly in emerging markets. Some twenty-three national teams raced in eleven countries. There are currently plans for the next A1 Grand Prix to take place in the 2011-2012 season.(Auto Sport: A1GP Could Be Resurrected)When the venture launched, it attracted positive attention, most notably from Mandela who received Menell and his two guests, Ronaldo and Figo, at his home. Mandela expressed his pride at South Africas progress since the end of the Apartheid and he also claimed his support for African entry into the A1 Grand Prix.(IOL: Ronaldo And Figo Score Their Biggest Goal)(Oz Honda: F1 Silly Season Thread)Mandela also offered the Grand Prix and Brian Menell his blessing and lent his support for the concept of a African driver and team able to compete equally against other nations.(GP Grid: A1 Grand Prix Brings Four Countries Together Under Nelson Mandella)The Menell familys connections to Mandela extend further than his endorsement of the Grand Prix. Clive Menell was the founding Deputy Chairman of the Mandela Childrens Fund and his widow, Irene Menell, sits on the boards of the Nelson Mandela Childrens Fund, the Nelson Mandela Foundation and the READ Educational Trust.(Help Your Neighbour: Recession May Alter Priorities, But Real Philanthropists Still Give Freely)ReferencesExternal linkshttp://www.brianmenellgroup.orghttp://za.linkedin.com/in/brianmenell
2881918
Joint_Sitting_of_the_Australian_Parliament_of_1974
A joint sitting of the Australian parliament was convened in 1974, in which members of the Senate and House of Representatives sat together as a single legislative body. The joint sitting was held on 6 and 7 August 1974, following the double dissolution 1974 federal election, and remains the only time that members of both houses of the federal parliament have sat together as a single legislative body pursuant to section 57 of the Constitution.This sitting deliberated and voted upon the following bills:*Commonwealth Electoral Bill (No. 2) 1973, which sought to make Commonwealth electorates more even in size by reducing the allowable quota variation from 20 per cent to 10 per cent*Senate (Representation of Territories) Bill 1973, which gave the Capital Territory and the Territory two senators each*Representation Bill 1973, which stated that neither the people of the territories nor the territory senators could be included in the formula for determining the number of House seats for each state*Health Insurance Bill 1973, which was the main bill that established Medibank (now known as Medicare)*Health Insurance Commission Bill 1973, which established the Medibank administrative agency the Health Insurance Commission (now known as Australia)*Petroleum and Minerals Authority Bill 1973, which was included despite some uncertainty as to whether the provisions of s.57 had been met. This established a statutory body to control the exploration for, and development of, petroleum and mining resourcesAll six bills were affirmed by an absolute majority of the total number of members and senators, a requirement under the Constitution for the bills to pass. All proceedings of the joint sitting were broadcast by the Australian Broadcasting Commission and a complete sound record was made for archival purposes. This would be the first Australian television coverage of parliamentary debates.(Odgers Australian Senate Practice, chapter 21) It was also the first Australian television broadcast in colour, even though colour television was not generally introduced until March 1975.Political backgroundIn early 1974, the conservative parties led by Snedden had chosen to use their majority in the Senate to oppose key government legislation. As the Senate had rejected the bills twice, the Prime Minister was entitled to request a dissolution under section 57 of the Constitution. Prime Minister Whitlam did so, the Governor-General Sir Hasluck agreed, and on 18 May an election for both houses of parliament was held.Campaigning for the Labor Party, Whitlam asked the electorate to let him finish the job and used the slogan Give Gough a Go. The Liberal and Country parties focused their campaign on government mismanagement and the state of the economy. The Labor Party was returned with a slightly reduced majority in the House of Representatives and, crucially, still without the Senate majority it required to pass the legislation in question.The new parliament convened on 9 July.  On 11 July, Sir Paul Haslucks term as Governor-General ended, and Sir John Kerr was sworn in.  The legislation was reintroduced, but, as expected, it again failed to pass the Senate.  Now, all the constitutional requirements for a joint sitting had been met.  At Whitlams request, on 30 July Sir John Kerr issued a proclamation convening the joint sitting.The coalition parties sought to prevent the joint sitting by challenging its constitutional validity in the High Court. The writs were issued by Senator Sir Magnus Cormack (Lib) and Senator Jim Webster (CP) on 1 August. The Queensland government also brought an action although it sought a narrower declaration. The court delivered a unanimous decision on 5 August (Cormack v Cope (1974) 131 CLR 432) and ruled that the sitting was constitutionally valid.The sittingright|300px|thumb|All 187 federal MPs at the 1974 joint sittingThe joint sitting of all 187 members of Parliament (127 from the lower house and 60 from the upper house) was held over two days on 6 and 7 August 1974. The House of Representatives chamber was chosen as the venue for the sitting, and the event was covered by both radio and television. As well as the lower house holding a bigger seating capacity than the Senate, Whitlam said it was the peoples House, the House where alone governments are made and unmade.(Opening Speech At The Joint Sitting Of Parliament)Speaker Cope (ALP) assumed the chair; his had been the only nomination. Whitlam further commented that at long last, after sustained stonewalling and filibustering, the parliament can proceed to enact these essential parts of the governments program. Snedden, on the other hand, was more cynical, stating this is indeed an historic occasion. So many people have described it as such that one is convinced it must be.Given the importance of the occasion, both sides of politics showed behaviour and restraint. The Coalition continued to oppose the legislation but the Labor majority in the House was such that it had an overall majority in the Parliament, and all the legislation was able to pass easily. A vote of 94 was required, so that if at least 94 of the 95 Labor parliamentarians supported the bills, each would be passed.Special rules were drafted for the conduct of business. These included the hours of sittings, a 20-minute limit on speeches, and a requirement that there be at least 4 hours of debate (or 12 speakers) before debate on any bill could be ended.For the most part, the proceedings moved smoothly. The health insurance bills were both passed on party lines, 95 to 92, and the Petroleum and Minerals Authority legislation also passed on party lines, though with one Liberal Party member absent. Liberal Movement Senator Hall supported the three electoral Bills, citing his experience as Liberal Premier of South Australia, where he had fought his own party to improve unequal electoral arrangements known as the Playmander. Northern Territory Country Party member Calder supported the Territory Senators legislation, though he opposed the ACT being given added representation.The proceedings concluded at 11 p.m. on 7 August, to mixed reviews. Labor saw it as an historic event; their opponents saw it as a waste of time. On 8 August 1974, the Governor-General gave Assent to all the bills.The only parliamentarian who took part in the Joint Sitting who is still serving today is the Father of the House and of the Parliament, Ruddock, who had been elected to the House of Representatives in 1973.Subsequent legal challengeThirteen months later, four state litigants, Victoria(Victoria v. The Commonwealth and Connor (1975) 134 CLR 81), New South Wales(New South Wales v. The Commonwealth (1975) 135 CLR 337), Queensland(Queensland v. The Commonwealth (1975) 134 CLR 201) and Western Australia(Western Australia v. The Commonwealth (1975) 134 CLR 201) took legal action against the Minister for Minerals and Energy Connor and the Commonwealth Government, and successfully overturned the Petroleum and Minerals Authority Act 1973 on the grounds that correct constitutional procedure had not been followed: it had not been one of the proposed laws in dispute when the double dissolution was called and could not therefore be voted on by the joint session. Although the law remains on the statute books as No. 74 of 1973, it was invalidated by the ruling of the High Court.ReferencesBibliography*The 1974 joint sitting of Parliament: Parliamentary Library
2884358
Battle_of_Messines
 campaignbox  The Battle of Messines was a battle of the western front of the World War. It began on 7 June 1917 when the British Second Army under the command of General Herbert Plumer launched an offensive near the village of Mesen (Messines) in Flanders, Belgium. The target of the offensive was a ridge running north from Messines village past Wytschaete village which created a natural stronghold southeast of Ypres. One of the key features of the battle was the detonation of 19 mines immediately prior to the infantry assault, a tactic which disrupted German defences and allowed the advancing troops to secure their objectives in rapid fashion. The attack was also a prelude to the much larger Third Battle of Ypres, known as Passchendaele, which began on 11 July 1917.BackgroundThe assault on Messines ridge was conceived in early 1916, as Plumer sought ways to break German control of important strategic locations in the Ypres area.(Mallett, 115) When it became apparent that the French offensive on the River Aisne would not succeed, General Douglas Haig reconceived the Messines operation as a precursor to a larger assault in the Ypres sector and ordered Plumer to proceed with the attack as soon as possible.( Not only would capturing Messines Ridge give the British control of important strategic ground, it would also flatten out the southern flank of the Salient.(Wolff, p. 87) This would both reduce the manpower needed to maintain the front, and  reduce the German strategic and tactical advantages in the area.(Australian Government Official History, 588)Mining operationsCo-ordinated by the companies of the Royal Engineers, over a period beginning more than a year before the attack, Canadian, Australian, New Zealand and British engineers tunnelled under the German  trenches and laid 22 mines totaling 455 tonnes of ammonal explosive.(  Several compliments were given to the military geologists who planned the tunnels. It was said that one reason for the great success of the British operations at Messines ridge, where fifty or more mines were exploded, was the skill of the geologist who planned their location; for in some cases they were so surrounded by quicksands that the Germans could not countermine.  I cannot vouch for the truthfulness of this, but, knowing the men concerned, I believe it.(Cleland, Herdman F. 1918. The Geologist in War Time: Geology on the Western Front. Economic Geology.  Volume 13, pp. 1456.)  After the war, an examination of the lessons learned in military geology to reorganize the German Army also reviewed this incident: Starting early in 1916 the British conducted a most extensive and persistent mining offensive against the Wytschaete Salient. After March 1916, they had the advice of two military geologists in this undertaking; sub-surface conditions here were especially complex: several different Tertiary and Quaternary formations with separate ground water tables made mining most troublesome, but the advice of the British geologists helped to overcome many technical difficulties. Starting from a long distance away, their sappers drifted galleries several hundred metres long (5454 m altogether) to points deep underneath the German front lines; moreover, they diverted the attention of German sappers from their deepest attack galleries by making countless secondary attacks using the upper mine galleries. Thus the military geologists on the British side proved themselves to be indispensible and extremely valuable.(Blow, Kurd von, 1899, Kranz, Walter, 1873, Sonne, Erich, Burre, Otto, Dienemann, Wilhelm. 1938. Wehrgeologie.  English translation, pp. 1034.  USGS Library.)  To solve the problem of wet soil, the tunnels were made in the layer of blue clay, 80120 feet (2530 m) below the surface.(Wolff, p. 88.)  The galleries dug in order to lay these mines totalled over 8,000 metres in length, and had been constructed in the face of tenacious German counter-mining efforts.(Liddell Hart, p. 331.)  On several occasions, German tunnellers were within metres of large British mine chambers.  One mine was found by the Germans, and the chamber was wrecked by a countermine.(Wolff, p. 92)The largest of the 22 Messines mines was at Spanbroekmolen; the Lone Tree Crater formed by the blast was approximately 250 feet (80 m) in diameter, and 40 feet (12 m) deep.( The mine consisted of 41 tons of ammonal explosive, located in a chamber dug 88 feet (27 m) below ground.(Mallett, p. 116.)The evening before the attack, General Plumer remarked to his staff, Gentlemen, we may not make history tomorrow, but we shall certainly change the geography.(.)Opposing forcesOn the British side, the assault was conducted entirely by the three corps of Plumers British Second Army.(  On the northern edge of the sector was the British X Corpsunder the command of Morlandcomprising the 23rd, 47th and 41st Divisions.(Wolff, p. 98) In the centre was the British IX Corpscommanded by Alexander Hamilton-Gordonconsisting of the 19th British, 16th Irish and 36th Ulster Divisions.(  To the southeast, Godley commanded the Anzac Corpscomposed of the 25th British, 1st New Zealand and 3rd Australian Divisions.(  Each of these corps held a fourth division in reservethe 24th for the X, the 11th for the IX, and the 4th Australian for the II Anzacfor use in follow-up attacks.(Opposing Plumers Second Army were forces of the Fourth Army, under the command of Bertram Sixt von Armin.(  To the northeast, the 204th and 35th divisions defended Hill 60 and Battle Wood.(  In the centre, the 2nd Division and 3rd Bavarian Division defended Messines and Wytschaete.(  In the southeast, the southern banks of the River Douve were defended by the 4th Bavarian Division.(  The German defenses relied on an elastic defense method; the front-lines were lightly defended, with heavier defensive bunkers up to half a mile behind the front lines.(BattleThe operation plan for the attack on Messines Ridge called for heavy artillery strikes before zero hour.  At 03:00am, the mines would be detonated; followed by a frontal assault of nine infantry divisions aimed at securing the ridge.(Hart, p. 332)  In the week before the attack began, some 2,200 artillery guns bombarded the German trenches with an estimated 34 million shells.(Groom, p. 165)  Equipped with up-to-date and intricate maps of the battlefield, British artillery succeeded in destroying close to 90% of the German field-gun positions on Messines Ridge.(Detonation of the minesAt 02:50am on 7 June, the artillery bombardment ceased. Expecting an immediate infantry assault, German defenders returned to their forward positions.( At 3:10am, the mines were detonated, killing approximately 10,000 German soldiers and destroying most of the fortifications on the ridge, as well as the town of Messines itself.(Battle of Messines on First World War.com) Reports were made that the shockwave from the explosion was heard as far away as London and Dublin.(Groom, p. 167) To make matters worse for the Germans, the explosions occurred while the front line troops were being relieved, meaning both groups (relieving and relieved) were caught in the blasts.(While determining the actual power of explosions is difficult, the 1917 Messines mines detonation was probably the largest planned explosion in history prior to the Trinity weapon test in July 1945, and the largest non-nuclear planned explosion in history prior to the British explosive efforts on the Heligoland Islands in April 1947.  With approximately 10,000 killed, the Messines detonation is historys deadliest non-nuclear man-made explosion of any kind (planned or accidental).Artillery planArtillery fire resumed at the same moment as the explosion of the mines. The fireplan called for most of the 18-pounder field guns to fire a creeping barrage of shrapnel immediately ahead of the advance, while the other field guns and 4.5 inch howitzers fired a standing barrage some  further ahead. The standing barrage was aligned with known German positions, and lifted to the next target when the advance reached within  of it. As each objective was taken by the infantry, the creeping barrage would pause  ahead of them and become a standing barrage, protecting the newly gained positions from counterattack while the infantry consolidated. During this time the pace of fire slackened to one round per gun a minute, enabling the guns and the crews a respite, before resuming full intensity as the barrage moved on. The heavy and super-heavy artillery fired on German rear areas, and over 700 machine guns participated in the barrage plan, firing over the heads of the advancing troops.(Steel & Hart pp 45 & 54)AssaultImmediately after the mine explosions  and closely following the creeping artillery barrage, British, Australian and New Zealand troops from the II ANZAC Corps, IX Corps and X Corps advanced on the Messines salient from three sides.(Liddell Hart, p. 334.) The front lines were overrun without opposition.  German troops surrendered in droves,(Wolff, p. 101) and the first series of objectives had been secured almost entirely within three hours.( Advancing on the southern flank, the Zealand Division captured the village of Messines proper, despite intricate layers of fortifications beyond the front line.( File:Irish Peace Park, Messines 1917 Battle plaque.jpg|thumb|120px|left|Bronze plaque overview of the  of Messines assault on 7 June 1917In the centre section,  to the north, the (Ulster) Division and 16th (Irish) Division advanced in tandem, the Irish capturing the village of Wytschaete and pushing forward to secure their objectives.( Many considered this joint effort to be of considerable political significance, given the turmoil in Ireland at the time.( The Irish Nationalist Party MP Major William Redmond was fatally wounded in this action.(Casualty details from the War Graves Commission) The most serious resistance was in the northern sector, where the (1/2nd London) Division had to navigate across the canal. This obstacle slowed the advance considerably, but the Londoners had secured all their objectives by mid-morning, and the goals of the first phase were achieved by 10:00am at all points on the line of attack.(Once the first series of objectives was secured, more than forty batteries of artillery were brought forward to support the second phase of the attack.( Bombardment continued for several hours, and at approximately 3:00pm the reserve divisions, supported by tanks, advanced towards the second line of objectives.( In just over an hour, all these were secured.(  At 11:00AM, German troops counterattacked at several points along the new British lines. Although British troops had had very little time to consolidate their positions, the German attacks were easily repulsed and ultimately resulted in further territorial gains.(Liddell Hart, p. 336.)  Heavy British artillery strikes on 10 June meant that further counterattacksalready being planned and prepared by German commandersnever materialized.(There were four Crosses awarded during the battle, two in the Australian 3rd Division (to Private John Carroll and Captain Cuthbert Grieve), one in the Zealand Division (to Lance-Corporal Frickleton) and one in the 25th Division (to Private Ratcliffe).AftermathFile:John Carroll portrait.jpg|thumb|right|Australian Cross recipient, Private John CarrollThe operation was almost totally successful. Meticulously planned, and well executed, the assault secured all its objectives in less than twelve hours, took more than 7,000 prisoners,(Wolff, p. 102) and suffered a relatively modest (by WWI standards) 19,000 total casualties.( The combination of tactics proven in other sectorsnotably the use of mines, creeping barrages, and small-unit tacticsallowed for almost complete surprise and rapid advances.(Groom, p. 169) The offensive also secured the southern end of the Ypres salient in preparation for the subsequent offensive in that area.(Wolff, p. 103)Although the operation was successful, it had the effect of over-inflating expectations for the Passchendaele offensive. While Messines led Haig and other British commanders to believe that success could be had relatively cheaply in the main offensive as well, the circumstances of the operations were substantially different, and attempts to apply similar tactics would result in a general failure.(Liddell Hart, 339340.)Not all of the mines that had been laid were detonated; two of the original 21 mines were not ignited.( On 17 July 1955, a lightning strike set off one of the remaining mines; there were no human casualties, but a cow was killed. The 21st minethe mine abandoned as a result of its discovery by German counter-minersis believed to have been found, but no attempt has been made to remove it.(See also* Front (World War I)* Battle of Ypres* Skirth, British pacifist artilleryman, vowed not to take another human life after the Battle of MessinesNotesReferences* Burke, Tom, MBE; A Guide to the Battlefield of Wijtschate: June 1917, The Royal Dublin Fusiliers Association (pub June 2007); ISBN 0-9550418-1-3* Groom, Winston (2002). A Storm in Flanders, the Ypres Salient, 19141918. Atlantic Monthly Press. ISBN 0-87113-842-5* Keegan, John; The First World War New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1999* Liddell Hart, B.H. The Real War 19141918. Boston: Little, Brown and Company, 1930* * Stokesbury, James L; A short history of World War I. New York: Perennial, 1981* Strachan, Hew; The First World War. New York: Viking, 2003* Wolff, Leon; In Flanders Fields, Passchendaele 1917.Further reading* Bean, C.E.W.; The Battle of Messines, Chapter 15 in The Official History of Australia in the War of 19141918, Vol IV, The AIF in France: 1917, 1941.* Passingham, Ian; Pillars of Fire: the Battle of Messines Ridge, June 1917, 1998.* Stewart, H; The Battle of Messines, Chapter V in The New Zealand Division 19161919: A Popular History based on Official Records, 1921.External links* No Mans Land The European Group for Great War Archaeology, Plug Street Project : Report on Archaeological Excavations in St Yvon area. 2007* The Plugstreet Archaeology Project  http://www.plugstreet-archaeology.com* The Battle for Messines Ridge* First World War.com - A more detailed overview of the battle with links to present day pictures of the battlefield* An account of the experiences of an ordinary soldier at Messines ridge, as recounted in his letters home* Battle for Messines (NZHistory.net.nz) includes film and interactive showing the creeping barrage* Farmer who is sitting on a bomb - Daily Telegraph* WWI underground: Unearthing the hidden tunnel war BBC News (10 June 2011)de Messinesvon Messinesde Messinesde Messines (1917)Messinesdi Messinesslag om Mesenved Messinesved Messinesde Messinestaisteluom MessinesTwidde slag om Mesn
2888411
Greenwith,_South_Australia
Greenwith is an outer-north-eastern suburb of Adelaide, the capital city of Australia, and is within the of Tea Tree Gully local government area. It is adjacent to Golden Grove and Salisbury Heights. Greenwith is the northernmost part of the Golden Grove urban land development.HistoryGreenwith was named by Thomas Roberts in 1846, who had been engaged by the South Australian Mining Association to open up mineral sections along the Torrens. He named his property Greenwith Farm after the mine at which he worked near Truro, Cornwall. The property was later owned by John Garfield Tilley. Greenwith Cottage is still open today as a historical site.(Local History - Greenwith, City of Tea Tree Gully Library)In 1973 the Australian Land Commission started to acquire land in the Golden Grove area for housing. In 1983 the Australian Urban Land Trust contracted Delfin to develop the land. Construction started in 1985.GeographyThe boundary of Greenwith is defined by Slate and Cobbler Creeks in the south, Green Valley Drive in the west, Golden Grove and Para Roads in the east, and the Para River catchment area in the north. From Greenwith there is easy access to the Hills and Valley wine region via One Tree Hill or Upper Hermitage. (UBD Adelaide directory (1999; 47th ed.) Universal Press. ISBN 0-7319-1033-8)At the ABS 2001 census, Golden Grove had a population of 8,287 people living in 3,071 dwellings.FacilitiesGreenwith has two primary schools, Greenwith Primary School and Our Lady of Hope School, on a combined campus.Greenwith is hilly with numerous park areas, most with childrens playgrounds and several with lakes, creeks, or scenic walking trails, including the Wirra Recreation Park and Creek Recreation Park. Many of the lakes are suitable for fishing, and it is not openly discouraged by the local authorities. The lakes in particular have carp and guppies, and the rare yabbie or two.Greenwith has a community centre and small shopping village, and is close to Golden Grove Village Shopping Centre and Golden Grove Recreation and Arts Centre. A dirt bike track nearby is used by local children and teenagers.TransportGreenwith is connected to the Adelaide CBD by Metro bus route J2 (operated by Torrens Transit) via Golden Grove Village, Tree Plaza Interchange in Modbury and the Busway, route 548 (also operated by Torrens Transit), via Golden Grove Road and the Busway from Tree Plaza Interchange to the City and also route 415 to Salisbury railway interchange. It has 4 local Metro minibus routes (G1, G2, G3 and RZ4) from Golden Grove Village to different parts of Greenwith, which also connect with frequent buses to and from the Adelaide CBD via Tree Plaza Interchange and the Busway See also File:Golden Grove Greenwith.jpg|thumb|500px|Aerial image of the Golden Grove and Greenwith areas, looking north. Greenwith is to the north, and the border is Cobbler Creek, which is straddled by a treeline indicated by the upper red arrow. The southern border of Golden Grove is indicated approximately by the southern treeline marked by the arrow. The triangle in the southwestern corner of the photo is Surrey Downs, and to the southeastern corner is Fairview Park. Para Reservoir is the body of water. The light patches on the eastern part of the image are quarries.*of Tea Tree Gully*of Adelaide suburbs References  External links * Local History - Greenwith, City of Tea Tree Gully Library* Tea Tree Gully Council Local History group* Adelaide Metro* Greenwith - Local Community Profile
2891880
Dennis_Washington
Dennis R. Washington (born 1934) is a Montana-based industrialist and philanthropist who owns, or co-owns controlling interest in, a large consortium of privately held companies collectively known as the Companies and, in Canada, another collection of companies known as the Marine Group. With an estimated  net worth of around $4.2 billion, he is ranked by Forbes as the 58th-richest person in America.Born in Spokane, Dennis Washington grew up in Spokane, Washington, and Montana.()  Following graduation from high school, he worked in construction in Alaska and Montana.  He began his business career at age 30 in 1964, with a $30,000 loan and a single bulldozer .  He created Washington Construction, which worked primarily on highway contracts and by 1969 was the largest contractor in Montana.In the 1970s he moved into mining and dam construction. In 1986 he acquired a copper and molybdenum mine at Montana. He successfully reopened the mine and it became a very profitable operation. This success helped him diversify into railroads, marine services, coastal shipping, aviation and real estate. In 1996 Washington Construction acquired global construction and engineering company Morrison-Knudsen Corporation of Idaho, creating Group International.Dennis Washington also owns a large private estate on Island, British Columbia, including a luxury fishing lodge and golf course.  The Stadium for football at the of Montana is named for him.  Included in the Washington Companies holdings are:* Marine Group* Rail Link* Partners Inc.See also*of billionairesReferences External links * Dennis Washington.com - official biography* Forbes.com - Forbes Worlds Richest People - 2004*  Forbes.com - 2006 Forbes 400 list - #98* Attessa - photo of Dennis Washingtons prize-winning megayachtWashington
2894512
A1_Mine_Settlement,_Victoria
A1 Mine Settlement is a town in Victoria, Australia, located north of Woods Point on the Mansfield - Woods Point Road, in the of Mansfield. The town has also been known as Castle Reef, Castle Point, and Raspberry Creek. The town began after gold was discovered at Raspberry Creek in 1862. The name A1 indicated that the quality of the gold mined here was First Class.(Baker, Derek, Non-official post offices, article in The Stamp Magazine (London), April 1985, p. 84) During the late 1860s the town known as Castle Reef had a population of around 300, a Post Office under that name opening on 11 January 1868 (closing 1875).() It included two hotels, a general store, a school, a church, and possibly a restaurant. The towns industry was centred on a crushing machine which worked the three gold reefs in the area. These sites and others were amalgamated into the A1 Mine, which continued operation until 1992.A receiving office opened here on 1 July 1910; it was later upgraded to a non-official office and closed on 9 March 1967.( The A1 Mine has historically produced in excess of 450,000 ounces of gold and was one of Australias longest operating mines having been worked from 1861 through to 1992. Reworking the A1 Mine August 2009, Resources purchased an Option to acquire and reopen the A1 Gold Mine. During the Option period (two years) a feasibility study will be completed using the results from the evaluation program.November 2009, of Primary Industry Victoria and Shire approvals have been received to commence site works required as part of the evaluation program for the A1 Gold Mine. Initial works will involve the setting up of a site office, workshops and ancillary buildings to support mining activities. Community consultation meetings were commenced in September 9, these are an ongoing part of the evaluation and will continue through the life of the operation.Establishment of the decline portal is expected during November, while dewatering and underground drilling are expected to commence in the New Year when final approvals are received. Fire problems In 2006, A1 Mine Settlement was threatened by bushfires. Not much of the town remains anymore except a couple of houses which survived. The whole area was burnt including Gaffneys Creek and Ten Mile.ReferencesMine Settlement
2897709
Willowridge_High_School_(Pretoria)
 homepage           www.willowridge.co.zaWillowridge High School, , is a public, English medium co-ed high school located in The Willows, Pretoria, in the Gauteng province of Africa. Willowridge High School is a diverse school and has many pupils excelling in the schools four main various field: Sport, Academics, Leadership and Culture.History of The SchoolWillowridge High is a young school with young ideas and many talented young people who have excelled in an environment which has nurtured enthusiasm, friendship and a pioneering spirit.It has built this ethos on the lives of four prominent South Africans who were associated with Pretoria East and the early development of the Transvaal. Its four school houses are named after them and its house badges are extracts from their original family crests.The first of these, in historical sequence, Harry Struben, is remembered as a pioneer on the gold fields. In 1860, he started a transport business between the old ZAR capital and Natal. With the profits from this business, he bought a farm, The Willows, at that time far to the east of Pretoria.Sir Percy Fitzpatrick, another prominent person, was also a pioneer on the Gold Reef in the early days. He published Jock of the Bushveld in 1907. He became Member of Parliament for Pretoria East in 1910. During his political career, both in the ZAR and under the Union, he strove to unite English speakers. Education was one of his many interests, and he was among those who raised funds for the founding of the of the Witwatersrand in 1921.Sir Thomas Cullinan, the third prominent person, was a pioneer of diamond-mining in the Transvaal. He came to South Africa in 1903 at the request of Sir Alfred Milner. Milner had written to the London Board of Education asking for several capable young men who would help to re-organise education in the Transvaal.It was Sir John Adamsons task to try and reconcile the conflicting interests of Boer and Briton through education. This Englishman, who became a Transvaaler by adoption and learnt to speak Dutch, played no small part in laying foundations for education in our Province. He was as much a pioneer as any of those successful prospectors who found gold or diamonds in the old days. The school has taken encouragement from this example as it reaches out the hand of education to children of all races in its community.As early as the start of 1985 a Vigilance Committee was elected at a meeting of prospective parents. Having been named the watchdogs, they monitored the progress of the new school, while the buildings started taking shape on the site that once had been a farm. It was due to their efforts that the school cottage and the trees, which give the school its restful country atmosphere, were saved from the bulldozer.The Committees activities were, however, also directed at creating an ethos for their new school and establishing a fundamental philosophy. The school opened its doors on Wednesday 7 January 1987 to welcome the first 187 pupils in Forms One and Two. During the first term the name Willowridge High School became official and a badge needed to be designed.The Coat of Arms was approved by the Bureau of Heraldry in 1988 and depicts the name of the school and its inherent philosophy. The shape is that of a spade symbolising the pioneering spirit with which the school was started. The two willow trees standing on the ridge, nurturing and protecting the Tudor Rose as it blossoms represent the name of the school.The willow trees represent growth from the firm foundations of the ridge and symbolise the parent and teacher, while the Tudor rose identifies our English heritage and symbolises the child at its blossoming stage of development.The centre of the rose depicts the childs potential being developed, while the five barbed seeds represent the five facets of the childs development, namely the spiritual, the academic, the cultural, the physical and social development.The triad formed by the two willow trees and the Tudor Rose further depicts the protective, nurturing role of the home and school in the education of the child.The school motto, Strive with integrity, and the school song cemented into words the ethos of the school and the symbolic nature of its coat of arms. The words of our school song came from the pupils, while Mrs Grobler, the grandmother of the Smith family, composed the final melody.The first Headmaster Eddie Penzhorn who came to Willowridge High from The High School, had to face more than is expected of other headmasters: He first had to create a school before he could run it. Out of a wilderness of needs he found textbooks, equipment, desks, chairs, sports-fields, staff and pupils and moulded them into the modern school it has become.In 1991, the second Headmaster Jack Birkenbach was appointed. After a year in office he confidently reflected upon the host of individual achievements pupils at Willowridge High had attained in such a short time. It was acknowledged that national and provincial honours are necessarily second to the academic results: Apart from the number of pupils who have passed with four or more distinctions in Matric, the Headmaster was proudest of our 100% matric pass-rate.In 2005, the third Headmaster Mr Andre du Plessis was appointed. Academics Notice though that Academics is placed First. This is the first responsibility of the school.* Willowridge High School has had close to 100% Matric Pass Rate over the past twelve years.* Willowridge High Schools University and Provisional University Entrance Rate is reliably over 70%.* Willowridge High School awards close to five hundred academic certificates of achievement at Valedication and Honours Evenings each year.* Willowridge High Schools student-educator ratio is one of the lowest in Pretoria with the Governing Body employing more than 20 teachers to complement the posts given to us by the Gauteng Department of Education. It is committed to keeping class sizes to an average of 30:1. Willowridge High School offers two dozen various subjects including:*English*Afrikaans*Sepedi*Mathematics*Mathematical Literacy*Physical Science*Information Technology*Computer Application Technology (CAT)*Economics *Economical Management Sciences*Life Orientation*Business Studies*History*Geography*Tourism*Natural Science*Visual Art (Art)*Design*Civil (Woodwork)*Life Sciences (Biology)*Hospitality Studies (Hotel)*Dramatic Arts (Drama)*Technology*Sport Science*Accounting*Design Sport Sport is compulsory for junior students but not the seniors. At Willowridge High School commitment to a various type of sport means 100% commitment. For the grade 8 students of the school it is compulsory to attend most of the sport meetings as spectators. Sporting facilities include netball facilities, union facilities and cricket facilities, a 25 metre swimming pool, athletics grounds, gym, several tennis and netball courts, a basketball court (outdoor), a rock-climbing wall and hockey fields. The School offers the following sports: *(track and field)*Basketball*Chess*Cricket*Girls Cricket*Cross Country*Hockey*Netball*(sport)*Swimming*Tennis*Golf*Rowing*Softball*unionWillowridge High School is part of the Pretoria English Medium High Schools Athletics Association (PEMHSAA) which is good spirited rivalry between all the Co-Ed Government Schools in Pretoria. The Schools have three meetings held a year including the: Swimming Gala (held at Hillcrest Swimming Pool), Cross Country (held at the host school) and an Athletics meeting (held at Pilditch Stadium. Other schools participating in PEMHSAA are: *Clapham High School*High School*Lyttleton Manor High School*Pretoria Technical High School*Pretoria Secondary School*Sutherland High School*The High School Leadership At Willowridge High School there are two different types of leadership positions within the school: RCL and ECl RCL & ECL Every year in October the students from each of the grades democratically vote for students who they think will do well in/on the council. The council is divided into many different groups each for how they want to benefit the community.CultureAt Willowridge High School pride is taken in all cultural activities. The school has an excellent  dramatic arts department and art department who annually produce excellent works of art. The school song is sung twice a week at Assemblys on a Monday and Friday. The School Song:With a spirit of devotion in our heart and mind and soul:We will honour our name and emblem as we strive to meet our goal.:Willowridge, well serve our Country and to men both great and small:Well extend our hand of friendship, practice tolerance to all.:Truth and honesty and friendship, increase as we all grow:And all our talents we will further, as through life we go.:Willowridge, well try our utmost academically and at sport,:In the true pursuit of knowledge may enlightenment be sought.:well be brave and well stand taller, and strive with one accord:To be humble and obedient, and faithful to the Lord.:Truth and honesty and friendship, increase as we all grow:and all our talents we will further, as through life we go. External links *Willowridge High School official site 
2902659
Donald_Watson
signature      Donald Watson (2 September 1910  16 November 2005) was founder of the Society and inventor of the word vegan.Watson was born in Mexborough, Yorkshire, into a non-vegetarian family.( His journey to veganism began when he was very young, at the farm of his Uncle George.  There, he says:He realised what purpose the pigs served when he saw one slaughtered, and his life was changed(.  At the age of 14, he became a vegetarian as a Years resolution, and in the 1940s, after learning about milk production, he became a vegan(.The term vegan was coined in England by Donald Watson, motivation was ethical to sentient animals:In 1944 he and some friends founded the Society(.  Someone in the group would have come up with a word to describe their diets, he believes, but he suggested vegan, using the first three and last two letters of vegetarian.  It was the beginning and end of vegetarian, and it stuck.At the age of 95, Watson died in his home in northern England.BackgroundThe son of a headmaster in a mining community of Yorkshire, he was born into an environment in which vegetarianism, let alone veganism, was unknown.( Donalds parents, however, encouraged and supported their three children in determining their own paths in life, a liberal approach which enabled Donald to formulate ideas which were both challenging and controversial. He held his parents in great esteem, and often expressed his gratitude for their wisdom in accepting, if not understanding, his philosophy.An obviously sensitive young man, Donald responded to the harshness and brutality of much which he observed in the industrial and farming community in which he grew up early last century, and he developed a great reverence for and in-depth knowledge of the countryside. An acute observer of the natural order, this throughout life became his inspiration and guide, and led him to question mans place in nature and his relationship with other species.He became a vegetarian at the age of fourteen, although he knew of no others who followed this precept. A self-critical and free thinker, throughout his life he always responded to his inner convictions, regardless of any personal inconvenience or difficulties which this might entail(.He was a quiet, strong-minded perfectionist, an abstemious man  teetotaller and non-smoker  who tried to avoid contact with any foods or substances which he regarded as toxins. Never one to criticise others, he himself never felt that his way of life demanded any personal sacrifice; rather, he puzzled at the risks, as he perceived them, which others took so readily.On leaving school at the age of fifteen, he became apprenticed to a family joinery firm where he perfected the skills necessary to continue a life-long love of working with wood, later (from the age of twenty) becoming a teacher of this subject(). He taught in Leicester, where he also played a large part in the Leicester Vegetarian Society, and later in Keswick, where he was able to enjoy his love of fell-walking and organic vegetable gardening until very shortly before his death.From his early conversion to vegetarianism, he later came to view the abstention from the use of all animal products as the logical extension of this philosophy. A committed pacifist throughout his life, he registered as a objector in the war, and faced the harshest challenges to his ethical position(). It was at this time that the need for a word to describe his way of life, and a society to promote its ideals, became apparent; together with his wife, Dorothy, they decided on the word vegan by taking the first three and last two letters of vegetarian, - because veganism starts with vegetarianism and carries it through to its logical conclusion, and the Society was founded in 1944(.Donald ran this single-handed for two years, writing and duplicating the newsletter, and responding to the increasing volume of correspondence(. From these early beginnings, more than sixty years ago, the worldwide movement which exists today developed, with the word vegan appearing with increasing frequency on food labelling and restaurant menus.Donald continued his life quietly in Keswick where he taught for twenty-three years(; also working with the Cumbrian Vegetarian Society, campaigning through the local press on matters important in his home community, and, together with his family, enjoying his love of the mountains. For several years after his retirement from teaching he devoted much time to working as a guided walks leader(Interview with Donald Watson at Vegparadise.com Accessed 2 Nov 2009). Other leisure-time activities included cycling, photography and playing the violin, and while not a party political supporter, he took a keen interest in political issues throughout his life((George D Rodgers Unabridged Interview With Donald Watson on Sunday 15 December 2002).He never sought any recognition for his early work in founding the Vegan Society, and indeed actively shunned the limelight, concerned only that his vision for a more compassionate way of life in harmony with the natural order should take root and grow. He was able to surprise his many critics() who claimed that he could not survive on his proposed diet by proving that he would not only survive but survive well and free from the need for doctors interventions until his final days(.Within the last ten years of his life he climbed many of the major peaks of the District(. He viewed his home and garden in Keswick as his little piece of heaven, and died peacefully there, with his family with him, on 16 November 2005.See also*rights*of vegans*Veganism*Society References (External links* First issue of the Vegan Society newsletter November 1944, Published and written by Donald Watson. Accessed November 2009* Vegan Society main website (contains various, changing information pages and leaflets about Donald Watson)WatsonWatsonWatsonWatsonWatsonWatsonWatson
2912450
Soviet_cruiser_Maxim_Gorky
{|Ship notes|}Maxim Gorky () was a Project 26bis  of the Navy that saw action  during War II and continued in service into the War. The ships bow was blown-off by a mine in the of Riga during the opening stages of Barbarossa, but she made it to Kronstadt for repairs.  However, after being repaired, the ship was trapped in harbour for most of the war, by Axis minefields at Leningrad and Kronstadt. Despite being trapped, Maxim Gorky was active in two engagements: the ship provided gunfire in support for the defenders during the of Leningrad, and she later bombarded Finnish positions during the Offensive in mid-1944. She saw no further action in World War II. A major modernization was begun in 1953, but the navy reconsidered the cost-effectiveness of the refit and work was cancelled in 1955. Maxim Gorky was sold for scrap in 1959.DescriptionMaxim Gorky was  long at the waterline, and  long overall. She had a beam of  and had a draft between . She displaced  at standard load and  at full load.(Yakubov and Worth, p. 84) Her turbines produced a total of  during her trials and propelled the ship to a maximum speed of . This was barely short of her designed speed of 37 knots and was because she was over  overweight. She normally carried  of oil,  at full load and  at overload. This gave her an endurance of  at .(Yakubov and Worth, p. 90)Maxim Gorky carried nine  57-calibre B-1-P guns in three electrically powered MK-3-180 triple turrets.( Her secondary armament consisted of six single  56-calibre B-34 anti-aircraft guns fitted on each side of the rear funnel. Her light anti-aircraft guns consisted of nine semi-automatic  21-K guns and four DShK  machine guns.(Yakubov and Worth, pp. 8687) Six  39-Yu torpedo tubes were fitted in two triple mountings.(Yakubov and Worth, p. 88)Wartime modificationsBy 1944 Maxim Gorky had exchanged her 45 mm guns for 15 fully automatic 37 mm 70-K AA guns with one thousand rounds per gun, two extra DsHK machine guns and two quadruple Lend-Lease .50 machine gun MK III mounts.(When war broke out in 1941 Maxim Gorky lacked radar, but she was equipped with British Lend-Lease radar by 1944. One Type 291 was used for air search. One Type 284 and two Type 285 radars were for main battery fire control, while anti-aircraft fire control was provided by two Type 282 radars.(ServiceMaxim Gorky was laid down at the Ordzhonikidze Yard, Leningrad on 20 December 1936 as a slightly improved version, Project 26bis as designated by the Soviets, of the first pair of Kirov-class cruisers, which were called Project 26. She was launched on 30 April 1938 and was completed on 12 December 1938. The ship, and her escorts, ran into the German-laid Apolda minefield in the of Riga while providing cover for Soviet defensive mining efforts on 23 June 1941 and Maxim Gorky and the destroyer Gnevny both lost their bows, although Gorky made it to port where temporary repairs were made. The ship was transferred, with assistance, to Tallinn and later to Kronstadt.(Rohwer, pp. 8182) She had a new bow section fabricated at Kronstadt and it was mated with the ship on 21 July.(Yakubov and Worth, p. 93) For most of the rest of the war she was blockaded in Leningrad and Kronstadt by Axis minefields and could only provide gunfire support for the defenders during the of Leningrad, for example she fired 285 180 mm shells on 4 September 1941 and 701 rounds during the SeloRopsha Offensive in January 1944. She also bombarded Finnish positions during the Soviet Offensive in June 1944. Maxim Gorky was repeatedly, if lightly, damaged by German air and artillery attacks, but her only extended refit occurred over the winter of 194243 when her upper deck was reinforced with 37-millimetre armour plates.(Yakubov and Worth, pp. 91, 93)Postwar careerMaxim Gorky tested the first Soviet naval helicopter, the Ka-10 in December 1950 and began her refit in mid-1953. This was planned to include a complete overhaul of her machinery while her radar, fire-control systems and anti-aircraft guns were to be replaced by the latest Soviet systems. Torpedo bulges were to be fitted which would increase her displacement by , with consequent penalties to her speed and range. The navy re-evaluated the scope of the work in 1955 and deemed it insufficient to create a fully modern ship and suspended the refit. Maxim Gorky was sold for scrapping on 18 April 1959 after the navy had decided that she wasnt needed as a missile-test ship.(NotesReferences* * External links*  Maxim Gorky on navsource.narod.ru (with photos)*  Project 26 history() ()Gorki (risteilij)
2920391
Eisenerz
Eisenerz (Iron ore) is a market place and old mining town in Styria, Austria, . N.W. of Graz by rail. Pop. (2001) 6,400. It is situated in the deep Valley, dominated on the east by the Pfaffenstein (6140 ft), on the west by the Kaiserschild (6830 ft), and on the south by the Erzberg (5030 ft). It has an interesting example of a medieval fortified church, a Gothic edifice founded by of Habsburg in the 13th century and rebuilt in the 16th.At the turn of the past century the Erzberg (Ore Mountain) furnished such rich ore that it was quarried in the open air like stone, in the summer months. There is documentary evidence of the mines having been worked as far back as the 12th century. They afforded employment to two or three thousand hands in summer and about half as many in winter, and yielded some 800,000 tons of iron per annum. During War II, a subcamp of concentration camp was located here. It provided labour for local industry.(Christine OKeefe.Concentration Camps.wwwtartanplace.com/tartanhistory/concentrationcamps.html) Eisenerz was connected with the mines by the Erzberg railway, a bold piece of engineering work, fourteen miles (21 km) long, constructed on the Abts rack-and-pinion system. It passed through some beautiful scenery, and descends to Vordernberg, an important center of the iron trade situated on the south side of the Erzberg. Eisenerz possesses, in addition, twenty-five furnaces, which produce iron, and particularly steel, of exceptional excellence. Today the Erzberg is home to motocross races.A few miles to the N.W. of Eisenerz lies the castle of Leopoldstein, and near it the beautiful Leopoldsteiner Lake. This lake, with its dark-green water, situated at an altitude of 2028 ft., and surrounded on all sides by high peaks, is not big and has a depth of .Demographic evolution* 1928  6.945* 1939  12.395* 1944  18.419* 1948  11.103* 1956  12.679* 1992  7.965* 2000  6.750* 2005  5.839* 2007  5.566References*bs:Eisenerz(Steiermark)fr:Eisenerzit:Eisenerzlb:Eisenerznl:Eisenerzpl:Eisenerzro:Eisenerzru:sco:Eisenerzsk:Eisenerzsv:Eisenerztr:Eisenerzvi:Eisenerzvo:Eisenerzwar:Eisenerz
2927982
Digital_soil_mapping
Digital Soil Mapping (DSM) in science, or predictive soil mapping, is the computer-assisted production of digital maps of type and soil properties. Digital Soil Mapping involves the creation and population of spatial soil information by the use of field and laboratory observational methods coupled with spatial and non-spatial inference systems.(McBratney and Lagacherie, Global Workshop on Digital Soil Mapping, Montpellier, 2004)  () It applies pedometrics, the use of mathematical and statistical models that combine information from soil observations with information contained in correlated environmental variables and sensing images. The international WORKING GROUP ON DIGITAL SOIL MAPPING (WG-DSM) defines Digital Soil Mapping as the creation and the population of a geographically referenced soil databases generated at a given resolution by using field and laboratory observation methods coupled with environmental data through quantitative relationships. DSM can rely upon, but is distinct from, mapping involving manual delineation of soil boundaries by field soil scientists. Digitized and georeferenced survey information does not become DSM until the GIS layer is used to derive other soil related information within a GIS or similar information software application.Digital Soil Mapping makes extensive use of:# technological advances, including GPS receivers, field scanners, and sensing, and# computational advances, including geostatistical interpolation and inference algorithms, GIS, elevation model, and miningSemi-automated techniques and technologies are used to acquire, process and visualize information on soils and auxiliary information, so that the end result is obtained at cheaper costs. Products are commonly assessed for the accuracy and uncertainty and can be more easily updated when new information comes available.() ()See also*Scorpan*SSURGOReferences(External links*Working group on Digital Soil Mapping*Pedometrics Commission of the International Union of Soil Sciences*NRCS Web Soil Survey Inventory of the soil resource across the U.S.*GlobalSoilMap.netTanah Digital
2935401
Edward_Lucie-Smith
thumb|260px|right|Edward Lucie-SmithJohn Edward McKenzie Lucie-Smith (born 27 February 1933) is a British writer, poet, art critic, curator, broadcaster and author of exhibition catalogues.BiographyLucie-Smith was born in Jamaica, moving to the Kingdom in 1946. He studied at Kings School, Canterbury, and after a little time in Paris he also studied at College, Oxford.After serving in the Air Force and working as a copywriter, he became a full-time writer. He succeeded Hobsbaum in organising The Group, a London-centred poets group.()At the beginning of the 1980s he conducted several series of interviews, Conversations with Artists, for Radio 3.Works;Poetry and fiction* The Fantasy Poets: Number Twenty Five (1954)* A Tropical Childhood and Other Poems (1961)* Confessions & Histories (1964)* Penguin Modern Poets 6 (1964) with Clemo and MacBeth* A Game of French and English (1965) poems* Jazz for the N.U.F. (1965)* Mystery in the Universe: Notes on An Interview with Ginsberg (1965)* The Penguin Book of Elizabethan Verse (1965) editor* A Choice of Brownings Verse (1967)* Five Great Odes by Claudel (1967) translator* Borrowed Emblems (1967)* Jonah: Selected Poems of de Dadelsen (1967) translator* Silence (1967) poetry* The Penguin Book of Satirical Verse (1967) editor* The Little Press Movement in England and America (1968)* More Beasts for Apollinaire (1968)* Snow Poem (1968)* Towards Silence (1968)* Egyptian Ode (1969)* Holding Your Eight Hands (1969) science fiction verse anthology, editor* Six Kinds of Creature (1969)* Six More Beasts (1970)* Poetry since 1945 (1970) anthology, editor* The Rhino (1971) with Steadman* A Garland from the Greek (1971) * French Poetry Today: a bilingual anthology (1971) editor with Simon Watson Taylor* Primer of Experimental Poetry 1, 1870-1922. Volume I (1971) editor* Two Poems of the Night (1972) with Steadman* The Well-Wishers (1974)* The Dark Pageant (1977)* One Man Show (1981) with Cook* Private View (1981) with Beryl Cook* Bertie and the Big Red Ball (1982) with Beryl Cook* Beasts with Bad Morals (1984)* Poems for Clocks (1986)* Changing Shape: New and Selected Poems (2002);Non-fiction* Rubens (1961)* What is a Painting? (1966)* Liverpool Scene: Recorded Live Along the Mersey Beat (1967) editor* Sergei De Diaghileff (1929) (1968) with Anthony Howell* Thinking About Art: Critical Essays (1968)* Movements in Art since 1945 (1969) * Art in Britain 1969-70 (1970) with White* A Concise History of French Painting (1971)* Eroticism in Western Art (1972) revised as Sexuality in Western Art, 1991* Symbolist Art (1972) * Movements in Modern Art (1973) with Carroll* The First London Catalogue (1974)* Late Modern: The Visual Arts Since 1945 (1975)* The Invented Eye: Masterpieces of Photography, 1839-1914 (1975)* The Waking Dream Fantasy and the Surreal in Graphic Art 1450-1900 (1975) with Aline Jacquot* The Burnt Child: An Autobiography (1975)* World of the Makers: Todays Master Craftsmen and Craftswomen (1975)* How the Rich Lived: The Painter as Witness 1870-1914 (1976) with Dars* Fantin-Latour (1977) * Art Today: From Abstract Expressionism to Superrealism (1977)  US as Art Now (1977)* of Arc (1977)* Toulouse-Lautrec (1977)* Work and Struggle: The Painter as Witness, 1870-1914 (1977) with Dars* Outcasts of the Sea: Pirates and Piracy (1978)* A Concise History of Furniture (1979) * A Cultural Calendar of the 20th Century (1979) * Super Realism (1979)* Art in the Seventies (1980) * The Story of Craft: The Craftsmans Role in Society (1981) * The Art of Caricature (1981)* The Body Images of the Nude (1981)* The Sculpture of Helaine Blumenfeld (1982)* A History of Industrial Design (1983) * The Thames & Hudson Dictionary of Art Terms (1984) * Nudes and Flowers: 40 Watercolours by David Hutter (1984)* Steve Hawley (1984)* Art of the 1930s: The Age of Anxiety (1985) * American Art Now (1985) * Lives of the Great Twentieth Century Artists (1985) * The Male Nude: A Modern View (1985) with De Louville (this book features Hockney, Kitaj & Shaw), etal.* Michael Leonard: Paintings (1985) with Kirstein* American Craft Today: Poetry of the Physical (1986) with Paul J. Smith* Sculpture Since 1945 (1987)* The Self Portrait: A Modern View (1987) with Kelly * The New British Painting (1988) with Carolyn Cohen and Judith Higgins* The Essential Osbert Lancaster : An Anthology in Brush and Pen (1988) editor* Impressionist Women (1989)* Art in the Eighties (1990) * Art Deco Painting (1990) * Benton (1990) with Paul J. Karlstrom* Rustin (1990) * Harry Holland: The Painter and Reality (1991)* Vaughan 1912-1977: Drawings of the Young Male (1991) * Wendy Taylor (1992) * Andres Nagel (1992) * Alexander (1992) * Art and Civilization (1992) * The Faber Book of Art Anecdotes (1992) editor* Luis Caballero: Paintings & Drawings (1992)* 20th Century Latin American Art (1993) * British Art Now - A Personal View (1993) with Roboz and Wykes-Joyce* Scholder, A Survey of Paintings 1970-1993 (1993) * Race, Sex and Gender in Contemporary Art: The Rise of Minority Culture (1994) * Frink: A Portrait (1994) * John Kirby: The Company of Strangers (1994) * American Realism (1994) * Art Today (1995) * Visual Arts in the 20th Century (1996) * Nierman: 1987-1994 Painting/Sculpture/Tapestry (1996)* Paley (1996)* Ars Erotica: An Arousing History of Erotic Art (1997)* Dunbar Mining The Surfaces (1997)* Glenys Barton (1997) with Flowers and Robin Gibson* Impressionist Women: Reality Observed (1997)* Adam: The Male Figure in Art (1998)* Chadwick (1998)* Zoo: Animals in Art (1998)* Lives of the Great 20th Century Artists (1999)* Sean Henry - the Centre of the Universe (1999) with Beatrice F. Buscaroli* Women and Art: Contested Territory (1999) with Chicago* Judy Chicago: An American Vision (2000)* Flesh and Stone (2000)* Art Tomorrow (2002)* Marquez (2002)* Remfry: Dancers (2003) with Ashton and Ratcliff* Color of Time: The Photographs of Sean Scully (2004) with C. Danto and Fineman* Censoring the Body (2007) (ISBN 1905422539)()ReferencesExternal links*Biography*LibraryThing author profileLucie-Smith Lucie-Smith
2941214
Marion_Power_Shovel_Company
 intl              Marion Power Shovel Company designed, manufactured and sold shovels, excavators and excavators for use in the construction and mining industries.Founded in Ohio in August, 1884 by Henry Barnhart, Huber and George W. King as the Marion Steam Shovel Company, the company grew through sales and acquisitions throughout the twentieth century. The company changed its name to Marion Power Shovel Company in 1946 to reflect the industrys change from steam power to diesel power. The company ceased to be an independent entity when it was sold, becoming the Marion division of Dresser Industries, Inc. in 1976. In 1992 Dresser spun off the Marion division and certain other assets into a holding company that would eventually become known as Global Industrial Technologies, Inc. Global put the Marion division up for sale in 1997 and Bucyrus International, Inc. purchased the division for US$40.1 million. Bucyrus integrated the Marion divisions products into the Bucyrus product line, then closed the Marion, Ohio, facility. Marion Power Shovel lives on as a brand owned by Bucyrus, which manufactures OEM parts and provides technical service for Marion branded machines that are still in use. Marion Power Shovels historical corporate files and archives are split between Green, Ohios Historical Construction Equipment Association and the County Historical Society in Marion, Ohio.HistoryMarion Steam Shovel CompanyImage:MarioModel90 1908.jpg|thumb|Marion Model 91, Culebra Cut, CanalThe Marion Steam Shovel Company was established by Henry Barnhart, George W. King and Huber in August 1884. While steam shovels had been made prior to this date in the United States, Barnhart persuaded Huber to financially back his design, which incorporated a stronger bucket support than other makes. Barnhart and Huber patented Barnharts changes under United States Patent No. 285,100 on September 18, 1883. One element of Barnharts design was the use of solid iron rods (hog rings) to support the boom of the shovel, which was stronger than simple chain.Steam Shovel, Le Roy, NY.jpg|250px|thumb|left|This Marion Model 91 shovel on display in Le Roy, New York is the only example known to exist. This shovel is included on the National Register of Historic Places.This machine set the record in July 1908 for moving  of earth in 25 eight-hour days after American project management began. Marion built large and small steam shovels for building contractors, railroads and the Army Corps of Engineers who were building the Canal at the time.A Marion Model 91, the type used at the Panama Canal, was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 2008. Marion was most successful with the Model 20 series contractors shovels (see shovel).During the project Marion Shovels broke world records in amount of cubic earth moved within a given time frame (1908) and greatest amount (8-ton) lifted by a single bucket (1911).Marion also designed and built the NASA Crawler-transporter used to transport both the Saturn V rocket and later the Space Shuttle to the launch pad.(http://www.motherboard.tv/2011/6/21/one-last-drive-for-the-largest-truck-ever-built-it-carries-a-space-shuttle)By 1911 90% of all large bucket steam shovels and draglines were produced in Marion Ohio, which was also the headquarters of Osgood Steam Shovel, Fairbanks Steam Shovel and General Excavating Corporation. (Competitor Bucyrus Steam Shovel was founded  from Marion in nearby Ohio; the company relocated soon thereafter to Milwaukee, Wisconsin after Bucyrus city officials refused to approve expansion plans for the company.)Marion Power ShovelIn April 1946, the company changed its name to the Marion Power Shovel Company to more closely reflect its products.Marion built its first walking dragline in 1939 and became a key player in providing giant stripping shovels to the coal industry, being the first to put a long-boom revolving stripping shovel to work in North America in 1911. Marions succession of giant shovels, many breaking world size records, culminated in the worlds largest in 1965, the 6360. The 6360 at the Captain Mine, Illinois, operated with a 180 cubic yard (138 cubic meter) dipper. With an estimated weight of 15,000 tons (13,600 tonnes), this machine still holds the record as the heaviest mobile land machine ever built.Osgood Company acquisitionIn 1955, Marion Power Shovel acquired its crosstown rival, the Company, which manufactured shovels under the Marion-Osgood and Osgood brand names. Osgoods product line complimented Marion Power Shovels, with most of Osgoods product line focusing on shovels, cranes and draglines that were small capacity machines as opposed to Marions line, which focused increasingly on high end strip mining draglines. Osgood also built road-ready mobile units that used Mack truck undercarriages.Acquired by Dresser, then BucyrusThe Marion Power Shovel Company was refinanced by management in the late 1960s with only the signature guarantee of the primary stockholder, billionaire Henry Hillman, of Pittsburg, PA and PNC Bank fame. In 1976 Dresser Industries, Inc. purchased Marion Power Shovel for approximately US$250 million. The company grew from 1,500 employees in 1974 to over 3,200 employees by 1978 under the direction of Putt McDowell during the massive growth in coal mining demand of the late 70s.By 1992, Dresser Industries had decided to exit the production of industrial and mining equipment. The affected assets, including the Marion division, became part of Indresco, a holding company created by Dresser in 1992 and then spun-off to Dresser shareholders. On November 1, 1995, Indresco changed its name to Global Industral Technologies, Inc.On January 23, 1997 Global Industrial Technologies announced that it was divesting certain assets, including the Marion division. Global Industrial Technologies sold the Marion Power Shovel Company, which had revenues of US$114.4 million in FY 1996, for US$40.1 million to Bucyrus International, Inc. on July 23, 1997. Following the acquisition, Bucyrus International closed Marion Power Shovel Companys Marion, Ohio facility.Historical corporate files and archives for Marion Power Shovel were split between Bowling Green, Ohios Historical Construction Equipment Association and the County Historical Society in Marion, Ohio.See also*shovel*Dragline*Muskie*Brutus*Steam Shovel (Le Roy, New York)References* ref          * ref          * ref          * ref          * ref          * ref          * ref          External links* Bucyrus International, Marion Power Shovel* Historical Construction Equipment Association* Happy Birthday Crawlers, NASA page* NASA Moveable Launch Pad* Power ShovelPower ShovelPower Shovel Company
2945425
Zimbabwe_Stock_Exchange
The Zimbabwe Stock Exchange, or ZSE, is the official exchange of Zimbabwe. It has been open to foreign investment since 1993. The exchange has about a dozen members and over 65 listed securities. There are two indices, the Industrial Index and the Mining Index.HistoryThe first stock exchange in Zimbabwe opened its doors shortly after the arrival of the Column in Bulawayo in 1896. However, it only operated for about six years. Other stock exchanges were established in Gwelo (Gweru) and Umtali (Mutare). The Mutare Exchange, also opened in 1896, thrived on the success of local mining, but with the realisation that deposits in the area were not extensive, activity declined and it closed in 1924. After War II a new exchange was founded in Bulawayo by Mulock Bentley and dealing started in January 1946. A second floor was opened in Salisbury (Harare) in December 1951 and trading between the two centres took place by telephone. Traders continued working by telephone until it was decided that legislation should be enacted to govern the rights and obligations of the members of the exchange and the general investing public. The Stock Exchange Act reached the statute book in January 1974. The members of the exchange continued to trade as before and for legal reasons it became necessary to create a new exchange coincidental with the passing of the legislation. The exchange dates from the passing of the act in 1974, and is operated and regulated in accordance with the act and its amendments, including 1996s Zimbabwe Stock Exchange Act: Chapter 24:18.On achieving independence from Britain in 1980, the exchange changed its name from the Rhodesia to the Zimbabwe Stock Exchange.With the decline of the Zimbabwean economy, hyperinflation rendered the Zimbabwean dollar useless and the US-Dollar was adopted as the legal tender for trading on the exchange in February 2009.  As of March 2009, trade has been very thin, with very few foreign investors willing to risk trading on the market. Most stocks trade in the US-cent range, with at least 26 different stocks not trading at all.(http://www.fingaz.co.zw/index.php?optioncom_content&viewarticle&id513:selling-pressure-remains-high-on-zse&catid55:market-report&Itemid104)See also*of Zimbabwe*of stock exchanges*of African stock exchanges*Industrial Index*Zimbabwe Mining IndexExternal links*Zimbabwe Stock Exchange*Zimbabwe Stock Exchange Benefits from Austrian Economic TheoryReferences( 
2949857
California_in_the_American_Civil_War
Californias involvement in the Civil War included sending gold east, recruiting volunteer combat units to replace regular forces in territories of the United States, maintaining and building numerous camps and fortifications, suppressing secessionist activity and securing the Mexico Territory against the Confederacy.  The State of California did not send its units east, but many citizens traveled east and joined the Army there, some of whom became famous.  Californias Volunteers also conducted many operations against the native peoples within the state and in the other Western territories of the Departments of the Pacific and New Mexico.Following the Gold Rush California was settled primarily by Midwestern and Southern farmers, miners and businessmen.  Democrats dominated the state from its foundation. Southern Democrats sympathetic to secession, although a minority in the state, were a majority in California and Tulare County, and were in large numbers in San Joaquin, Santa Clara, Monterey, and San Francisco counties. California was home for powerful businessmen who played a significant role in Californian politics through their control of mines, shipping, finance, and the Republican Party but were a minority party until the secession crisis.In the beginning of 1861, as the secession crisis began, the secessionists in San Francisco made an attempt to separate the state and Oregon from the union, which failed.  Southern California, with a majority of discontented Californios and Southern secessionists, had already voted for a separate Territorial government and formed militia units, but were kept from secession after Sumter and by Federal troops drawn from the frontier forts of the District of Oregon, and of California, (primarily Tejon and Mojave).Patriotic fervor swept California after the attack on Fort Sumter, providing the manpower for Volunteer Regiments recruited mainly from the pro-Union counties in the north of the State.  When the Democratic party split over the war, Republican supporters of Lincoln took control of the state in the September elections.  Volunteer Regiments were sent to occupy pro-secessionist Southern California and Tulare County, leaving them generally powerless during the war itself.  However some Southerners traveled east to join the Army, evading Union patrols and hostile Apache.  Others remaining in the state attempted to outfit a privateer to prey on coastal shipping, and late in the war two groups of partisan rangers were formed but none were successful.From statehood to the Civil WarWhen California was admitted as a state under the of 1850, Californians had already decided it was to be a free statethe constitutional convention of 1849 unanimously abolished slavery.  As a result, Southerners in Congress voted against admission in 1850 while Northerners pushed it through, pointing to its population of 93,000 and its vast wealth in gold.  Northern California, which was dominated by mining, shipping, and commercial elites of San Francisco, favored becoming a state.In the 1856 presidential election, California gave its electoral votes to the winner, James Buchanan. Southern Californias attempts at secession from California Following Californias admission to the Union, Californios (dissatisfied with inequitable taxes and land laws) and pro-slavery Southerners in lightly populated, rural Southern California attempted three times in the 1850s to achieve a separate statehood or territorial status from Northern California. The last attempt, the Act of 1859, was passed by the State Legislature, signed by the State governor B. Weller, approved overwhelmingly by voters in the proposed Territory of Colorado and sent to D.C. with a strong advocate in Senator Latham.  However the secession crisis following the election of Lincoln in 1860 led to the proposal never coming to a vote.(Michael DiLeo, Eleanor Smith, Two Californias: The Truth about the Split-state Movement, Island Press, Covelo, California, 1983. pg. 9-30.  Nearly 75% of voters in the proposed Territory of Colorado voted for separate status.)(J. M. Guinn, HOW CALIFORNIA ESCAPED STATE DIVISION, The Quarterly, Volumes 5-6 By Historical Society of Southern California, Los Angeles County Pioneers of Southern California)(Civil War: How Southern California Tried to Split from Northern California) Secession Crisis in California In 1860 California gave a small plurality of 38,733 votes to Lincoln, whose 32% of the total vote was enough to win all its electoral votes; 68% voted for the other three candidates.(Johannsen, Robert W. Lincoln, the South, and Slavery: The Political Dimension, Baton Rouge: Louisiana State University Press, 1991.)(Popular vote in 1860)During the secession crisis following Lincolns election, Federal troops were under the command of Colonel (Brevet General) Sidney Johnston, in Benicia, headquarters of the Department of the Pacific. General Johnston strongly believed in the Southern right to secede but regretted that it was occurring.  A group of Southern sympathizers in the state made plans to secede with Oregon to form a Pacific Republic.  The success of their plans rested on the cooperation of General Johnston.  Johnston met with some of these Southern men, but before they could propose anything to him he told them that he had heard rumors of an attempt to seize the San Francisco forts and arsenal at Benicia, that he had prepared for that and would defend the facilities under his command with all his resources and to the last drop of his blood. He told them to tell this to their Southern friends.(Asbury Harpending, The great diamond hoax: and other stirring incidents in the life of Asbury Harpending, San Francisco, James H. Barry Co., 1913.p.36)  Deprived of his aid the plans for California and Oregon to secede from the United States never came to fruition.Meanwhile Union men feared Johnston would aid such a plot and communicated their fears to Washington asking for his replacemnt.  Brig. Gen. Vose Sumner was soon sent west via Panama to replace Johnston in March 1861. Johnston resigned his commission on April 9, and after Sumner arrived on April 25 turned over his command and moved to Angeles.As the secession crisis developed in early 1861, several Volunteer Companies of the California Militia(Index to Militia Units of the State of California 1850-1881)(Inventory of the Military Department. Militia Companies Records, 1849-1880) had disbanded because of divided loyalties and new pro-Union ones were sworn in across the state under the supervision of County sheriffs and judges.  Many of these units saw no action but some were to form the companies of the earliest California Volunteer regiments.  Others like the Guard and Rifles in Sonoma County suppressed a secessionist disturbance in Healdsburg,(The California State Military Museum, California State Militia and National Guard Unit Histories, Petaluma Guard. This history was written in 1940 by the Works Progress Administration (WPA) in conjunction with the office of the Adjutant General and the California State Library) in 1862.  Union commanders relied on the Bernardino Mounted Rifles and their Captain E. Bennett(California State Militia and National Guard Unit Histories, San Bernardino Rangers. This history was written in 1940 by the Works Progress Administration (WPA) in conjunction with the Office of the Adjutant General and the California State Library) for intelligence and help to hold the pro-Southern San Bernardino County for the Union in late 1861 as Federal troops were being withdrawn and replaced by California Volunteers.Notable as the only pro-Southern militia unit, the Angeles Mounted Rifles was organized on March 7, 1861, in Los Angeles County.  It included more than a few Californios in its leadership and its ranks, including the County Sheriff Avila Sanchez. Its leader was one of his Undersheriffs Ridley and included several of his deputies.  J. King, another Undersheriff of Los Angeles County (and former member of the earlier Rangers),(California State Militia and National Guard Unit Histories: Monte Rangers) and other influential men in El Monte, formed another secessionist militia, the Mounted Rifles on March 23, 1861.  However, A. J. King soon ran afoul of Federal authorities.  According to the Sacramento Union of April 30, 1861, King was brought before Colonel Carleton and was made to take an oath of allegiance to the Union and was then released. On April 26, 1861, the Monte Mounted Rifles had asked Governor Downey for arms. The governor sent the arms, but army officers at San Pedro held them up, preventing the activation of the Monte Mounted Rifles.(J. M. Scammel, Military Units in Southern California, 1853-1862; California Historical Quarterly, Vol. XXIV, Chapter 3. II The Los Angeles Units, p.14) On March 28, 1861, the newly formed Arizona Territory voted to separate from New Mexico Territory and join the Confederacy.  This had increased Union officials fears of a secessionist design to separate Southern California from the state and join the Confederacy.  This fear was based on the demonstrated desire for separation in the vote for the Pico Act, the strength of secessionists in the area and their declared intentions and activities, especially in forming militia companies.Outbreak of the Civil Warthumb|250px|The J. P. Gillis Flagthumb|250px|Digital reproduction of the Gillis FlagAt the outbreak of the Civil War, Southern California secession seemed possible; the populace was largely in favor of it, militias with secessionist sympathies had been formed, and Flags, the banner of the Flag Revolt, had been flown for several months by secessionists in Los Angeles and San Bernardino counties.( George Henry Tinkham, California men and events: time 1769-1890, 2nd, revised ed., Record Publishing Company, 1915. pp.194-195)  After word of the of Fort Sumter reached California, there were public demonstrations by secessionists.  However secession quickly became impossible when three companies of Federal cavalry were moved from Fort Mojave and Fort Tejon into Los Angeles in May and June 1861. Suspected by local Union authorities, General Johnston evaded arrest and joined the Los Angeles Mounted Rifles as a private, leaving Ranch May 27 in their journey across the southwestern deserts to Texas, crossing the River into the Territory of Arizona, on July 4, 1861.  The Los Angeles Mounted Rifles disbanded and members joined the Confederate Army when they reached the Arizona Territorial capital of Mesilla (now in Mexico).  Like other pro-Confederates leaving California for the Confederacy, the volunteers joined up principally with Texas regiments. General Johnston joined the fight in the east as a general with the Confederacy and was later killed leading their army at the of Shiloh.The only Confederate flag captured in California during the Civil War took place on July 4, 1861, in Sacramento. During Independence Day celebrations, secessionist Major J. P. Gillis celebrated the independence of the United States from Britain as well as the southern states from the Union. He unfurled a Confederate flag of his own design and proceeded to march down the street to both the applause and jeers of onlookers. Jack Biderman and Curtis Clark, enraged by Gillis actions, accosted him and captured the flag.() The flag itself is based on the first Confederate flag, the and Bars. However, the canton contains seventeen stars rather than the Confederates seven. Because the flag was captured by Jack Biderman, it is often also referred to as the Biderman Flag.As he was recalling Federal troops to the east, on July 24, 1861, the of War called on Governor John G. Downey to furnish one regiment of infantry and five companies of cavalry to guard the overland mail route from City to Lake City. Three weeks later four more regiments of infantry and a regiment of cavalry were requested.  All of these were volunteer units recruited and organized in the northern part of the state, around the San Francisco Bay region and the mining camps; few recruits came from Southern California.  These volunteers replaced the regular troops transferred to the east before the end of 1861.Charged with all the supervision of Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Diego, and Santa Barbara Counties, on August 14, 1861, Major Scott Ketchum steamed from San Francisco to San Pedro and made a rapid march to encamp near San Bernardino on August 26 and with Companies D and G of the 4th Infantry Regiment later reinforced at the beginning of September by a detachment of ninety U.S. Dragoons and a howitzer.  Except for frequent sniping at his camp, Ketchums garrison stifled any secessionist uprising from Belleville and a show of force by the Dragoons in the streets of San Bernardino at the end of election day quelled a secessionist political demonstration during the September gubernatorial elections in San Bernardino County.(The California State Military Museum, Historic California Posts:Posts at San Bernardino)(The War of the Rebellion SERIES I, Volume L, Chapter LXII - Operations on the Pacific Coast, Part I, pp.16,27,28,429,450,466,512,515,567,569,585,594,595,601-602,606,607,612,614-615,617,660-661,663,669-670,687)Thereafter, with the Democrats split over the war, the first Republican governor of California was elected, Stanford, a powerful tycoon from the Northeast, on September 4, 1861.(U.S. Genealogy Network; George H. Tinkham, California Men and Events 1769-1890, Panama-Pacific Exposition Edition, 1915. Chapter XVI: POLITICAL REVOLUTIONS)Following the elections on September 7, there was a gunfight resulting from a robbery of travelers to Bear Valley and Valley on the pack trail in the Upper Santa Ana Canyon where the Ana River runs out of the Bernardino Mountains. It was suspected that secessionists had been the culprits, doing the robbery as part of a larger plan of robberies in the valleys of Los Angeles and San Bernardino Counties.  However, no such plan materialized.(The War of the Rebellion SERIES I, Volume L, Chapter LXII - Operations on the Pacific Coast, Part I, pp. 612, 615, 617) Civil War battles within California  Securing Southern California As the California Volunteer regiments formed, some were sent south with Colonel George Wright, commanding officer of the of Southern California.  He was to replace the Federal troops in Los Angeles, gathered there to prevent a rising by the numerous secessionist sympathizers in Southern California. In October 1861, Wright was promoted to Brigadier General of Volunteers and placed in command of the Department of the Pacific, replacing Sumner who had recommended Wright as his replacement.  Colonel Henry Carleton of the 1st California Volunteer Infantry Regiment replaced Wright as commander in the south. Detachments were soon sent out by Carleton to San Bernardino and San Diego Counties to secure them for the Union and prevent the movement of men and weapons eastward to the Confederacy.One of the earliest conflicts related to the Civil War in California occurred on November 29, 1861, at Minter Ranch, in the hills just south and west of the San Jose Valley, where Warners Ranch and the military post of Wright(Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Historic California Posts: Camp Wright from Pioneer Forts of the Far West, published in 1965, The California State Military Museum) was located. Dan Showalters party of secessionists like some others were attempting to avoid the post and make their way across the desert to join the Confederate Army in Texas.  They were pursued from Temecula by a Volunteer Cavalry patrol from the camp, intercepted and captured without shots being fired. Later after being imprisoned at Yuma, Showalter and the others were released after swearing loyalty to the Union, but they made their way to the Confederacy later.(Bill Virden, THE AFFAIR AT MINTERS RANCH, The Journal of San Diego History, SAN DIEGO HISTORICAL SOCIETY QUARTERLY, April 1961, Volume 7, Number 2)Camp Carleton was established on March 22, 1862 near El Monte; its garrison was to keep an eye on that hotbed of secessionist sympathies. On April 10, 1862, as the States Marshal for Southern California, Henry D. Barrows, wrote to the commander of Union Army Department of the Pacific in San Francisco, complaining of anti-Union sentiment in Southern California. The letter says such sentiment permeates society here among both the high and the low, and reports::A. J. King, under-sheriff of this county, who has been a bitter secessionist, who said to me that he owed no allegiance to the United States Government; that Jeff Daviswas the only constitutional government we had, and that he remained here because he could do more harm to the enemies of that Government by staying here than going there; brought down on the Senator (a steam ship) Tuesday last a large lithograph gilt-framed portrait of Beauregard, the rebel general, which he flaunted before a large crowd at the hotel when he arrived. I induced Colonel Carleton to have him arrested as one of the many dangerous secessionists living in our midst, and to-day he was taken to Camp Drum. He was accompanied by General E. Howard as counsel, and I have but little hope that he will be retained in custody. (Roger M. Grace, Candidate With Pro-Slavery Views Elected District Attorney in 1863, Metropolitan News-Enterprise, Tuesday, August 15, 2006, Page 7)Naval IncidentsDuring and after the 1862 Confederate Mexico Campaign, no rising against Union control occurred in the state.  However in the following years some attempts were made by the navy to seize gold and silver for the Confederacy.J. M. Chapman PlotIn 1863, Harpending, after traveling secretly to Richmond to obtain a of marque, joined with other California members of the of the Golden Circle in San Francisco to outfit the schooner J. M. Chapman as a Confederate privateer in Francisco Bay. Their object was to raid commerce on the Pacific coast carrying gold and silver shipments, to capture and carry it back to support the Confederacy.  Their attempt was detected and they were seized on March 15, during the night of their intended departure by the USS Cyane, revenue officers and San Francisco police.(California Military Museum; The Pacific Squadron of 1861-1866, The following article is taken from Aurora Hunts book, The Army of the Pacific; Its operations in California, Texas, Arizona, New Mexico, Utah, Nevada, Oregon, Washington, plains region, Mexico, etc. 1860-1866, under the chapter The Pacific Squadron of 1861-1866. pp.305-310)(John Boessenecker, Badge and Buckshot: Lawlessness in Old California, Univerciy of Oklahoma Press, 1997, pg. 135-136)Salvador PiratesIn spring of 1864, the Confederate navy ordered Captain Egenton Hogg and his command to take passage on board a coastal steamer in City, seize her on the high seas, arm her and attack the Pacific Mail steamers and the whalers in the Pacific.  In Havana, the American consul, Thomas Savage, learned about this conspiracy, and notified Rear Admiral F. Pearson at Panama City.  The Admiral had the passengers boarding the steamers at Panama City watched and when Hoggs command was found aboard the Railroad steamer Salvador, a force from the Lancaster arrested them and brought them to San Francisco.  Tried by a military commission, they were sentenced to be hanged, but General McDowell commuted their sentences. To prevent any further attempts to seize Pacific coast shipping, General McDowell ordered each passenger on board American merchant steamers to surrender all weapons when boading the ship and every passenger and his baggage was searched. All officers were armed for the protection of their ships.(Aurora Hunt, The Army of the Pacific; Its operations in California, Texas, Arizona, New Mexico, Utah, Nevada, Oregon, Washington, plains region, Mexico, etc. 1860-1866, The Pacific Squadron of 1861-1866, pp.314-315.)(Official Records of the Union and Confederate Navies in the War of the Rebellion. 31 volumes. United States Government Printing Office, 1914; reprinted, 1987, by the National Historical Society, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania; citation includes series 1, volume 3, pp. 302-303, 352-368.)Partisan Rangers in CaliforniaLate in the war, local secessionists in California made attempts to seize gold and silver for the Confederacy.  In early 1864, Henry Ingram, formerly with Raiders, arrived in Santa Clara County and with Tom Poole, organized local Knights of the Golden Circle and commanded them in what became known as Ingrams Partisan Rangers. In the Bend Robbery they robbed two stagecoaches near Placerville of their silver and gold, leaving a letter explaining they were not bandits but carrying out a military operation to raise funds for the Confederacy.(John Boessenecker, Badge and Buckshot: Lawlessness in Old California, Univerciy of Oklahoma Press, 1997. pg. 133-157)Also in early 1864, secessionist Judge Gordon Belt, a rancher and former alcalde in Stockton, organized a group of partisan rangers including John Mason and Jim Henry and sent them out to recruit more men and pillage the property of Union men in the countryside. For the next two years the Henry Gang, as they became known, posed as Confederate partisan rangers but acted as outlaws, committing robberies, thefts and murders in the southern Joaquin Valley, Santa Cruz County, Monterey County, Santa Clara County, and in counties of Southern California.(William B. Secrest, California Badmen: Mean Men with Guns, Word Dancer Press, Sanger, California, 2007. pg. 143-147)  However, despite all these efforts no captured gold was sent to the Confederacy.1864 ElectionIn July 1864, with many Douglas Democrats deserting their party over the war, the remaining Democrats formed a fusion party behind the former governor G. Downey, opposed to continuation of the war, emancipation, the arrest of civilians by the military, the suppression of free speech and of the press and racial equality. The result in the September election was a second Republican governor of California, F. Low.(Lincoln won the 1864 election with almost 59% in California.(Popular vote in 1864)Civil War Era forts and camps in CaliforniaAt this time, the U.S. had a number of military forts to defend against the Indian threat, and to solidify the U.S. claim to the state. As the conflict began, new forts and camps were founded to protect ports and communications, carry out operations against the Indians, to hold off Confederate soldiers and suppress their sympathizers.Of the ports, Francisco Bay was the most important; coastal fortifications at Fort Point and Sumner(The California State Military Museum, Historic California Posts: Camp Sumner) were built at the edge of the Presidio, as well as at Baker on the Headlands.  One Civil War-era fort, of Alcatraz Island or Alcatraz, on a rocky island just inside the Golden Gate, later became an infamous Federal penitentiary, Alcatraz. The San Francisco Bay was also protected by the Navy at Island, the Arsenal, Mason with the posts at San Franciscos Point San Jose, and Camp Reynolds on Angel Island.  San Pedro was protected from January 1862 by Camp Drum, later the Drum Barracks,(Historic California Posts: Drum Barracks (Camp San Pedro, Camp Drum, Fort Drum, and Wilmington Depot))(Historic California Posts: Fort MacArthur - Military Museum) and later a post was established at Two Harbors on Catalina Island. San Diego was only defended by a small garrison at the San Diego Depot(The California State Military Museum; Historic California Posts: San Diego Barracks(Including New San Diego Depot)) occupied in 1860.In the northwest of the state were several forts, Fort Bragg on the County coast supporting Fort Wright.(Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Historic California Posts: Fort Wright from Pioneer Forts of the Far West, published in 1965, The California State Military Museum) Further north on the coast of Humboldt County was Humboldt, established to maintain peace between the Native Americans and new settlers and Headquarters of the Military District supporting other forts in the area.  S. Grant was briefly stationed here prior to the war. Fort Humboldt supported Curtis,(Historic California Posts: Camp Curtis (Camp on Janes Farm), The California State Military Museum) Gaston, Camp Lyon, Fort Baker,(Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Historic California Posts: Fort Baker from Pioneer Forts of the Far West, published in 1965, The California State Military Museum) Iaqua, Fort Anderson,(Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Historic California Posts: Fort Anderson(Camp Anderson) from Pioneer Forts of the Far West, published in 1965, The California State Military Museum) Camp Lincoln and Fort Seward which were the base of operations for the soldiers in the Hills War. In the Northeast were Fort Crook(Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Historic California Posts: Fort Crook (Camp Hollenbush)from Pioneer Forts of the Far West, published in 1965, The California State Military Museum) in Shasta County and in County, Bidwell was established in 1863.To the south there was Miller in the foothills of the southern Sierra Nevada in County, and Babbitt(Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Historic California Posts: Camp Babbitt from Pioneer Forts of the Far West, published in 1965, The California State Military Museum) outside the town of Visalia, in Tulare County. Fort Tejon in the Grapevine Canyon (La Caada de las Uvas) had protected the southern Joaquin Valley and Southern California.  It had been the headquarters of the First U.S. Dragoons until those army troops were transferred in July 1861 upon the outbreak of war. Fort Tejon was reoccupied by California volunteer troops in 1863 to guard Paiute Indians from the Owens Valley at the nearby Indian Reservation and then it was abandoned for good on September 11, 1864. Camp Independence was established on Oak Creek nearby modern California on July 4, 1862, during the Valley Indian War.(The Owens Valley Indian War, 1861-1865; Captain John W. Key, V., Submitted to the Faculty of U.S. Army Command and General Staff College, Fort Leavenworth, Kansas. 1979)At the beginning of the war Union authorities were worried that the large number of secessionist sympathizers in Southern California might rise in an attempt to join the Confederacy.  In June 1861 troops withdrawn from Fort Tejon and Fort Mojave established Fitzgerald outside Los Angeles in various locations as each proved unsuitable.(The California State Military Museum, Historic California Posts: Fort Moore (Post at Los Angeles, Fort Hill and including Camp Fitzgerald), reprinted with permission from Colonel Herbert M. Hart, USMC (retired), Old Forts of the Far West, published in 1965) In late September 1861, troops from Northern California landed in San Pedro and marched to establish a new camp at a more suitable location at Latham in modern Culver City.(The California State Military Museum, Historic California Posts: Camp Latham) From this post Ketchums regular soldiers were relieved on October 20 by three companies of 1st California Cavalry sent out to San Bernardino County.( and establish Carleton and later Morris.(The California State Military Museum, Historic California Posts: Camp Morris)  Volunteer troops were also sent to Camp Wright in Diego County to watch the southern overland approach to California across the Desert from Fort Yuma, located on the west bank of the Colorado River.In March 1862, all the troops that were drilling at Camp Latham were transferred to Camp Drum, leaving a company of soldiers to observe the Los Angeles area.  Following flooding at Camp Carleton, the garrison moved to Camp Carleton, built near the secessionist hotbed of El Monte in 1862.Civil War military units associated with CaliforniaDue to its location, the states local militia companies remained under state status because of the great number of Southern sympathizers, the Indian threat, and possible foreign attack.  The state followed the usual military practice of mustering militia companies into regiments. These Volunteers maintained military posts vacated by the regular army units that were ordered east.  However a number of state militias disbanded and went east. Several of these companies offered their services and were accepted by the Union Army.thumb|left|300px|Company Guidon, Company A (California 100), raised in MassachusettsIn 1862, five companies of the 2nd Massachusetts Cavalry (also known as California 100 and the Cavalry Battalion) were enrolled and mustered into service, and sent to Massachusetts. They left San Francisco by sea for service in the east. The California Battalion consisted of Companies A, C, F, L, and M. They participated in 51 battles, campaigns, and skirmishes. Oregon Senator Edward D. Baker raised a regiment of men on the East Coast. These units and others were generally known as the Regiment, but later designated the 71st Pennsylvania Infantry. Col. N. Matheson was the leader of the 32nd New York Infantry, also known as the 1st California Regiment.In October 1861, Colonel Baker was authorized to increase his command to a brigade. The additional regiments were commanded by Colonels T. Owen, Clinton Baxter, and G. Morehead, all from Philadelphia, respectively designated the 2nd, 3rd, and 5th California Regiments. The 4th California Regiment, as planned, was composed of artillery and cavalry. These troops were soon detached. After Baker was killed in the of Balls Bluff, Pennsylvania claimed these four infantry regiments as a part of its quota, and they became known as the Brigade of Pennsylvania Volunteers. They were initially commanded by Brig. Gen. W. Burns and first served in Sedgwicks Division of the II Corps, of the Potomac. They had a distinguished service career, highlighted by their actions at the of Antietam and their prominent position in the defense against Charge at the of Gettysburg.Military units associated with California included:* Los Angeles Mounted Rifles (Confederate)*Regiment of Cavalry, Massachusetts Volunteers Company A, E, F, L, and M (the later four called the California Battalion) *Regiment of New York Volunteers * Brigade of Pennsylvania Volunteers** 1st California Infantry - Pennsylvania Infantry** 2nd California Infantry - Pennsylvania Infantry ** 3rd California Infantry - Pennsylvania Infantry** 5th California Infantry - Pennsylvania Infantry Regiments of the California Volunteers in Federal Service The California Volunteer units recruited 15,725 volunteers for Federal service.  Nearly all served inside California and in the Department of the Pacific and the Department of New Mexico.(The California State Military Museum, California and the Civil War)  These units included two full regiments and one battalion of Native Cavalry, eight full regiments and two battalions of infantry, one of Veterans and another called Mountaineers that specialized in fighting in the mountanous Redwood forests of Northwestern California.of California Civil War unitsThe California Volunteers most directly in action against the Confederacy were known as the Column.  They were under the command of General James Carleton.  At various times the following units served with the Column: Regiment California Volunteer Cavalry, 1st Battalion of Native Cavalry, and the 1st, 5th and Regiment California Volunteer Infantry. This force served in Arizona, New Mexico, and Texas, driving out the Confederate force in the Arizona Territory and defending New Mexico Territory and the southern overland route to California and operating against the Apache, Navajo, Comanche and other tribes.The command composed of Regiment California Volunteer Cavalry and the Regiment California Volunteer Infantry under P. Edward Connor kept the Overland Route to California open.  As a matter of Connors proactive style, he led these troops to attack Shoshoni Indians at the River Massacre near what is now the present-day city of Idaho, on January 29, 1863.( and )Detachments from the 2nd Regiment California Volunteer Cavalry from Camp Latham under Colonel S. Evans, fought in the Owens Valley Indian War, and established Camp Independence in 1862.The 2nd, 4th, 6th, and Regiment California Volunteer Infantry and the Battalion California Volunteer Mountaineers provided internal security in Northern California, Oregon, and Washington Territory.  2nd and 6th Volunteer Infantry Regiments and the 1st Battalion California Volunteer Mountaineers served in the Hills War and some other companies in the War.Also the Regiment Washington Territory Volunteer Infantry, had eight companies that were recruited in California during 1862, for service in Territory.(California State Museum, Regiments of the California Volunteers in Federal Service) They were mustered out at Vancouver in 1865.The Navy and the Civil War in the Pacific *SquadronPast residents of California in the Civil WarThe following famous people visited or lived in California before, during or after the Civil War.*Addison Armistead*Dickinson Baker*Fitzgerald Beale*Henry Carleton*Edward Connor*S. Grant*Maria de la Guerra*M. Gwin *Charles Frmont*Wager Halleck *Scott Hancock*Hooker*Sidney Johnston*Custis Lee*Thaddeus S. C. Lowe*N. Matheson*Morris Naglee*Otho Cresap Ord*Starke Rosecrans*Tecumseh Sherman*Stoneman*Rodman WestSee also* State Military Museum* of California to 1899* in the American Civil War* in the American Civil War* Mexico Territory in the American Civil War* in the American Civil War* in the American Civil War* in the American Civil War* in the American Civil WarReferencesFurther reading* * * * * * * *Masich, Andrew E. (2006). The Civil War in Arizona; the Story of the California Volunteers, 1861-1865 http://www.oupress.com University of Oklahoma Press, Norman. ISBN 0-8061-3747-9* * * * * * * The J.P. Gillis Flag, or the Biderman Flag of California article from the August 27, 2002 issue of The Vidette, the newsletter of the Sons of Confederate Veterans, California Division.*The War of the Rebellion: a compilation of the official records of the Union and Confederate armies, Volume 27, Part 1, CHAPTER LXII. Operations on the Pacific Coast, January 1,1861  June 30, 1862, United States. War Dept. * The War of the Rebellion: Volume 35, Part 1, CORRESPONDENCE, ORDERS, AND RETURNS RELATING TO OPERATIONS ON THE PACIFIC COAST FROM JULY 1, 1862, TO JUNE 30, 1865. By United States. War Dept, Robert Nicholson Scott, Henry Martyn WASHINGTON: GOVERNMENT PRINTING OFFICE. 1897* Records of California men in the war of the rebellion 1861 to 1867 By California. Adjutant Generals Office, SACRAMENTO: State Office, J. D. Young, Supt. State Printing. 1890.External links*United States of North America, western states, 1861*Map of California in 1860, showing County boundaries, roads*Map of the North Pacific States and Territories*Map of San Francisco Bay 1859*California Military Museum*Snakes in the Grass: Copperheads in Contra Costa?*San Diego in the Civil War*Copperheads, Secesh Men, and Confederate Guerillas*San Francisco in the Civil War*Civil War: How Southern California Tried to Split from Northern California - KCETlist 
2957124
Tuttletown,_California
footnotes                 ; Tuttletown (formerly, Mormon Gulch and Tuttleville) is a place (CDP)() in Tuolumne County, California.( It is located on State Route 49 near the gold rush community of Columbia.  Tuttletown sits at an elevation of .( The 2010 United States census reported Tuttletowns population was 668.HistoryThe community was originally known as Mormon Gulch, because of a company of Mormons who began mining gold there in 1848. Toward the end of the summer, however, Judge A. H. Tuttle settled at the place and built a cabin. His tavern became the focal point of the village that became Tuttletown.GeographyAccording to the States Census Bureau, the CDP covers an area of 7.4 square miles (19.1 km), 99.91% of it land and 0.09% of it water.DemographicsThe United States Census() reported that Tuttletown had a population of 668. The density was 90.8 people per square mile (35.1/km). The racial makeup of Tuttletown was 613 (91.8%) White, 5 (0.7%) African American, 14 (2.1%) Native American, 5 (0.7%) Asian, 1 (0.1%) Pacific Islander, 12 (1.8%) from other races, and 18 (2.7%) from two or more races.  Hispanic or Latino of any race were 48 persons (7.2%). The Census reported that 668 people (100% of the population) lived in households, 0 (0%) lived in non-institutionalized group quarters, and 0 (0%) were institutionalized.  There were 293 households, out of which 61 (20.8%) had children under the age of 18 living in them, 150 (51.2%) were opposite-sex married couples living together, 25 (8.5%) had a female householder with no husband present, 17 (5.8%) had a male householder with no wife present.  There were 23 (7.8%) unmarried opposite-sex partnerships, and 4 (1.4%) same-sex married couples or partnerships. 75 households (25.6%) were made up of individuals and 34 (11.6%) had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.28.  There were 192 families (65.5% of all households); the average family size was 2.73.The population was spread out with 114 people (17.1%) under the age of 18, 38 people (5.7%) aged 18 to 24, 99 people (14.8%) aged 25 to 44, 269 people (40.3%) aged 45 to 64, and 148 people (22.2%) who were 65 years of age or older.  The median age was 51.7 years. For every 100 females there were 93.1 males.  For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 96.5 males.There were 344 housing units at an average density of 46.8 per square mile (18.1/km), of which 227 (77.5%) were owner-occupied, and 66 (22.5%) were occupied by renters. The homeowner vacancy rate was 2.6%; the rental vacancy rate was 13.2%.  513 people (76.8% of the population) lived in owner-occupied housing units and 155 people (23.2%) lived in rental housing units.ReferencesExternal links*History of California by Theodore Henry Hittell*Tuttletown, CA, profile(California)fr:Tuttletown
2962732
Pyotr_Voykov
right|framePyotr Lazarevich Voykov (; party aliases -  and , or Piotrus and Intelligent) (, Kerch &mdash; June 7, 1927, Warsaw, buried in the Wall Necropolis) was a Russian revolutionary and Soviet diplomat. The son of a mining engineer, Voikov became involved in revolutionary activity on the side of the Mensheviks at the age of 15. Following a botched attempt on the life of the mayor of Yalta, he was expelled both from grammar school and later from the Petersburg Mining Institute. He went into exile in Switzerland, where he graduated from the of Geneva.  On returning to Russia in August 1917, he joined the Bolsheviks and was appointed Peoples Commissar for Government Supply for the Ural region in 1918, where he was known by his party code name of The Intellectual.  He subsequently became an important member of the Ural Soviet and was put in charge of prodrazvyorstkas. He knew N. N. Ipatiev, and had visited the House before it was selected as the final residence of II of Russia and his family.  It seems to have been on the basis of information supplied by Voikov that Ipatiev was summoned to the office of the Soviet at the end of April 1918 and ordered to vacate what was soon to be called The House of Special Purpose.  Clearly party to the decision to execute the royal family, Voikov was given the specific task of arranging for the disposal of their remains, obtaining 150 gallons of gasoline and 400 pounds of acid, the latter from the Yekaterinburg pharmacy.  After the killings, he was to declare that The world will never know what we did with them.  His role in the regicide was fully investigated by the commission set up after Kolchaks White Army captured Ekaterinburg from the Bolsheviks.  Back in Moscow in 1920, Voykov presided over the sales of the imperial treasures from the Armoury and the Fund. Thats how many Eggs found their way abroad. Voikov was appointed Soviet plenipotentiary representative in Poland in October 1924, and was assassinated in Warsaw in 1927 by Koverda - an 18-years old son of the White Russian monarchist, a pupil of the Russian Gymnasium (High School) from Wilna. The killing has been later justified as the revenge for Voykovs part in the killing of the Tsar and his family. Voikovs body was transported to Moscow to be buried on Red Square. This incident further damaged Soviet-Polish relations, already soured by the War of 1921. The Soviets broke off negotiations about a pact (they would be resumed in 1931), accusing Poles of supporting the anti-Soviet White resistance.The Soviet authorities cherished his memory, giving his name to the Metro station Voikovskaya, several streets and plants, and a coal mine in Ukraine. After the canonization of the royal family, the Orthodox Church urged the authorities to erase the name of the regicide and infanticide from public objects. On July 17, 2007, the remembrance day of the Russian Royal Family, several Orthodox groups publicly prayed that the metro station in Moscow might be renamed.(Moscow disputes over metro station named after Royal Family murderer :: Russia-InfoCentre at www.russia-ic.com) References *Radzinsky. The Last Tsar: the Life and Death of Nicholas II. Doubleday, 1992. ISBN 0385423713.*K. Massie. Nicholas and Alexandra. Black Dog & Leventhal Publishers, 2005. ISBN 157912433X. * 75 rocznica podpisania w Moskwie polsko-sowieckiego paktu o nieagresji, PAP, 2007-07-23Lazarevi VojkovWojkow 
2965327
Ptange
Ptange (Luxembourgish: Piteng, German: Petingen) is a commune and town in south-western Luxembourg. It is part of the canton of Esch-sur-Alzette, which is part of the district of Luxembourg.  Ptange lies on the borders with both Belgium and France.As of 2007, the town of Ptange, which lies in the north of the commune, has a population of 7,399.  Other towns within the commune include Lamadelaine and Rodange.  The commune is one of the smallest communes of Luxembourg, yet is the fifth-most populous.  It is the most-populous commune without city status.HistoryThe modern settlement of Ptange was first mentioned in 938 by the name Perdgitten.  Six centuries later, Ptange had still not acquired much prominence; in 1536, it was home to only about 25 people.In 1601, the boundary between Luxembourg and the of Lorraine was definitively demarcated for the first time.  The modern commune was divided between the two, with the town of Ptange going to Luxembourg, but the towns of Rodange and Lamadelaine, which are further to the south, lying on the Lorrainian side of the border.When, in 1795, Luxembourg was annexed into France as part of the dpartement of Forts, its former territories were reunited, and the communes territory was established as it is today.  However, when Luxembourg passed to the Kingdom of the Netherlands, after the of Vienna, the towns of Rodange and Lamadelaine passed with it.The towns importance grew greatly in the late nineteenth century, thanks to the booming iron-mining and steel industries.  The first railway into Ptange was opened in 1873, running to Esch-sur-Alzette.  Further railway lines were added to Ettelbruck (1873) and City (1900).On 9 September 1944, Ptange became the first commune in the country to be liberated by Allied soldiers at the end of the German occupation in the Second World War.  In remembrance to the first soldier to die in the liberation, a memorial was erected in his honor: Hyman Josefson Square.GeographyThe commune lies in the extreme south-west of Luxembourg, bordering both the French dpartement of Meurthe-et-Moselle and the Belgian province of Luxembourg.  The town of Rodange lies just across the border from the Belgian town of Aubange.  Ptange is situated at the west end of the Lands: iron-rich sedimentary rocks that form the far south and south-west of Luxembourg.  The town lies in the upper reaches of the Chiers valley, and is one of the few places in Luxembourg (along with the commune of Differdange) to lie outside the drainage system of the Rhine.The commune is only 12 km in area, one of the smallest in Luxembourg, but is the site of three significant towns.  The town of Ptange itself has a population of 6,909, but, despite being the seventh-largest town in Grand Duchy, accounts for under half of the population of the commune.  Rodange, in the south-west of the commune, is home to 4,505 people, whilst Lamadelaine, in the south of the commune, has a population of 2,335.AttractionsThe south of the commune is home to Titelberg, a prominent hill on top of which lie the ruins of a Celtic oppidum.  The walled fort was  long.  The entire settlement had a total population of 10,000 before the Roman conquest, making it the largest pre-Roman settlement in Luxembourg.The Fond de Gras railway and museum recreate the conditions of the Red Lands in the year 1900, at the height of their growth and development.  Whilst the centre lies just within the commune of Differdange, to the east, the two locomotives take visitors to the towns of Ptange and Rodange, and provide a stream of tourists to the towns in the summer.Ptange has a football team in Luxembourgs top-flight National Division, called Ptange.  They play their home games at the Stade Municipal.  Despite being one of the oldest Luxembourgian clubs in existence, having been founded in 1910, Ptange have one only one trophy, the Cup in 2004-05.Twin towns*  Maribor, Slovenia*  Schio, ItalyProminent local people* de Nassau* HalsdorfSee also* of mayors of PtangeExternal links* Commune of Ptange official websiteca:Ptangeda:Ptangede:Ptangefr:Ptangeit:Ptangesw:PtangePitenglt:Petanashu:Ptangenl:Ptangeno:Ptangepl:Ptangept:Ptangero:Ptangeru:vec:Ptange
2968914
The_Peaks_of_Lyell
The Peaks of Lyell is a book by Blainey, originally published in 1954. It contains the history of the Lyell Mining and Railway Company, and through association, Queenstown and further the West Coast Tasmania.  It is unique for this type of book in that it has gone to the sixth edition in 2000, and few company histories in Australia have achieved such continual publishing.Blainey was fortunate in being able to speak to older people about the history of the west coast, some who had known Queenstown in its earliest years.The book gives an interesting overview from the materials and people Blainey was able to access in the early 1950s, and the omissions.  Due to the nature of a company history, a number of items of Queenstown history did have alternative interpretations on events such as the North Mount Lyell Disaster, and there were residents of Queenstown living in the town as late as the 1970s who had stories that differed from the official company history.Significant characters from the West Coast Tasmania history such as Carl Sticht and James Crotty amongst a longer list probably still deserve further work on their significance in west coast and tasmanian history, but the book has had significant presence in being in print for so long, new scholarship on some of the neglected topics of west coast history only emerged in the late 1990s.In 1994, when the fifth edition was printed, the Mount Lyell company closed down, and most of the records held by the company were donated to the Library of Tasmania. By the 2000s a sixth edition was published.Publication history* Blainey, Geoffrey. The Peaks of Lyell,  Melbourne University Press, Carlton, Vic., 1954, 310pp.*History of Mt. Lyell manuscript (M.A. Thesis), University of Melbourne, 1955, 328 leaves.* The first half of this history was presented as Blaineys Master of Arts thesis.** 2nd ed., Melbourne University Press, Carlton, Vic., 1959, 310pp.** 3rd ed., Melbourne University Press, Carlton, Vic.; London, 1967, 341pp.** 4th ed., Melbourne University Press, Carlton, Vic., 1978, 341pp.** 5th ed., St. Davids Park Publishing, Hobart, Tas., 1993, 370pp.* See also*Companion to Tasmanian History
2975553
Superradiance
In mechanics, superradiance refers to a class of radiation effects (or enhanced radiation effects) typically associated with the acceleration or motion of a nearby body (which supplies the energy and momentum for the effect). It is also sometimes described as the consequence of an effective field differential around the body (e.g. the effect of  forces).Superradiance allows a body with concentration of angular or linear momentum to move towards a lower energy state, even when there is no obvious classical mechanism for this to happen. In this sense, the effect has some similarities with tunnelling (e.g. the tendency of waves and particles to find a way to exploit the existence of an energy potential, despite the absence of an obvious classical mechanism for this to happen). The term also sometimes appears in discussions of laser technology, where the radiation is again triggered in a driven system by quantum effects (spontaneous emission), but the energy for the emergent wave is instead provided by an explicit, particulate, medium. Comparison with classical physics* In classical physics, the motion or rotation of a body in a particulate medium will normally be expected to result in momentum and energy being transferred to the surrounding particles, and there is then an increased statistical likelihood of particles being discovered following trajectories that imply removal of momentum from the body.* In quantum mechanics, this principle is extended to the case of bodies moving, accelerating or rotating in a vacuum  in the quantum case, fluctuations with appropriate vectors are said to be stretched and distorted and provided with energy and momentum by the nearby bodys motion, with this selective amplification generating real physical radiation around the body. Where a classical description of a rotating isolated weightless sphere in a vacuum will tend to say that the sphere will continue to rotate indefinitely, due the lack of frictional effects or any other form of obvious coupling with its smooth empty environment, under quantum mechanics the surrounding region of vacuum is not entirely smooth, and the spheres field can couple with quantum fluctuations and accelerate them to produce real radiation. Hypothetical virtual wavefronts with appropriate paths around the body are stimulated and amplified into real physical wavefronts by the coupling process. Descriptions sometimes refer to these fluctuations tickling the field to produce the effect. In theoretical studies of black holes, the effect is also sometimes described as the consequence of the gravitational forces around a strongly-gravitating body pulling apart virtual particle pairs that would otherwise quickly mutually annihilate, to produce a population of real particles in the region outside the horizon.Cases of superradianceIn astrophysics, the most popularly-known example of superradiance is probably Zeldovich radiation. Borisovich Zeldovich picked on the case under electrodynamics (QED) where the region around the equator of a spinning metal sphere is expected to throw off radiation tangentially, and suggested that the case of a spinning gravitational mass, such as a black hole ought to produce similar coupling effects, and ought to radiate in an analogous way. This was followed by arguments from Hawking and others that an accelerated observer near a black hole (e.g. an observer carefully lowered towards the horizon at the end of a rope) ought to see the region inhabited by real radiation, whereas for a distant observer this radiation would be said to be virtual. If the accelerated observer near the horizon traps a nearby particle and throws it out to the distant observer for capture and study, then for the distant observer, the appearance of the particle can be explained by saying that the physical acceleration of the particle has turned it from a particle into a real particle (see radiation).  Similar arguments apply for the cases of observers in accelerated frames (radiation).  radiation, electromagnetic radiation emitted by charged particles travelling through a particulate medium at more than the nominal speed of light in that medium, has also been described as being a superradiant effect.See also * radiation* radiation* radiationReferences* S. Thorne Black holes and timewarps: Einsteins outrageous legacy (1994)   includes a diagram of the Zeldovich radiation mechanism on pp.432* Thorne. Price and Macdonald (eds) Black holes: the membrane paradigm (1986)   includes a description of mining a black holes virtual atmosphere by lowering a bucket into the region and pulling out real particles. The buckets acceleration turns the virtual atmosphere into tangible light and matter.* Coherence in Spontaneous Radiation Processes Dicke, R.H. 1954, Physical Review, vol. 93, Issue 1, pp. 99-110* Google search for superradiance* ArXiv search for research papers on superradiancefr:Superradianceru:
2980535
Vacon
Vacon is a manufacturer of variable-speed AC drives, or frequency converters. AC drives can be used to control of the rotation speed of electric motors or to help generate power from renewable sources. Vacon has R&D and production units in Finland, the United States, China and Italy, and sales offices in 27 countries. In 2009, Vacon had revenues of EUR 272 million and globally employed more than 1,200 people. Vacons shares (VAC1V) are listed and publicly traded on the Helsinki Stock Exchange.* The history of Vacon dates back to 1993 when a group of 13 key employees at the Vaasa Factories of ABB Industry Oy founded Vaasa Control Oy. These 13 founding members started Vacons journey towards the goal of becoming a leading global supplier of AC drives. Since then, some 1200 more people have joined the team, serving a network of customers and partners all over the world. In 2008 Vacon celebrated its 15-year history.* Vacons shares are listed on the NASDAQ OMX Helsinki Oy. On 31 December 2009, Vacon had 5,114 shareholders, of which 71.1% were institutions or private investors operating in Finland and 28.9% were foreign owners.* Vacons AC drives are utilized extensively in almost all sectors of industry and society around the world. Typical customer business sectors include machine building, mining, renewable energy generation, construction engineering, marine & offshore industry and water treatment.* AC drives are used for example in pumps, fans, cranes, lifts, paper machines, wind power plants and compressors. Some of Vacons biggest customers are Honeywell, Eaton, Konecranes, Schindler, The Switch Engineering, Rockwell Automation and Converteam.* Using AC drives can give considerable energy savings and they are utilized in renewable energy generation. Saving energy and the generation of renewable energy both help to reduce carbon dioxide emissions. The amount of energy used in the manufacture of AC drives is considerably less than the potential energy savings in various applications.* In terms of its revenues, Vacon is the largest company in the world that has focused solely on the AC drives business.In 2010 it was revealed that the Stuxnet worm targeted SCADA systems which used AC motor controls from Vacon.Facts at a glance* Revenues in 2009: EUR 272 million* Production and R&D on three continents* Sales companies and representatives in 27 countries* Worldwide distributor network* Investment in R&D ~ 7%* Personnel ~ 1,200* Since December 2000, Vacons share is quoted on the main list of the NASDAQ OMX Helsinki* Headquartered in Vaasa, FinlandReferencesExternal links* http://www.vacon.com* http://www.vacon.fi (Finnish)*Vacon is a member of Cleantech Finlandes:Vaconfi:Vacon
2988879
Great_Depression_in_South_Africa
The Depression had a pronounced economic and political effect on Africa, as it did on most nations at the time.  As world trade slumped, demand for South African agricultural and mineral exports fell drastically.  It is believed that the social discomfort caused by the depression was a contributing factor in the 1933 split between the gesuiwerde (purified) and smelter (fusionist) factions within the National Party and the National Partys subsequent fusion with the African Party.The sudden lack of demand destroyed prices on commodities that were profitable to many Afrikaner farmers. For example, the price of wool fell 75% between 1925 and 1933.(Vigario Seminars: The Fall of the Greatest Monetary Tower of Babel, part 3) A large portion of the agricultural industry were unable to repay mortgages on their over-capitalized farms.  Thus, the National Party found itself losing favour with one of its largest constituencies&mdash;conservative, rural Boers.South Africa was saved from a complete collapse by the gold mining industry&mdash;one of the largest and most advanced at the time&mdash;as the price of gold rose rapidly as investors sought a safe haven from the dead securities market.  Growing gold exports compensated somewhat for the loss of other trade revenue.  However, like the situation with the Boers, the National party lost support as the weak economy forced the gold corporations to replace white labourers with lower-paid blacks.The National Party-led government staved off bankruptcy by raising taxes on imports, petrol and postage, amongst other things.  This unfair taxation led to further dislike of the ruling government.The coalition government between Smuts and Hertzog was successful in 1933 partly because Smuts presented the public with a mock budget showing how South Africas economic malaise could be lifted by floating the African pound and removing it from the standard, thus making exports more attractive, and creating a scenario in which undue taxation could be removed.See alsoReferences
2993898
RF_Online
requirements  Minimum: Pentium/Athlon 800 MHz, 256 MB RAM, Windows98SE/2000/XP, 3.5 GB Hard Disk Space, DirectX 9.0c, Broadband Internet Connection (128 kbit/s or higher), DirectX compatible sound card, Supported Direct3D Compatible Video Card, Minimum Video Cards: ATI 8500 or GeForce 3 or above (Not MX).Recommended: Pentium/Athlon 1.5 GHz or higher, 512 MB RAM, Windows XP, 3.5 GB Hard Disk Space, DirectX 9.0c, Broadband Internet Connection (512 kbit/s or higher), DirectX compatible sound card, Recommended Video Cards: ATI Radeon 9600 SE or GeForce FX5200 Series or higher.RF Online, originally named Rising Force, () is a 3D MMORPG developed by CCR.  The first version of the game was released in Korea and was later followed by Chinese (Mandarin), Japanese, Portuguese and English translations. The North American/European version of the game launched its retail phase on February 21, 2006. A mixture of fiction and classic fantasy, RF Online is set in a distant planet in the Novus system where magic exists alongside high technology. Like most MMORPGs it follows the typical fantasy setting complete with swords and sorcery, but it also emphasizes the three-way Race vs. Race vs. Race (RvRvR) concept and modern/futuristic technology such as mecha and nuclear weapons.The NA/EU game service was brought down as of November 9, 2008, due to licence expiration. However, the developers, CCR have started to relaunch the game hosting it themselves for NA/EU. RFO is currently a free-to-play game.GameplayAs with many MMORPGs, the player will select one race and fight monsters to gain experience points. RFO is populated with many different monsters across many areas. At the start of the game, a character will be led through an in-game guide of the basic commands for the game. From there, the character will be exposed to a series of quests which will familiarize him with his characters headquarters. As the character progresses in level, his quests may take him out to aggressive maps, where he will be exposed to the player killing Features of the game. One quest given in the Sette Desert on low levels makes players aware of constant presence and danger of enemy races. RacesThere are 3 character races which the player can choose ,namely: Bellato, Cora and Accretia.Bellato are small elves which use  Force ( also known as magic ) , physical combat and specialize in creating and maneuvering massive armor units also known as MAUs.Cora are elves which use Dark Force, physical combat and specialize in summoning or calling out third world monsters also known as Animus.Accretia are Cyborgs which do not use force. They are concentrated mainly on physical combat, but with their technology level they are able to create rocket launchers also known as Siege Kits.Every race has their own special class of characters to play, like warrior, ranger, specialist and exclusive classes.Political SystemEach race is led by the archon, a person voted into power by their subsidiaries. Below the archon are four councillors. These councillors are determined based on the number of votes received during their run for archonship.As of Episode 2, Giga 1.5 (Crimson Dawn), four additional councillors were introduced. These four are assigned by the archon.In addition, each position is granted special abilities to help their race. These abilities range from increases in defense, increases in attack, or affect auras to increase the statistics of racial members around the councilor.In the event the number of archon aspirants is not enough to populate the council position, the top racial characters will be placed into the vacant council positions by default. Racial standings can be seen by checking with the respective race manager NPCs.EconomyThe games economy can be divided into two parts - production and consumption. The mine is a new field where resources are produced as a part of and in support of economic activity. Mining for minerals and processing the products of these produce many kinds of items. These form the basis for conflict within the mines.Chip WarThe battle for resources is actualized in an all-out war among the three races termed as Chip War. Chip War happens three times in a day, where the winning race obtains the right to control the guardian of the mines - the dreaded Holystone Keeper.The war is led by the respective racial leaders, whose goal is to break at least one control chip owned by the opposing race. Once broken, the player who has dealt the last blow on the chip must touch base at the center of the mine caverns, to earn his race an extra 60 minutes of mining time guarded by the Holystone Keeper.As of Episode 2, Giga 1 (Crimson Dawn), the Holystone Keeper will be vulnerable for 30 minutes after a control chip has been broken. The winning race must defend the guardian, or risk losing his guardianship over players who will opt to mine for resources until the next chip war. In addition, only characters who have been able to obtain a HolyMental Scanner during the battle will be recognized by the guardian as a valid member of the controlling race. Connectivity issues, however, have been seen to cause problems with this new feature.PVPUnlike most MMORPGs, RF Online revolves around PvP (also called PK or Player Killing). Only the racial headquarters, and the settlement towns, are considered as safe areas from enemy races. Player killing comes into play because of the battle for resources between the three races. By default, opposing races members may engage in combat at any point in time on aggressive maps. Same race players may not engage in combat, unless by virtue of an item called the Chaos Potion, or during a special in-race competition called the Guild Circle Zone Scramble, also known as Guild Wars.ReferencesExternal links*OnlineForce OnlineForce OnlineonlineForce OnlineOnline
3002794
Crotty_Dam
websiteCrotty Dam also known earlier as the King River Dam is an 82metre high concrete faced rock and gravel fill dam in Tasmania.It is one of two dams that contain Burbury,  which forms the headwaters for the King River Hydroelectric Power Development on Tasmanias West Coast. The other is Darwin Dam.The dam is located in the upper reaches of the King River gorge where the river breaks through the Coast Range.  It captures the high rainfall in the catchment of the King River and allows diversion of water through a tunnel to the John Butters Power Station some 8 kilometres downstream of the dam. Crotty Dam and Lake Burbury have been identified as Indicative places on the Register of the National Estate.(Crotty Dam and Lake Burbury, Gormanston, TAS Profile)HistoryThe dam was constructed in the 1980s following the abandonment of the Gordon-below-Franklin power development scheme (The Dam) of Tasmania. It was commissioned in 1991.It is named after Crotty, who founded the North Mount Lyell Copper Mine at the turn of the 20th century. A ghost town site of the same name Crotty was submerged by the waters of Lake Burbury.In the 1910s the Lyell Mining and Railway Company had investigated and surveyed a site very close to this dam for a proposed hydro electric scheme. Whitham also wrote of the inevitability of the dam in 1927 and even proposed a name for the reservoir created - Lake DorothyIn 2001, The Institution of Engineers Australia selected Crotty Dam as one of the 25  dams with the greatest Australian heritage value. Spillway A unique feature of the Dam is its spillway. The spillway is located on the embankment, rather than on one of the rock abutments. This had never been successfully attempted before in the design of dams of any significant height, due to problems in making allowance for embankment settlements.In the case of Crotty Dam, the embankment was partly composed of well graded gravels, and thus a very high modulus of embankment deformation was achieved. The high modulus limits embankment settlements. Additionally, the spillway was designed to articulate in order to accommodate any settlement that did occur.The spillway has a capacity of 240 m/s and is designed to allow sufficient time for a large jet flow valve located in the diversion tunnel to be opened so that larger floods can be safely handled.The spillway designers, Sergio Giudici (the chief engineer on the Dam), Frank Kinstler, Steven Li, Tony Morse and Graeme Maher were acknowledged within the engineering community because the spillway was the first known to provide for articulation of the spillway structure so that movements in its foundations could occur without damage to the overlying structure.  http://www.engineersaustralia.org.au/shadomx/apps/fms/fmsdownload.cfm?file_uuidF53660CE-0F22-C8B8-AAC6-1DFC8BBEBCC1&siteNameieaustPower stationThe water from Lake Burbury is conveyed through a 7km long unlined tunnel to the Butters Power Station (installed capacity 144MW), which is located on the King River downstream of the dam, near the confluence with the River.See also* Dam (Tasmania)* TasmaniaNotes(External links* Hydro web page on King CatchmentReferences* * * * : 2003 edition - Queenstown: Municipality of Queenstown. :1949 edition - Hobart: Davies Brothers. ; ASIN B000FMPZ80:1924 edition - Queenstown: Mount Lyell Tourist Association. ; ASIN B0008BM4XC
3010156
Fujita_(company)
Fujita () was the name of a Japanese zaibatsu based in Osaka. Its founder is Fujita. He built the foundation of Fujita zaibatsu by producing military goods during Rebellion and rapidly expanded his business to construction, mining and other businesses.Many of its luxurious constructions have been placed in care of Kanko, a resort development company after War II.
